THE HUMAN CLONING PROHIBITION ACT OF 2001 AND THE CLONING PROHIBITION ACT OF 2001 HEARING BEFORE THE SUBCOMMITTEE ON HEALTH OF THE COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND COMMERCE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES ONE HUNDRED SEVENTH CONGRESS FIRST SESSION ON H.R. 1644 and H.R. 2172 JUNE 20, 2001 Serial No. 10741 Printed for the use of the Committee on Energy and Commerce ( Available via the World Wide Web: http://www.access.gpo.gov/congress/house U.S.
GOVERNMENT PRINTING OFFICE 73733PS WASHINGTON : 2001 For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: (202) 5121800 Fax: (202) 5122250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 204020001 VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND COMMERCE W.J. ``BILLY'' TAUZIN, Louisiana, Chairman MICHAEL BILIRAKIS, Florida JOE BARTON, Texas FRED UPTON, Michigan CLIFF STEARNS, Florida PAUL E. GILLMOR, Ohio JAMES C. GREENWOOD, Pennsylvania CHRISTOPHER COX, California NATHAN DEAL, Georgia STEVE LARGENT, Oklahoma RICHARD BURR, North Carolina ED WHITFIELD, Kentucky GREG GANSKE, Iowa CHARLIE NORWOOD, Georgia BARBARA CUBIN, Wyoming JOHN SHIMKUS, Illinois HEATHER WILSON, New Mexico JOHN B. SHADEGG, Arizona CHARLES ``CHIP'' PICKERING, Mississippi VITO FOSSELLA, New York ROY BLUNT, Missouri TOM DAVIS, Virginia ED BRYANT, Tennessee ROBERT L. EHRLICH, Jr., Maryland STEVE BUYER, Indiana GEORGE RADANOVICH, California CHARLES F. BASS, New Hampshire JOSEPH R. PITTS, Pennsylvania MARY BONO, California GREG WALDEN, Oregon LEE TERRY, Nebraska JOHN D. DINGELL, Michigan HENRY A. WAXMAN, California EDWARD J. MARKEY, Massachusetts RALPH M. HALL, Texas RICK BOUCHER, Virginia EDOLPHUS TOWNS, New York FRANK PALLONE, Jr., New Jersey SHERROD BROWN, Ohio BART GORDON, Tennessee PETER DEUTSCH, Florida BOBBY L. RUSH, Illinois ANNA G. ESHOO, California BART STUPAK, Michigan ELIOT L. ENGEL, New York TOM SAWYER, Ohio ALBERT R. WYNN, Maryland GENE GREEN, Texas KAREN MCCARTHY, Missouri TED STRICKLAND, Ohio DIANA DEGETTE, Colorado THOMAS M. BARRETT, Wisconsin BILL LUTHER, Minnesota LOIS CAPPS, California MICHAEL F. DOYLE, Pennsylvania CHRISTOPHER JOHN, Louisiana JANE HARMAN, California REID DAVID V. MARVENTANO, Staff Director JAMES D. BARNETTE, General Counsel P.F. STUNTZ, Minority Staff Director and Chief Counsel SUBCOMMITTEE JOE BARTON, Texas FRED UPTON, Michigan JAMES C. GREENWOOD, Pennsylvania NATHAN DEAL, Georgia RICHARD BURR, North Carolina ED WHITFIELD, Kentucky GREG GANSKE, Iowa CHARLIE NORWOOD, Georgia Vice Chairman BARBARA CUBIN, Wyoming HEATHER WILSON, New Mexico JOHN B. SHADEGG, Arizona CHARLES ``CHIP'' PICKERING, Mississippi ED BRYANT, Tennessee ROBERT L. EHRLICH, Jr., Maryland STEVE BUYER, Indiana JOSEPH R. PITTS, Pennsylvania W.J. ``BILLY'' TAUZIN, Louisiana (Ex Officio) ON HEALTH MICHAEL BILIRAKIS, Florida, Chairman SHERROD BROWN, Ohio HENRY A. WAXMAN, California TED STRICKLAND, Ohio THOMAS M. BARRETT, Wisconsin LOIS CAPPS, California RALPH M. HALL, Texas EDOLPHUS TOWNS, New York FRANK PALLONE, Jr., New Jersey PETER DEUTSCH, Florida ANNA G. ESHOO, California BART STUPAK, Michigan ELIOT L. ENGEL, New York ALBERT R. WYNN, Maryland GENE GREEN, Texas JOHN D. DINGELL, Michigan, (Ex Officio) (II) VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 6011 Sfmt 0486 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 CONTENTS Page Testimony of: Allen, Hon. Claude A., Deputy Secretary, Department of Health and Human Services ......................................................................
......................
Doerflinger, Richard M., Associate Director for Policy Development, National Conference of Catholic Bishops .........................................................
Fukuyama, Francis, Omer L. and Nancy Hirst Professor of Public Policy, School of Public Policy, George Mason University .....................................
Guenin, Louis M., Lecturer on Ethics in Science, Department of Microbiology and Molecular Genetics, Harvard Medical School ............................
Kass, Leon R., Addie Clark Harding Professor of Social Thought and the College, University of Chicago ..............................................................
Newman, Stuart A., Professor of Cell Biology and Anatomy, Department of Cell Biology and Anatomy, New York Medical College .........................
Norsigian, Judy, Executive Director, Boston Women's Health Book Collective, Boston University School of Public Health ........................................
Okarma, Thomas, President, Geron Corporation, on Behalf of Biotechnology Industry Organization ...............................................................
Perry, Daniel, Executive Director, Alliance for Aging Research ..................
(III) 20 78 87 55 50 67 76 45 72 2 VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 0486 Sfmt 0486 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 THE HUMAN CLONING PROHIBITION ACT OF 2001 AND THE CLONING PROHIBITION ACT OF 2001 WEDNESDAY, JUNE 20, 2001 HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND COMMERCE, SUBCOMMITTEE ON HEALTH, Washington, DC.
The subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:15 a.m., in room 2123, Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. Michael Bilirakis (chairman) presiding.
Members present: Representatives Bilirakis, Greenwood, Burr, Ganske, Norwood, Cubin, Wilson, Shadegg, Bryant, Buyer, Pitts, Tauzin (ex officio), Brown, Waxman, Strickland, Barrett, Deutsch, Stupak, Engel, and Green.
Also Present: Representatives Stearns and DeGette.
Staff present: Marc Wheat, majority counsel; Brent Del Monte, majority counsel; Kristi Gillis, legislative clerk; and John Ford, minority counsel.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Come to order.
The Chair apologizes for his tardiness, and this hearing will come to order.
I want to thank our witnesses for their time and effort in joining us today for this very important hearing.
Today, the Subcommittee on Health will continue where the Subcommittee on Oversight and Investigations, chaired by Congressman Gene Greenwood, left off.
We will examine two measures, which, in many ways, reflect the discussions of that hearing: H.R. 1644, sponsored by Congressmen Weldon and Stupak, and H.R. 2172, sponsored by Congressmen Greenwood and Deutsch.
This is a difficult issue, to say the least, and it involves many new and complex concepts.
But we should all be clear, I think, about the controversies related to human cloning.
The term ``therapeutic cloning,'' which many people use to mean any type of cloning that is not intended to result in a pregnancy, is confusing.
It really includes two, distinct procedures, one of which is controversial, while the other, I think, is not.
The non-controversial concept of therapeutic cloning is the cloning of human tissue that does not give rise to an embryo.
The controversial aspect involves the creation of a human embryo.
This latter meaning is also the subject of both of the bills we will discuss today.
(1) VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 2
It draws a very bright line as to what activities are specifically prohibited.
Many people have attempted to paint this bill as handcuffing the bio-technology and bio-research efforts currently underway.
The truth is, there is no cloned human embryo testing going on.
And so, the arguments we will hear against this bill today will be conjecture at best; as in, we think this may happen, but we are not sure.
Well, Mr. Chairman, I would like the researchers to be a bit more sure before they begin creating human clones.
The Weldon-Stupak bill intentionally steers clear of issues such as animal cloning, in vitro fertilization or IVF, and allows cloning VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 13 techniques to produce DNA, cells other than human embryos, tissues, and plants.
It also stays clear from stem cell research because, and I want to make this point very clear, stem cell research is being done on existing embryos at IVF clinics.
The Weldon-Stupak bill does not prohibit this type of research on existing human embryos that are already slated for destruction.
Therefore, stem cell research can and will go on.
This is not a Republic versus Democrat issue.
H.R. 1644 reflects that.
Currently, we have 105 co-sponsors, 19 of which are Democrats, much more bipartisan than any other cloning bill.
Some people have painted this bill as a pro-life vehicle.
This is not true.
I would like to point out the United Methodist Church has endorsed the Weldon-Stupak bill, as well as our witness today, pro-choice advocate, Judy Norsigian.
H.R. 1644 is an ethical bill about an ethical, moral, and legal problem.
And I am proud that is able to reach across the divisive pro-life/pro-choice lines.
Another point that will be brought up in today's hearings by procloning advocates will be what is called therapeutic research.
Briefly, these advocates say that cloning of human embryos is essential for organ transplant.
To explain, let us say I have a faulty heart.
Pro-cloning researchers will say, ``Let me clone myself, using an embryo, exact my own stem cells within to grow new heart cells to replace the damaged.
Then, implant these cells.''
This will, so the theory goes, cut down on transplant rejection and cut down on the brutal immuno-suppressive drugs.
My question is, why not clone my heart cells and cut out on the uncertain step of directing embryonic stem cells to become heart cells? Finally, some have mentioned their concern with the lack of a sunset date, thus forever ruling out human embryo cloning.
This is not true.
The Weldon-Stupak bill has a provision that directs scientists to come back to us when they feel that can make an--when they feel they can make a strong case for human embryo cloning.
This puts the burden of proof on the researchers, which is where it should be.
One last distinction between our bill and the other human cloning bills: our bill bans a specific act.
The Greenwood-Deutsch bill, for example, bans intent, a much more blurred standard.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I look forward to the testimony of our witnesses, and I welcome Mr. Allen, the Deputy Secretary of HHS.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair thanks the gentleman.
Dr. Norwood for an opening statement? Mr. NORWOOD.
Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman, and I will try to get you back on schedule.
I will be brief.
Let me say to Mr. Allen, we are delighted you are here.
And I thank you very much, Mr. Chairman, for holding this hearing.
I am really here today to listen.
What was once considered science fiction now has become a reality, human cloning.
And with that reality comes the ability to discover new treatments and treatments for conditions and diseases, perhaps even ways of preventing them from occurring at all.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 14 I believe that we should move cautiously in considering any legislation that would arbitrarily close the door on important avenues of research.
Now, we have two bills before us, and I am a co-sponsor of the Weldon-Stupak bill.
But I admit, I am also very interested in the approach Mr. Greenwood has taken.
I believe that we need to give these bills great scrutiny to make sure that we understand all the potential consequences of both bills.
Again, Mr. Chairman, I thank you for holding this hearing.
I commend you for your efforts to further examine this issue of cloning, and I look forward to hearing from our witnesses today, and would gladly yield back the balance of my time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
And I thank the gentleman for that.
Mr. Strickland for an opening statement? Mr. STRICKLAND.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. Chairman, I woke up this morning, thinking about a young man in my district who is in his late 20's who, in his early 20's, had a serious car accident, and is unable to even breathe on his own.
He has 24-hour care.
He has back-up power in case the electricity would fail so that he could continue to breathe.
That young man, I hope someday, will have hope that he, and others like him, will no longer be required to spend his entire life in bed, being cared for by others.
I was thinking of him because I knew I was coming to this hearing, and I knew that what we were going to be talking about this morning was very important.
I absolutely agree with what Dr. Norwood just said.
We should be very careful that we not close the door, at least at this stage of our knowledge, on efforts to advance science and medicine.
We are opposed to the cloning of human beings.
But we need to be very careful; and I hope we, as a committee, will be very, very careful, that we not allow theology or philosophy or politics to interfere with the decisions that we make here, but that we make sure that the decisions we make are based upon sound science.
I am a United Methodist.
My friend, Mr. Stupak, is a Roman Catholic.
But I think neither of us can allow our churches to tell us how to respond to this issue.
I am not--I am not implying that that is true of either of us, but I do believe that there is a danger with this issue of allowing it to get caught up in matters which are apart from science and our responsibilities as Representatives to support sound science.
I haven't made up my mind on which bill I am going to support, but I am convinced that what we are doing today is important and vital, and it will ultimately affect huge numbers of the American people.
And for that reason, we ought to approach it with the utmost seriousness of purpose.
Thank you, and I yield back my time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
And I thank the gentleman.
Mr. Bryant for an opening statement? Mr. BRYANT.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I have been sitting over here, making notes and deciding whether I want to give an opening statement or not, and trying to move things along.
And I thought I could echo and join in my--my good colleague from Michigan's statement, Mr. Stupak.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 15 And I certainly agree with him 100 percent, and I thought I could end it right there.
But as I continue to hear some of the statements about--being made about this research and the need for it, which I don't quarrel with that, and I don't quarrel with these many, many difficult circumstances, these terrible cases where people have been hurt or--or have diseases; and certainly somewhere down the road, perhaps research can discover a cure or something to help them.
And we all support that.
Those are terrible cases.
But we do look at things like theology, and philosophy, and even politics, up here on everything we do.
We operate in a world not purely humanistic, not just on science.
We draw lines all the time out there.
We don't let prisoners sell their organs, or anybody, for that matter, sell their organs.
We don't require prisoners to give up organs because they are in prison.
We don't grow people.
We don't create people for organ harvesting and things like that, and other body parts.
We don't kill seniors, at least yet, for lack of a quality of life and things like that.
So, I think we operate in a bigger world than simply sound science.
There is no question sound science plays a role in so many things.
But yet, when you are dealing with such deep, moral issues, for many of us who do have a clear definition of where we think life begins, I think you could find people that could say anything about that.
Some say at the beginning, when the sperm meets the egg, perhaps now survivability and with the technology that we have got to keep these little premature babies alive, you know, when is that? The law in my State, in Tennessee, in civil cases is viability.
And some might even say, you can argue through partial-birth abortion, is it doesn't begin until the baby is actually born.
You have got people that will say all kinds of definitions there.
And if I am going to make a mistake on when that life begins, I am going to try and err on the side of life, and give the benefit, the most generous benefit.
Even in our criminal courts today and our law system, people who are sentenced to death have layers of appeal because we give them the benefit of the doubt.
And yet, in situations like this where perhaps we are creating lives there and then destroying those lives, there is no--no one advocating for them.
So, I think there are difficult issues here.
Unquestionably, there are terrible cases that we have to deal with.
We have to have this research.
And I am just optimistic, and hopeful, and encouraged that there are other ways we can get to this research through the tissue replication, as I understand it--I am not a doctor--something short of having to create, in my--in my belief, a life, and then destroy that life to help these very difficult circumstances.
And again, I just--I hope there is another way to do this.
And I am encouraged, and I am glad to have all of the different opinions here today.
I want to listen as much as I can.
We have got schedules for--we are in and out a lot.
But I do--I did feel it necessary to at least respond in part to some of the statements that are being made in--in this regard.
And for that, Mr. Chairman, I thank you again for holding this very important hearing, and I would yield back my time.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 16 Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair certainly thanks him.
Mr. Green for an opening statement? Mr. GREEN.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you for holding the hearing on these two bills which address the controversial issue of human cloning.
Cloning was once the subject of science fiction novels.
Many of us associate cloning with the disturbing notion of designer babies or a human race that is void of individuality or spirit.
And we remember Huxley's ``Brave New World'' and the frightful images it conjured up of genetically manipulated and cloned individuals.
What was once science fiction could become a reality.
In 1997, the cloning of Dolly the sheep opened up all our eyes to the possibility of human cloning.
Human cloning either for therapeutic or reproductive purposes raises a number of ethical concerns that this committee and our Nation must consider.
If animal cloning has taught us anything, it is that cloning has significant risk.
Miscarriages, birth defects, and genetic problems are the norm when it comes to cloning.
Less than 3 to 5 percent of cloned animal embryos survive.
In fact, it took more than 270 tries before scientists were able to clone Dolly.
Despite these risks, a March 28 Oversight and Investigations Subcommittee hearing demonstrated that there are fringe groups who intend to clone human beings without regard to the consequence of such activities.
I think that most people on this panel would agree that the risk associated with human reproductive cloning far outweigh any potential benefits, and that this kind of activity should be banned.
That much is evident as both of the bills we're considering ban human cloning for reproductive purposes.
However, there is another side to cloning, therapeutic cloning, which holds great promise for the treatment of a range of diseases such as diabetes, heart disease, organ failure, spinal cord injury, and Parkinson's disease.
Many members of the scientific community believe that in order to unlock these mysteries, we must perform research on cloned human embryos.
That is where these two bills depart.
Mr. Chairman, no one in this room knows any degree of certainty whether cloning research will achieve the goals it has promised, but we will never know the full potential of this technology if we stop it in its tracks.
Rather than throwing up an arbitrary roadblock on these scientific avenues, as one of these bills does, we should proceed with caution.
And I hope the committee will consider all of the elements before we pass legislation which could have a chilling effect on research for treatments of some of our most dreaded diseases.
Thank you, and I yield back my time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair thanks the gentleman and will ask for the statement of Mr. Pitts.
Mr. PITTS.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you for convening this important hearing today on the issue of human cloning.
As science rapidly advances in our Nation and our world, we, as legislators, are faced with ethical dilemmas as we attempt to make sure that our world doesn't begin to resemble Huxley's ``Brave New World.''
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 17 While we want to encourage lifesaving, scientific advances, we must not let science advance in a moral vacuum.
Americans agree.
In fact, in a poll by Time/CNN in March of this year, 90 percent of those polled opposed human cloning.
While there is agreement that we must ban cloning, there is disagreement on the best way to do this.
And today, we will hear testimony on two, radically different approaches to banning cloning.
The Greenwood bill would place a 10-year moratorium on implanting a cloned embryo in a woman's uterus.
The Weldon bill would ban both the creation of a cloned embryo and the implantation of a cloned embryo.
Regardless of whether members are pro-choice or pro-life, it can be argued that the only effective way to ban cloning is the way it is done in the Weldon bill.
For example, if there were only a ban on implanting a cloned embryo, what happens when one of the cloned embryos is implanted in a woman's uterus, which we know could occur at some point? Would the woman be taken into custody and forced to have an abortion? Regardless of the moral issues that some of us have with the Greenwood approach of creating life for the explicit purpose of research and then destroying it, I simply believe that this approach of only banning implantation is completely unenforceable.
Roe v. Wade, the Supreme Court decision, guarantees women the right to choose.
I can't imagine that supporters of Roe, or anyone else for that matter, would force a woman who has had a cloned embryo implanted in her uterus to have an abortion.
This is not China.
Another determination that needs to be made when we consider these young, living, human embryos is do they have the quality of people or property? If they are property, then we can do with them what we wish, including research, experimentation, destruction.
If they have the quality of people, although very tiny, very young, live human beings, they should not be created for experimentation and destruction and harvesting, no matter how sophisticated or therapeutic or regenerative.
As someone has said previously, human cloning is immoral.
Are we going to permit the creation of a whole new class of human beings just for research, experimentation, harvesting, and destruction? So, I fear the outcome of anything less than a complete ban on cloning, both embryonic and reproductive, would result in cloned human beings in America actually being implanted and being born.
I look forward to hearing the testimony from our distinguished panel of witnesses today.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair thanks the gentleman.
Mr. Barrett for an opening statement? Mr. BARRETT.
Thank you very much, Mr Chairman.
I will be brief.
I want to thank you for convening this hearing.
I think that previous members from both sides of the aisle and both sides of this issue have pointed to the thorny nature of the debate that we face today.
And I--rather than expounding on what may or may not happen, I am frankly looking forward to hearing from the--from the dif- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 18 ferent witnesses to see what the administration's viewpoint is, and what the various other members of the panel have to offer.
So, I would yield back the balance of my time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
I thank the gentleman.
Let the record show that Ms. Wilson and Mr. Buyer are present, and have waived an opening statement.
And even though she is not a member of this subcommittee, Ms. DeGette has requested the opportunity to make a brief opening statement, and the Chair now recognizes her.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
And it is really good to be back with my colleagues, even just for a brief moment.
At the Oversight and Investigations hearing we held in March, all of us were horrified, collectively, at the testimony of experts in animal cloning who talked about the results that we don't hear about in the media with Dolly and so on, but the failed results and the grotesque results that came from animal cloning.
And we agreed, collectively, that cloning--human cloning was immoral, and that human cloning was impractical and should not occur.
What is--we were also equally horrified at the cavalier attitude of some of the proponents of human cloning who testified at that hearing.
And we were all shocked about their complete lack of understanding about the moral, ethical, and physical implications of attempting human cloning.
And so, I welcome legislation to ban cloning.
But at the same time, we need to understand what so many of my colleagues have talked about today here.
Increased understanding about the human genome, as well as the rapid advancement of technology, have prompted significant controversy about the possible application of cloning techniques of humans and whether there are appropriate applications.
The Greenwood-Deutsch bill prevents the abuses of human cloning while, at the same time, allowing for appropriate continued research in an area of science that holds answers, answers which could affect the lives of millions of Americans who are affected by so many diseases, as we have heard, from diabetes to Alzheimers to Parkinson's to different kinds of paralysis, and on, and on.
Therapeutic cloning, if appropriately done and if it is matched with appropriate safeguards, can hold so many of the keys that it would be irresponsible for Congress to pass legislation which would not allow this very targeted type of research to continue.
And so, Mr. Chairman, I thank you for having this hearing, and I also would caution my colleagues; we must be very careful.
We cannot pass a bill simply because it seems politically expedient.
Too many lives of Americans are at risk.
And we need to be very careful that while we are banning human cloning, we also don't stop research that will benefit so many millions of Americans.
With that, I yield back the balance of my time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
I think the gentlelady.
That completes opening statements.
As I had said earlier, the opening statements of all members of the subcommittee are made a part of the record.
[Additional statements submitted for the record follow:] VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 19 PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. ED FROM THE WHITFIELD, A REPRESENTATIVE STATE OF KENTUCKY IN C ONGRESS Thank you Mr. Chairman.
The debate on human cloning represents one of the most controversial and important issues facing our nation and society today.
Rapid advances in biotechnology have transformed what was only recently an abstract hypothetical question into a very tangible and pressing legislative problem.
The American people look to their representatives in Washington for leadership and careful deliberation on the subject of human cloning.
As a Committee, we are charged to reach a conclusion that will preserve the sanctity and uniqueness of human life without impeding important biomedical research that promises to improve the health of millions of Americans.
While both the Weldon-Stupak and Greenwood-Deutsch bills explicitly ban the cloning of human beings, their differing approaches attempt to resolve the predicament using varying degrees of restriction.
H.R. 2172 seeks to prevent those who clone human embryos from implanting them in a surrogate mother.
What are we to make of the discussion today? Some patient groups want cloned embryos to be created because their tissue may prove to be valuable in biomedical research.
Some companies would like to clone human embryos because it will lead to a cheaper way to manufacture tissue.
Writing in 1947, C.S. Lewis observed in ``The Abolition of Man'' that man's conquest of nature would be complete when he finally, and I quote him because I think this kind of says it, ``has obtained full control over himself.
Human nature will be the last part of nature to surrender to man.
The battle will then be won.
We shall have taken the threat of life out of the hand of Cloe, and be henceforth free to make our species whatever we wish it to be.
The battle will, indeed, be won.
But who, precisely, would have won it? For the power of man to make himself what he pleases means, as we have seen, the power of some men to make other men what they please.''
Human cloning rises to the most essential question of who we are and what we might become if we open this Pandora's box.
I look forward to the testimony of our witnesses who will help us understand just what might be in that box.
The Chair now yields to Mr. Brown.
Mr. BROWN.
Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman, and thank you for calling this hearing.
I want to thank our witnesses, Mr. Allen especially, for testifying before us.
I also want to thank my colleagues, Mr. Deutsch and Mr. Greenwood, Ms. DeGette, Mr. Stupak, and Mr. Weldon for their tireless work on this extraordinarily complicated issue.
The issue today is not about whether to ban the cloning of a human being, but how to ban cloning in a way that--that best serves society.
Cloning grabbed the spotlight in 1997, as we know, with the cloning of the sheep Dolly in Scotland.
This remarkable breakthrough in science was followed by public scrutiny and largely fear.
How far away was the science to clone humans? President Clinton and the Congress responded immediately.
The President issued a memorandum to the heads of all executive departments and agencies, making it clear that no Federal funds would be used for cloning.
Several bills were introduced banning human cloning research and banning human cloning altogether.
And now, 4 years after scientists developed Dolly, Congress has remained divided on what we think is the most appropriate way to ban the cloning of humans.
I want to first thank Mr. Stupak, my colleague, for his work on this issue.
While I may not favor his approach, I respect his views on this difficult topic.
Congressman Deutsch and Congressman Greenwood have introduced legislation that I believe is a responsible approach to banning cloning without restricting promising research.
Like the Weldon-Stupak bill, the Greenwood-Deutsch bill bans human so- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 3 matic cell nuclear transfer, the technique used for cloning, with the intent to initiate a pregnancy.
But in regards to the scope of this bill, their bill protects all other types of cloning, including therapeutic embryo cloning.
As the biotech industry will attest to, we are dramatically close to providing cures and treatment for a wide variety of illnesses, such as Parkinson's, and Alzheimers, and spinal cord injury, and heart disease, and diabetes, and kidney disease, and stroke.
Additionally, with the type--this type of research, it is possible, medical researchers and scientists tell us, that we could virtually eliminate the need for organ transplants and toxic immuno-suppressive drugs.
In terms of preventing human cloning, banning all science related to human cloning is no more effective than banning the act of human cloning itself.
It would be irresponsible of this Congress, I believe, to stifle promising medical research under the auspices of banning human cloning.
What is at risk if we close the door to this type of research? The ability to regenerate a failing organ, rather than waiting for a transplant and then hoping the body won't reject that organ? The ability to stop the onset of juvenile diabetes so a young child doesn't have to endure injections 3, 4, 5 times a day? The ability to restore the nervous system for an accident victim left paralyzed? The ability to reverse forms of muscular dystrophy which rob children of full mobility and, all to often, tragically, rob them of their adulthood? Too much is at risk to stop the research before its potential is fully understood.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
And I thank the gentleman.
And I would ask the members to try to limit their opening statements to as close to 3 minutes as they possibly can.
Mr. Stearns for an opening statement? You do have seniority, you know? Mr. STEARNS.
Mr. Chairman, I bow to your wisdom, and seniority, and good sense, and I appreciate the opportunity to give my opening statement.
I introduced in the 105th and 106th Congress my own legislation to prohibit Federal funding for the cloning of human beings.
The bill I introduced is H.R. 1372, and it also calls for an international ban on human cloning.
I am also a co-sponsor of H.R. 1644, introduced by my colleague, Mr. Weldon and Mr. Stupak of Michigan.
The quotation you used for C.S. Lewis, ``Abolition of Man,'' is terrific.
I don't know if you have read that book, but that book sums up what we are here talking about.
C.S. Lewis was on the leading edge of understanding human rights and the relationship to human beings and his Maker.
Cloning is a form of playing God since it interferes with the natural order of creation.
We should be very cautious on how we address this issue.
Besides the obvious moral implications, there are several other compelling reasons why we should not be cloning human beings.
By far, however, the most compelling is that man lacks the ability to predict or control the possible consequences of cloning.
The Boys from Brazil, do you remember that movie? That movie would VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 4 no longer be fiction.
We are actually living in a world where the cloning of human beings is a very real possibility.
Ever since the world was made aware of Dolly and then the infamous Dr. Seed and the possibility of cloning human beings, significant actions have been taken to outlaw this practice.
As we all know, former President Clinton called for a ban on the use of Federal funds for research on cloning of human beings, and President Bush supports a total ban on cloning, I believe legislation to ban Federal funding on human cloning is necessary.
And the European Convention on Human Rights and Bio-Medicine, covering not just the European Union, but all European states, has already outlawed this practice.
Currently in the United States, four States prohibit cloning, and eight more States have legislation pending to ban human cloning.
Let us take a look, my friends, at the California law.
It imposes a 5-year moratorium on cloning of an entire human being.
The word ``entire'' is key because some of us consider an embryo to be a human being.
That is why we must be very cautious in the terminology that is used because you will hear the words, not for reproductive purposes, being used frequently in debates about cloning.
That is just one of the many problems associated with technology that may be used to close humans.
At least seven States have bans to prohibit transferring the nuclei from a human cell and a human egg.
But that doesn't address the possibility of transferring a human nucleus into a nonhuman egg.
But that is not the only loophole.
Seven States' proposals ban the creation of genetically identical individuals, but that leaves another loophole.
An egg cell, donated for cloning, has its own mytochondrial DNA, which is different from the mytochondrial DNA of the cell that provided the nucleus.
The clone will, therefore, not truly be identical.
There are many issues raised by the possibility of cloning humans, including the medical risks that are inherent in such procedures.
These risks should cause great alarm for each of us this morning.
In 1998, the Farm Animal Welfare Council of the United Kingdom Minister of Agriculture called for a moratorium on commercial uses of animal cloning because of serious welfare problems encountered when animal species have been cloned.
So, to attempt such a technique on humans, which has caused deformities, large fetuses, and premature deaths in sheep and cattle is not being responsible.
Let us not forget that it took 273 tries to develop a Dolly.
That begs a question: what about the other 272 animals? Most of them were either aborted, destroyed, or maimed.
Obviously, we do not want to do this to human beings.
There are also compelling and serious ethical and moral implications involved with the cloning of humans.
Theologians-- theologians and ethicists have raised three broad objections.
Cloning humans could lead to a new eugenics movement where, even if cloning begins with a benign purpose, it could lead to the establishment of scientific categories of superior and inferior people.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 5 Cloning is a form of playing God since it interferes with the natural order of creation, and cloning could have long-term effects that are unknown at this time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Would the gentleman finish up? The time has expired.
Mr. STEARNS.
People have a right to their own identity and their own genetic make-up.
And so, Mr. Chairman, I look forward to our distinguished panels and hearing their answers.
[The prepared statement of Hon. Cliff Stearns follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON.
CLIFF STEARNS, A REPRESENTATIVE IN FROM THE STATE OF FLORIDA CONGRESS Thank you, Chairman Bilirakis, for holding this important hearing on legislation to ban the cloning of human beings.
Because I felt so strongly about this issue I introduced legislation in the 105th and 106th Congresses to prohibit federal funding for the cloning of human beings.
I reintroduced this legislation in this Congress.
The bill is H.R. 1372 and also calls for an international ban on human cloning.
I am also a cosponsor of H.R. 1644, introduced by my colleague from Florida, Mr. Weldon and Mr. Stupak of Michigan.
Cloning is a form of playing God since it interferes with the natural order of creation.
We should be very cautious in how we address this issue.
Besides the obvious moral implications, there are several other compelling reasons why we should not be cloning humans.
By far, however, the most compelling is that man lacks the ability to predict or control the possible consequences of cloning.
The Boys from Brazil is no longer fiction.
We are actually living in a world where the cloning of humans is a possibility.
Ever since the world was made aware of Dolly, and then the infamous Dr. Seed and the possibility of cloning human beings, significant actions have been taken to outlaw this practice.
As we all know, former President Clinton issued a memorandum calling for a ban on the use of federal funds for research on cloning of human beings and the European Convention on Human Rights and Biomedicine, covering not just the EU, but all European states has already outlawed this practice.
President Bush and Secretary Thompson oppose the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer either for reproductive purposes or for therapeutic purposes.
Even though President Clinton called for the prohibition of federal funds for cloning of human beings and President Bush supports a total ban on human cloning, I believe legislation to ban federal funding of research on humans is necessary.
Currently, in the United States four states prohibit cloning and eight more states have legislation pending to ban human cloning.
Let's take a look at the California law.
It imposes a five-year moratorium on cloning of an entire human being.
The word entire is key because some of us consider an embryo to be a human being.
That is why we must be very cautious in the terminology that is used because you will hear the words not for reproductive purposes being used frequently in debates about cloning.
That is just one of many problems associated with technology that may be used to clone humans.
At least seven states have bans to prohibit transferring the nucleus from a human cell into a human egg, but that doesn't address the possibility of transferring a human nucleus into a ``nonhuman egg.''
But, that is not the only loophole.
Seven state proposals ban the creation of ``genetically identical'' individuals, but that leaves another loophole.
``An egg cell donated for cloning has its own mitochondrial DNA, which is different from the mitrochondrial DNA of the cell that provided the nucleus.
The `clone' will therefore not be truly identical.''
There are many issues raised by the possibility of cloning humans, including the medical risks that are inherent in such procedures.
These risks should cause great alarm for each and every one of us.
In 1998 the Farm Animal Welfare Council of the UK Minister of Agriculture called for a moratorium on commercial uses of animal cloning because of serious welfare problems encountered when animal species have been cloned.
So, to attempt such a technique on humans, which has caused deformities, large fetuses and premature deaths in sheep and cattle is the height of irresponsibility.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 6 Let's not forget that it took 273 tries to develop Dolly.
That begs the question, what about the other 272 animals? Most of them were either aborted.
destroyed, or maimed.
Obviously, we do not want to do this with human beings.
There are also compelling and serious ethical and moral implications involved with cloning of humans.
Theologians and ethicists have raised three broad objections.
Cloning humans could lead to a new eugenics movement, where even if cloning begins with a benign purpose, it could lead to the establishment of ``scientific'' categories of superior and inferior people.
Cloning is a form of playing God since it interferes with the natural order of creation.
Cloning could have long-term effects that are unknown and harmful.
People have a right to their own identity and their own genetic makeup, which should not be replicated.
I look forward to hearing from our distinguished panel of witnesses about this complex and compelling problem.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair recognizes Mr. Waxman for an opening statement.
Mr. WAXMAN.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Today's hearing--hearing involves research that holds a great deal of promise for defeating disease and repairing damaged organs.
The hearing also involves a great deal of confusion, much of it spilling over from the ongoing political debate about abortion.
I hope the hearing--I hope that the hearing can further the research and clear up the confusion.
Let me start that effort by clarifying what we mean by cloning research, because the term means different things to different people.
Some cloning research involves, for example, using genetic material to generate one adult skin cell from another adult skin cell.
I know of no serious opposition to such research.
Some cloning research starts with a human egg cell, inserts a donor complete genetic material into its core, and allows the egg cell to multiply to produce new cells genetically identical to the donor's cells.
These cells can, in theory, be transplanted to be used for organ repair or tissue regeneration without risk of allergic reaction or rejection.
There is controversy about this research, as we will hear today.
Some cloning research starts with a human egg and donated genetic material, but is intended to go further in an effort to create what is essentially a human version of Dolly the sheep, a full-scale, living replica of the donor of the genetic material.
I know of no serious support for such research.
To keep things clear in discussion today, I will use different terms for these three different aspects of cloning research.
The first widely supported field I refer to as tissue generation.
And I understand that some people call it cell-line propagation.
The second controversial field I will refer to as genetic cell replication.
Other call--others call it therapeutic cloning.
And the third unsupported field is widely known as reproductive cloning.
In order to tilt the debate about genetic cell replication research, some opponents lump it with Dolly the sheep.
No one benefits from such confusion.
If some think research is good and others think it is wrong, that dispute should be aired clearly and not blurred by blending subjects or exaggerating claims.
If a field of research is to be prohibited or allowed, we should do so on its merits.
Some also argue to prohibit genetic cell replication research because it might, in the wrong hands, be turned into reproductive cloning research.
I cannot support this argument.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 7 So a--such a prohibition is no more reasonable than to prohibit all clinical trials because researchers might give overdoses deliberately.
It is as much overreaching as prohibiting all organ transplant studies because an unscrupulous person might buy or sell organs for profit.
All research can be misused.
That is why we regulate research, investigate abuse of subjects, and prosecute scientific fraud and misconduct.
If researchers give drug overdoses in clinical trials, the law requires they be disbarred and punished.
If someone were to traffic an organ, the law requires they be prosecuted.
We should clearly define what we believe is wrongdoing, prohibit it, and enforce that prohibition.
But we should not shut down beneficial work, clinical trials, organ transplants, or genetic cell replication because of a risk of wrongdoing.
In closing, I want to acknowledge that principled people do differ in this area.
Some believe that a fertilized egg, whether it is inside a womb or inside a test-tube, is the same as a human being.
They are logically consistent when they oppose genetic cell replication.
They are also logically opposed to abortion, to in vitro fertilization as it is generally practiced, and to some methods of family planning.
I don't question their sincerity, but I sincerely do not agree with them.
And I do not believe that the Congress should prohibit potentially lifesaving research on genetic cell replication because it accords a cell, a special cell, but only a cell, the same rights and protections as a person.
I look forward to hearing from the witnesses today.
Thank you very much for holding these hearings.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
And I thank the gentleman.
Mr. Greenwood for an opening statement? Mr. GREENWOOD.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I do particularly appreciate your holding this hearing.
The humorist and social critic H.L. Mencken once wryly observed that, ``For every complex problem, there is a solution that is simple, neat, and wrong.''
Today, this committee has before it two competing bills to outlaw the cloning of human beings.
Mr. Weldon's bill, H.R. 1644, while commendable in its intent, suffers from the weight of Mr. Menschen's observation.
It is a simple and straightforward solution to a very complex matter of science, but it is, unfortunately, wrong.
It seeks to ban all forms of cloning which involve the use of the cells of human beings.
The measure which Mr. Deutsch and I--the measure which Mr. Deutsch and I have introduced, however, while perhaps failing the simplicity test, does confront the need to provide a sophisticated solution to a complex problem.
The admonition we try to follow is the one which Einstein recommended: ``Everything should be made as simple as possible, but not simpler.''
Esentially, our bill would seek to outlaw all attempts at reproductive human cloning, while permitting further and very carefully circumscribed research in the areas of somatic cell nuclear transfer, VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 8 a process that holds out a very real promise of a new kind of therapy known as regenerative medicine.
Briefly, this promising therapy would replace damaged or dead cells with healthy, and vigorous, new, and transplantable cells, thereby enabling physicians to treat millions of those who now suffer from chronic diseases, such as diabetes, stroke, heart disease, Parkinson's disease, and spinal cord injury.
This is about allowing people who are in coma to open their eyes, and stand up, and return to their family.
This is about allowing people who are paralyzed, quadriplegics, to walk again.
That is what is at stake here.
I have had an opportunity to review the written testimony of our distinguished panel of witnesses here today, and I believe it is fair to say that while all of them oppose reproductive cloning, not all are convinced that cloning research is without merit.
Indeed, two of our scholars will testify that their support of Mr. Weldon's bill is more a matter of public policy; one might even say politics, rather than good science.
Simply stated, it would appear that they do not think that reproductive cloning can be effectively banned once the research genie has been let out of the bottle.
But that approach still begs the question I asked in my opening remarks at our first hearing on cloning earlier this year.
The question this generation must ask is this: what should we do with this science? We must not only address the problems that come about from the use of the technology, but the foregone opportunities, cures for diseases, ailments, and illnesses that may be lost.
Should we entirely ban this technology? And I reject the premise that we are unable to distinguish between the dangers of untrammeled scientific experiments on the one hand, and new paradigms in biomedical research on the other.
We owe it to ourselves and our posterity to have more faith in our ability to guide and direct human conduct than this cramped approach would allow.
One of our witnesses, though not himself a scientist, asserts that any form of research into therapeutic cloning is, ``as morally abhorrent as it is medically questionable.''
His objection is that embryonic cells are, in actuality, ``new, living human beings.''
Even if we were to accept this premise, which I do not, what are we to make of in vitro fertilization? Each year, thousands, if not hundreds of thousands, of human embryos are discarded.
Should this process, too, be outlawed? Shouldn't this practice also be construed as morally repugnant given the witness's definition? And make no mistake; in vitro fertilization is not free of very complex and difficult, moral, ethical, and legal controversies.
Issues of third-party donations of sperm or eggs, surrogate mothers, embryo division, sex selection of children, genetic testing, and potential genetic engineering, even rights of ownership, all are present in this practice.
But here, as one of our other witnesses recently pointed out, dogma is overcome by human desire.
For while some clergy may condemn in vitro fertilization, 75 percent of the American people favor the practice as a means for a loving couple to bring a child into the world.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 9 Then, there is the reality of the old-fashioned method of reproduction that we call sex.
It is simply not true in the human body that every time an egg and sperm are joined human life begins.
On the contrary, quite frequently the embryo fails to attach to the uterine wall and is flushed out of a woman's body.
What are we to make of this, when the largest loss of embryos is a result of the natural order of things human? Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Would the gentleman please finish up? The time is---- Mr. GREENWOOD.
Mr. Chairman, I would ask unanimous consent for an additional 1 minute to complete my opening statement? Mr. BILIRAKIS.
We are getting away from that 3-minute thing that I asked---- Mr. GREENWOOD.
Well, Mr. Chairman, since it is my bill, I wondered if I could just have this indulgence? Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Without objection, it will---- Mr. GREENWOOD.
Thank you.
Mr. BILIRAKIS. [continuing] be the case.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
In making this observation, I do not mean to be glib.
On the contrary, I wish to admonish all of us that we should exercise great care when we make pronouncements about a mystery as deep as the creation of human life.
The question about when life begins is too profound to be settled here today.
And in any case, this is not what this hearing is about.
And if we cannot all agree on when life begins, we can all of us: Christian, Muslin, and Jew agree to this, I think, that every child is a new idea in the mind of God, and that this is now, and will be forever, the essence of humanity.
Using this definition, human clones would be replicates, the human equivalent of an epilogue.
This is where I choose to draw the line.
I oppose it; it must be outlawed.
And where there is a risk of some morally bankrupt charlatan pursuing reproductive cloning, we must make it abundantly clear that that man or woman is a pariah, even as we embrace the child who may be born of such an effort.
But make no mistake; the wistful hope of some of today's witnesses that in outlawing every aspect of cloning, we will somehow eliminate attempts to accomplish human cloning is a little more than whistling in the dark.
And I hope that they will forgive me when I observe that by embracing a universal ban on cloning, it is they who would be guilty of throwing the baby out with the bath.
The philosopher Arthur Schopenhaeur observed that, ``All truth passes through three stages.
First, it is ridiculed.
Second, it is violently opposed.
Third, it is accepted as being self-evident.''
I believe that this is precisely what occurred in the case of in vitro fertilization, and I believe we will look back upon this hearing today and recall that the same was true of the remarkable medical breakthroughs made possible by therapeutic cloning.
In 1846 when the Scottish physician, James Simpson, urged the use of chloroform to reduce the---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Mr. Greenwood, I am sorry, but you are 2 minutes over, sir.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
Very well.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 10 Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Mr. Deutsch for an opening statement? Mr. DEUTSCH.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I would ask the members of the that they would accept my written statement in full into the record.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Without objection, that will be the case for every member of the subcommittee.
Mr. DEUTSCH.
I would like the chairman and ranking member for holding a second hearing on this important and complex subject.
I understand that this is a powerful issue with many points of view to be heard and discussed.
I hope that members listen carefully to the testimony of our witnesses, and use this opportunity to better understand the scientific and ethical issues surrounding human cloning.
Our actions today when proceed with these bills will have a profound effect on the future of scientific discovery and the health and welfare of our constituents.
We have a responsibility to proceed in a thoughtful and considerate manner that acknowledges the future benefits of scientific research, while accepting and protecting against the current flaws in the cloning process.
Mr. Chairman, I believe it is fair to say that no one sitting on this stage thinks we should allow reproductive cloning at this point in time.
The process has clearly been shown to be imprecise and dangerous.
Of the animals that have been cloned to date, none have been free of abnormalities.
The great majority of cloned animals die at birth or soon after.
Those that survive often suffer from kidney, brain, or immune system abnormalities.
Even Dolly the sheep, successfully cloned only after more than 270 attempts, suffered some severe obesity.
With these apparent risks, though highly prevalent in animals, it is imperative that we ban reproductive cloning and that we devote appropriate resources to upholding this ban
.
That being said, it is clear there are significant benefits to be derived from therapeutic cloning, as several of our witnesses will testify.
Since our last hearing on the subject in March, I have worked closely with Congressman Greenwood to develop legislation that we believe protects the public from the precarious and uncertain nature of reproductive cloning, while preserving promising biomedical research.
Specifically, the Greenwood-Deutsch legislation bans the use of human somatic cell and nuclear transfer with the intent to initiate a pregnancy, and imposes severe criminal and civil sanctions on any person or company that breaks this law.
This language is the guts and substance of our legislation.
However, we have purposefully drawn a bright line in the bill between reproductive cloning and therapeutic cloning.
Our legislation specifically protects the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer to clone molecules, DNA, cells, or tissues.
This is one of the most promising areas of research for diseases like Alzheimers, Parkinson's, and diabetics--diabetes, just to name a few.
To ban therapeutic cloning, as the Weldon-Stupak legislation does, would be a travesty for the millions of people in our country whose lives are affected on a daily basis by these devastating conditions.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 11 I won't go into detail of the myriad of cures and treatments that therapeutic cloning could provide, as Dr. Okarma and Mr. Perry will more than adequately make this point with their testimony.
I only emphasize the importance of understanding the clear distinction between reproductive cloning, which we need to unequivocally ban, and therapeutic--therapeutic cloning, which we unequivocally need to protect.
As we have moved toward this hearing, there have been questions raised by supporters of the Weldon-Stupak bill about the ability of our bill to effectively eliminate reproductive cloning without banning the creation of cloned embryos.
Let me state now that I am committing to working to tighten and amend the legislation to ensure it fits our intended policy objectives.
However, I believe there are inherent flaws in the logic of some of these issues that were raised with the Greenwood-Deutsch legislation.
For instance, a recent ``Dear Colleague'' issued by Dr. Weldon implies there is no way to enforce a ban on transferring a cloned embryo to a woman's uterus if there is no ban on creating those embryos.
My response to Dr. Weldon's concern is, how will you enforce your ban on creating cloned embryos? One benefit of the Greenwood-Deutsch legislation is that it prospectively addressees the enforcement issue by requiring all entities that plan on performing human somatic cell nuclear transfer to register with the FDA.
That registration will contain an attestment they are aware of the prohibition on reproductive cloning and will not engage in any violation of that prohibition.
Additionally, by specifically stating in the legislation that it is a crime to intend to use human somatic cell nuclear transfer to initiate a pregnancy, our bill allows the FDA to intervene in a potential reproductive cloning scenario even prior to the creation of a cloned embryo.
The Weldon-Stupak legislation forces the FDA to delay intervention until an embryo has been cloned.
I would like to address one final issue before I wrap up my statement.
One of those issues that neither bill addresses is that--the products derived from therapeutic cloning.
If the Weldon-Stupak legislation passes and therapeutic cloning is banned in the United States, there is no doubt that bio-tech companies will simply move off-shore and continue their research elsewhere.
The question we are then faced with is, will we also ban the potential lifesaving product as the result of this off-shore--off-shore therapeutic cloning? Will we deny our constituents access to these phenomenal products? If we deem therapeutic cloning to be unethical, how can we possibly reverse course and reap the benefits of off-shore research? This is a question for another time, but it is one that I think members should be aware of as they contemplate the effects of our actions on future discoveries.
In closing, I would like to again caution members against making a quick decision on this issue.
There are obviously many points of view to be considered, and our witnesses today will add significant substance to this debate.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 12 However, we are essentially debating a single tradeoff: it is more important to enact a broad ban---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Please finish up.
Mr. DEUTSCH. [continuing] that would prohibit research, or should we spend a little extra enforcement to narrow a ban on reproductive cloning while allowing lifesaving research to continue? I ask the members to keep that in mind as we proceed.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Dr. Ganske for an opening statement.
Mr. GANSKE.
Thanks, Mr. Chairman.
I will be brief.
Cloning a human being is immoral, period.
I believe there is wide-spread, bipartisan agreement on that.
Some people sort of shrug their shoulders and say, ``Well, somebody is going to clone a human being.
What can you do about it?'' I say we rise up in moral outrage and that we pass laws, both in this country and internationally, to prevent the cloning of a human being.
We need to look carefully at the total issue.
There are some who would say we should not allow stem-cell research.
There are some that would say we shouldn't allow any ``cloning'' at all.
And Mr. Chairman, I remember years ago, when I was taking care of a little boy who had a 95 percent burn over his entire body, and it was one of the first uses of cell lines that were grown from that little boy.
Now, under some definitions, that could be termed a cloning, a product to create those sheet of epithelium that were used.
As we look at this issue, let us agree, no cloning of human beings, and let us also look very closely at the language of any legislation so that we do not prevent the ability to effectively treat certain disease conditions.
And with that, I yield back.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Thank you, gentleman.
Mr. Stupak? Mr. STUPAK.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you for holding this very important and timely hearing.
I think it is obvious which bill I support, H.R. 1644, the Weldon-Stupak Human Cloning Prohibition Act of 2001.
H.R. 1644 amends the U.S. Criminal Code to ban the creation of cloned human embryos for research or reproductive purposes.
What our bill would do is to prohibit performing, or attempting to perform, human cloning; participating in an attempt to perform human cloning; shipping or receiving the product of human cloning for any purpose; and importing the product of human cloning for any purpose.
It draws a very bright line as to what activities are specifically prohibited.
Many people have attempted to paint this bill as handcuffing the bio-technology and bio-research efforts currently underway.
The truth is, there is no cloned human embryo testing going on.
And so, the arguments we will hear against this bill today will be conjecture at best; as in, we think this may happen, but we are not sure.
Well, Mr. Chairman, I would like the researchers to be a bit more sure before they begin creating human clones.
The Weldon-Stupak bill intentionally steers clear of issues such as animal cloning, in vitro fertilization or IVF, and allows cloning VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 13 techniques to produce DNA, cells other than human embryos, tissues, and plants.
It also stays clear from stem cell research because, and I want to make this point very clear, stem cell research is being done on existing embryos at IVF clinics.
The Weldon-Stupak bill does not prohibit this type of research on existing human embryos that are already slated for destruction.
Therefore, stem cell research can and will go on.
This is not a Republic versus Democrat issue.
H.R. 1644 reflects that.
Currently, we have 105 co-sponsors, 19 of which are Democrats, much more bipartisan than any other cloning bill.
Some people have painted this bill as a pro-life vehicle.
This is not true.
I would like to point out the United Methodist Church has endorsed the Weldon-Stupak bill, as well as our witness today, pro-choice advocate, Judy Norsigian.
H.R. 1644 is an ethical bill about an ethical, moral, and legal problem.
And I am proud that is able to reach across the divisive pro-life/pro-choice lines.
Another point that will be brought up in today's hearings by procloning advocates will be what is called therapeutic research.
Briefly, these advocates say that cloning of human embryos is essential for organ transplant.
To explain, let us say I have a faulty heart.
Pro-cloning researchers will say, ``Let me clone myself, using an embryo, exact my own stem cells within to grow new heart cells to replace the damaged.
Then, implant these cells.''
This will, so the theory goes, cut down on transplant rejection and cut down on the brutal immuno-suppressive drugs.
My question is, why not clone my heart cells and cut out on the uncertain step of directing embryonic stem cells to become heart cells? Finally, some have mentioned their concern with the lack of a sunset date, thus forever ruling out human embryo cloning.
This is not true.
The Weldon-Stupak bill has a provision that directs scientists to come back to us when they feel that can make an--when they feel they can make a strong case for human embryo cloning.
This puts the burden of proof on the researchers, which is where it should be.
One last distinction between our bill and the other human cloning bills: our bill bans a specific act.
The Greenwood-Deutsch bill, for example, bans intent, a much more blurred standard.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I look forward to the testimony of our witnesses, and I welcome Mr. Allen, the Deputy Secretary of HHS.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair thanks the gentleman.
Dr. Norwood for an opening statement? Mr. NORWOOD.
Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman, and I will try to get you back on schedule.
I will be brief.
Let me say to Mr. Allen, we are delighted you are here.
And I thank you very much, Mr. Chairman, for holding this hearing.
I am really here today to listen.
What was once considered science fiction now has become a reality, human cloning.
And with that reality comes the ability to discover new treatments and treatments for conditions and diseases, perhaps even ways of preventing them from occurring at all.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 14 I believe that we should move cautiously in considering any legislation that would arbitrarily close the door on important avenues of research.
Now, we have two bills before us, and I am a co-sponsor of the Weldon-Stupak bill.
But I admit, I am also very interested in the approach Mr. Greenwood has taken.
I believe that we need to give these bills great scrutiny to make sure that we understand all the potential consequences of both bills.
Again, Mr. Chairman, I thank you for holding this hearing.
I commend you for your efforts to further examine this issue of cloning, and I look forward to hearing from our witnesses today, and would gladly yield back the balance of my time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
And I thank the gentleman for that.
Mr. Strickland for an opening statement? Mr. STRICKLAND.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. Chairman, I woke up this morning, thinking about a young man in my district who is in his late 20's who, in his early 20's, had a serious car accident, and is unable to even breathe on his own.
He has 24-hour care.
He has back-up power in case the electricity would fail so that he could continue to breathe.
That young man, I hope someday, will have hope that he, and others like him, will no longer be required to spend his entire life in bed, being cared for by others.
I was thinking of him because I knew I was coming to this hearing, and I knew that what we were going to be talking about this morning was very important.
I absolutely agree with what Dr. Norwood just said.
We should be very careful that we not close the door, at least at this stage of our knowledge, on efforts to advance science and medicine.
We are opposed to the cloning of human beings.
But we need to be very careful; and I hope we, as a committee, will be very, very careful, that we not allow theology or philosophy or politics to interfere with the decisions that we make here, but that we make sure that the decisions we make are based upon sound science.
I am a United Methodist.
My friend, Mr. Stupak, is a Roman Catholic.
But I think neither of us can allow our churches to tell us how to respond to this issue.
I am not--I am not implying that that is true of either of us, but I do believe that there is a danger with this issue of allowing it to get caught up in matters which are apart from science and our responsibilities as Representatives to support sound science.
I haven't made up my mind on which bill I am going to support, but I am convinced that what we are doing today is important and vital, and it will ultimately affect huge numbers of the American people.
And for that reason, we ought to approach it with the utmost seriousness of purpose.
Thank you, and I yield back my time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
And I thank the gentleman.
Mr. Bryant for an opening statement? Mr. BRYANT.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I have been sitting over here, making notes and deciding whether I want to give an opening statement or not, and trying to move things along.
And I thought I could echo and join in my--my good colleague from Michigan's statement, Mr. Stupak.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 15 And I certainly agree with him 100 percent, and I thought I could end it right there.
But as I continue to hear some of the statements about--being made about this research and the need for it, which I don't quarrel with that, and I don't quarrel with these many, many difficult circumstances, these terrible cases where people have been hurt or--or have diseases; and certainly somewhere down the road, perhaps research can discover a cure or something to help them.
And we all support that.
Those are terrible cases.
But we do look at things like theology, and philosophy, and even politics, up here on everything we do.
We operate in a world not purely humanistic, not just on science.
We draw lines all the time out there.
We don't let prisoners sell their organs, or anybody, for that matter, sell their organs.
We don't require prisoners to give up organs because they are in prison.
We don't grow people.
We don't create people for organ harvesting and things like that, and other body parts.
We don't kill seniors, at least yet, for lack of a quality of life and things like that.
So, I think we operate in a bigger world than simply sound science.
There is no question sound science plays a role in so many things.
But yet, when you are dealing with such deep, moral issues, for many of us who do have a clear definition of where we think life begins, I think you could find people that could say anything about that.
Some say at the beginning, when the sperm meets the egg, perhaps now survivability and with the technology that we have got to keep these little premature babies alive, you know, when is that? The law in my State, in Tennessee, in civil cases is viability.
And some might even say, you can argue through partial-birth abortion, is it doesn't begin until the baby is actually born.
You have got people that will say all kinds of definitions there.
And if I am going to make a mistake on when that life begins, I am going to try and err on the side of life, and give the benefit, the most generous benefit.
Even in our criminal courts today and our law system, people who are sentenced to death have layers of appeal because we give them the benefit of the doubt.
And yet, in situations like this where perhaps we are creating lives there and then destroying those lives, there is no--no one advocating for them.
So, I think there are difficult issues here.
Unquestionably, there are terrible cases that we have to deal with.
We have to have this research.
And I am just optimistic, and hopeful, and encouraged that there are other ways we can get to this research through the tissue replication, as I understand it--I am not a doctor--something short of having to create, in my--in my belief, a life, and then destroy that life to help these very difficult circumstances.
And again, I just--I hope there is another way to do this.
And I am encouraged, and I am glad to have all of the different opinions here today.
I want to listen as much as I can.
We have got schedules for--we are in and out a lot.
But I do--I did feel it necessary to at least respond in part to some of the statements that are being made in--in this regard.
And for that, Mr. Chairman, I thank you again for holding this very important hearing, and I would yield back my time.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 16 Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair certainly thanks him.
Mr. Green for an opening statement? Mr. GREEN.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you for holding the hearing on these two bills which address the controversial issue of human cloning.
Cloning was once the subject of science fiction novels.
Many of us associate cloning with the disturbing notion of designer babies or a human race that is void of individuality or spirit.
And we remember Huxley's ``Brave New World'' and the frightful images it conjured up of genetically manipulated and cloned individuals.
What was once science fiction could become a reality.
In 1997, the cloning of Dolly the sheep opened up all our eyes to the possibility of human cloning.
Human cloning either for therapeutic or reproductive purposes raises a number of ethical concerns that this committee and our Nation must consider.
If animal cloning has taught us anything, it is that cloning has significant risk.
Miscarriages, birth defects, and genetic problems are the norm when it comes to cloning.
Less than 3 to 5 percent of cloned animal embryos survive.
In fact, it took more than 270 tries before scientists were able to clone Dolly.
Despite these risks, a March 28 Oversight and Investigations Subcommittee hearing demonstrated that there are fringe groups who intend to clone human beings without regard to the consequence of such activities.
I think that most people on this panel would agree that the risk associated with human reproductive cloning far outweigh any potential benefits, and that this kind of activity should be banned.
That much is evident as both of the bills we're considering ban human cloning for reproductive purposes.
However, there is another side to cloning, therapeutic cloning, which holds great promise for the treatment of a range of diseases such as diabetes, heart disease, organ failure, spinal cord injury, and Parkinson's disease.
Many members of the scientific community believe that in order to unlock these mysteries, we must perform research on cloned human embryos.
That is where these two bills depart.
Mr. Chairman, no one in this room knows any degree of certainty whether cloning research will achieve the goals it has promised, but we will never know the full potential of this technology if we stop it in its tracks.
Rather than throwing up an arbitrary roadblock on these scientific avenues, as one of these bills does, we should proceed with caution.
And I hope the committee will consider all of the elements before we pass legislation which could have a chilling effect on research for treatments of some of our most dreaded diseases.
Thank you, and I yield back my time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair thanks the gentleman and will ask for the statement of Mr. Pitts.
Mr. PITTS.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you for convening this important hearing today on the issue of human cloning.
As science rapidly advances in our Nation and our world, we, as legislators, are faced with ethical dilemmas as we attempt to make sure that our world doesn't begin to resemble Huxley's ``Brave New World.''
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 17 While we want to encourage lifesaving, scientific advances, we must not let science advance in a moral vacuum.
Americans agree.
In fact, in a poll by Time/CNN in March of this year, 90 percent of those polled opposed human cloning.
While there is agreement that we must ban cloning, there is disagreement on the best way to do this.
And today, we will hear testimony on two, radically different approaches to banning cloning.
The Greenwood bill would place a 10-year moratorium on implanting a cloned embryo in a woman's uterus.
The Weldon bill would ban both the creation of a cloned embryo and the implantation of a cloned embryo.
Regardless of whether members are pro-choice or pro-life, it can be argued that the only effective way to ban cloning is the way it is done in the Weldon bill.
For example, if there were only a ban on implanting a cloned embryo, what happens when one of the cloned embryos is implanted in a woman's uterus, which we know could occur at some point? Would the woman be taken into custody and forced to have an abortion? Regardless of the moral issues that some of us have with the Greenwood approach of creating life for the explicit purpose of research and then destroying it, I simply believe that this approach of only banning implantation is completely unenforceable.
Roe v. Wade, the Supreme Court decision, guarantees women the right to choose.
I can't imagine that supporters of Roe, or anyone else for that matter, would force a woman who has had a cloned embryo implanted in her uterus to have an abortion.
This is not China.
Another determination that needs to be made when we consider these young, living, human embryos is do they have the quality of people or property? If they are property, then we can do with them what we wish, including research, experimentation, destruction.
If they have the quality of people, although very tiny, very young, live human beings, they should not be created for experimentation and destruction and harvesting, no matter how sophisticated or therapeutic or regenerative.
As someone has said previously, human cloning is immoral.
Are we going to permit the creation of a whole new class of human beings just for research, experimentation, harvesting, and destruction? So, I fear the outcome of anything less than a complete ban on cloning, both embryonic and reproductive, would result in cloned human beings in America actually being implanted and being born.
I look forward to hearing the testimony from our distinguished panel of witnesses today.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair thanks the gentleman.
Mr. Barrett for an opening statement? Mr. BARRETT.
Thank you very much, Mr Chairman.
I will be brief.
I want to thank you for convening this hearing.
I think that previous members from both sides of the aisle and both sides of this issue have pointed to the thorny nature of the debate that we face today.
And I--rather than expounding on what may or may not happen, I am frankly looking forward to hearing from the--from the dif- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 18 ferent witnesses to see what the administration's viewpoint is, and what the various other members of the panel have to offer.
So, I would yield back the balance of my time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
I thank the gentleman.
Let the record show that Ms. Wilson and Mr. Buyer are present, and have waived an opening statement.
And even though she is not a member of this subcommittee, Ms. DeGette has requested the opportunity to make a brief opening statement, and the Chair now recognizes her.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
And it is really good to be back with my colleagues, even just for a brief moment.
At the Oversight and Investigations hearing we held in March, all of us were horrified, collectively, at the testimony of experts in animal cloning who talked about the results that we don't hear about in the media with Dolly and so on, but the failed results and the grotesque results that came from animal cloning.
And we agreed, collectively, that cloning--human cloning was immoral, and that human cloning was impractical and should not occur.
What is--we were also equally horrified at the cavalier attitude of some of the proponents of human cloning who testified at that hearing.
And we were all shocked about their complete lack of understanding about the moral, ethical, and physical implications of attempting human cloning.
And so, I welcome legislation to ban cloning.
But at the same time, we need to understand what so many of my colleagues have talked about today here.
Increased understanding about the human genome, as well as the rapid advancement of technology, have prompted significant controversy about the possible application of cloning techniques of humans and whether there are appropriate applications.
The Greenwood-Deutsch bill prevents the abuses of human cloning while, at the same time, allowing for appropriate continued research in an area of science that holds answers, answers which could affect the lives of millions of Americans who are affected by so many diseases, as we have heard, from diabetes to Alzheimers to Parkinson's to different kinds of paralysis, and on, and on.
Therapeutic cloning, if appropriately done and if it is matched with appropriate safeguards, can hold so many of the keys that it would be irresponsible for Congress to pass legislation which would not allow this very targeted type of research to continue.
And so, Mr. Chairman, I thank you for having this hearing, and I also would caution my colleagues; we must be very careful.
We cannot pass a bill simply because it seems politically expedient.
Too many lives of Americans are at risk.
And we need to be very careful that while we are banning human cloning, we also don't stop research that will benefit so many millions of Americans.
With that, I yield back the balance of my time.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
I think the gentlelady.
That completes opening statements.
As I had said earlier, the opening statements of all members of the subcommittee are made a part of the record.
[Additional statements submitted for the record follow:] VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 19 PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. ED FROM THE WHI
The debate on human cloning represents one of the most controversial and important issues facing our nation and society today.
Rapid advances in biotechnology have transformed what was only recently an abstract hypothetical question into a very tangible and pressing legislative problem.
The American people look to their representatives in Washington for leadership and careful deliberation on the subject of human cloning.
As a Committee, we are charged to reach a conclusion that will preserve the sanctity and uniqueness of human life without impeding important biomedical research that promises to improve the health of millions of Americans.
While both the Weldon-Stupak and Greenwood-Deutsch bills explicitly ban the cloning of human beings, their differing approaches attempt to resolve the predicament using varying degrees of restriction.
H.R. 1644 enjoins all research utilizing somatic cell nuclear transfer, prohibiting both reproductive and therapeutic cloning procedures.
In H.R. 2172, however, Reps. Greenwood and Deutsch limit the ban to include only human embryonic cells intended for developing human clones.
Any use of the nuclear transfer technology for purposes other than developing a human clone would remain lawful.
Our challenge is to carefully consider the potential benefits and dangers of human cloning technologies, avoiding any unintended consequences of permitting or banning cloning research.
I look forward to listening to the testimonies of our panel of witnesses and the opinions of my colleagues in order to reach a satisfactory answer to this most difficult question.
PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA CUBIN, A REPRESENTATIVE IN FROM THE STATE OF WYOMING CONGRESS We are fortunate today in that we have many powerful incentives to drive innovation; incentives that on the surface seem less than admirable: money, power, glory, prestige.
I say fortunate however because without the many innovations we have seen over the past decade--in medicine, technology, energy, aerospace and so on, we would not be living as comfortably as we are today.
In fact, some of us might not even be here without the many breakthroughs in medical science.
For that, we should be very grateful.
There is however another aspect to innovative research, one of which we should be particularly mindful.
At what point does research go too far? At what point does research lead us to a place where maybe we shouldn't be? It is herein that lies the controversy.
It seems like we are in a race to understand the great mysteries of life, death, birth, disease, race, time--and the many other unknowns that we face.
In so many ways, discovery has been a blessing to us, especially when it comes to medical science, but sometimes we are in such a hurry to see what we can do that we don't stop long enough to decide whether we should.
One prime example of that is the cloning of human beings.
This process comes dangerously close to wielding one of the most awesome forces in nature.
We haven't the slightest idea what to expect in the aftermath of cloning humans and, quite frankly, I think it is a dangerous proposition with which to play.
I want us to stop and think carefully about what we do in the name of research.
It can be a wonderful thing, but it also demands great responsibility and humility.
As I consider this issue in the grand scheme of things, I cannot support cloning human embryos, and am very concerned about the possibility of cloning these embryos solely for research purposes, only to destroy them later.
That just doesn't hold true to my idea of the spirit and intent of medical research.
I look forward to hearing from our witnesses today, and appreciate the chairman indulging me on this issue.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
And the Chair now welcomes Mr. Allen, with apologies for your sitting there all of this time listening to us talk.
But you are probably relatively accustomed to that.
Mr. Allen is the Deputy Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sir, your written statement, of course, is already a part of the record.
We will set the clock at 10 minutes.
And VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 20 I would hope that you would supplement and compliment that written statement.
Please proceed.
STATEMENT OF HON. CLAUDE A. ALLEN, DEPUTY SECRETARY, DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Mr. ALLEN.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman and members of the committee I am Claude Allen, Deputy Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services.
And while it is true that having sat through all of the opening statements, it has been very enlightening.
This is, indeed, my first appearance before this committee in this capacity, as I have been on the job all of 2 weeks now.
I do want to say that I appreciate this opportunity to discuss the position of the administration regarding the cloning of human beings.
Secretary Thompson is working this week at the Health Resources and Services Administration, and regrets that he could not personally be here to give this testimony.
The moral and ethical issues posed by the prospect of cloning human beings are profound and demand our unflagging attention.
And I know the members have given much of your attention in that very way.
Secretary Thompson and President Bush make it very clear that they oppose any and all attempts to clone a human being.
We oppose the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer cloning techniques either to assist human reproduction or to develop cell or tissue-based therapies.
At the same time, the Secretary and the President strongly support other approaches to development of these therapies, such as research with genes, cells, or tissues from humans or animals consistent with current law.
Current biomedical science is riddled with vast areas of uncertainty about somatic cell nuclear transfer techniques and the consequences of their use.
We, therefore, believe that any attempt to clone a human being, not only would present a grave risk to the mother and the child, but also would pose deeply troubling moral and ethical issues for humankind.
Further, we support both the Presidential directive already in place that prohibits the use of Federal--of government funds for cloning human beings and the current restrictions on HHS appropriations that bar the use of Federal Government funds to create human embryos for research purposes.
The American Medical Association Policy Statement E2.147 issued in 1999 stated further--that further investigation and discussion of the harms and benefits of human cloning is needed, and the potential for unknown physical and psychological harm, including violations of privacy and autonomy, are significant.
Ian Wilmont, as many have already noted, the scientist who cloned Dolly the sheep, has come out publicly against human cloning, stating that the risks inherent in cloning mammals are so great that it is ``criminally irresponsible'' to experiment with humans.
After 4 years of experience in animal cloning techniques, the failure rate is 98 percent.
Animals that survive have problems with abnormal--abnormally high birth weight, extra large organs, heart VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 21 troubles, even poor immune systems.
These animals are often euthanized to end their suffering.
It is clear that this administration has a moral imperative to prohibit the use of cloning technology for the purposes of creating a human being for reproduction or for research.
At the same time, we look forward to working with the committee and the members on your--and the colleagues in Congress in sustaining life-giving research into cell and tissue-based therapy to combat disease.
On behalf of Secretary Thompson and the President, let me thank you all for holding this hearing.
It does address very critical issues that we must confront.
I will end by saying that I think Mr. Pitts, Congressman Pitts, really stated it the best when he said that we must not let science advance in a moral vacuum.
The times in society when we have done that have resulted in great disasters, times when we have turned our back on our fellow men and women in this country and around the world.
We believe, at the Department of Health and Human Services, that the committee's work should be applauded in carefully considering and carefully reviewing these matters that have such critical importance to the future of not only those who may benefit from therapy, but also for society itself.
With that, I will stop and entertain any questions.
There are many other issues that I think have been addressed in my written statement.
Mr. Chairman, if I may also, at the very beginning, I meant to apologize for the committee receiving my testimony late last evening.
It is not designed to prevent you from having an opportunity to review it.
It was simply late in the night that we were able to get it finally worked out and get it up here to you.
So, please accept my apologies for that, as well as the Department's.
[The prepared statement of Claude A. Allen follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF CLAUDE A. ALLEN, DEPUTY SECRETARY, DEPARTMENT HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES OF Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, I am Claude Allen, Deputy Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services.
I appreciate this opportunity to discuss the position of the Administration regarding the cloning of human beings.
BACKGROUND The moral and ethical issues posed by the prospect of cloning human beings are profound and demand our unflagging attention.
Secretary Thompson and President Bush oppose any and all attempts to clone a human being.
We oppose the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer cloning techniques either to assist human reproduction or to develop cell- or tissue-based therapies.
At the same time, we strongly support other approaches to development of these therapies, such as research with genes, cells, or tissues from humans or animals, consistent with current law.
Any attempt to clone a human being not only would present a grave risk to the mother and the child but also would pose deeply troubling moral and ethical issues for humankind.
Further, we support both the Presidential directive already in place that prohibits the use of federal funds for cloning human beings and the current restrictions on HHS appropriations that bar the use of federal funds to create human embryos for research.
These matters are of special interest to the Department of Health and Human Services because attempts to use cloning technology to clone a human being are subject to both the biologics provisions of the Public Health Service Act and the drug VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 22 and device provisions of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
On March 28, an FDA representative testified on this subject before the House Energy and Commerce, Subcommittee on Oversight and Investigations.
As indicated then, because of unresolved safety questions on the use of cloning technology to clone a human being, FDA will not permit such attempts.
In 1998, FDA described its position in a widely circulated ``Dear Colleague'' letter.
In keeping with the provisions of its statutory responsibilities, FDA's role in these matters is limited to scientific, technical and regulatory considerations.
However, as noted by the President as well as by the National Bioethics Advisory Commission, additional concerns beyond the scope of FDA's role remain to be resolved ( especially the broad social and ethical implications of cloning human beings, such as whether the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer is morally acceptable under any circumstance.
COMMENTS ON PENDING LEGISLATIVE PROPOSALS The Administration favors the passage of specific legislation to prohibit the cloning of a human being, including cloning techniques either to assist human reproduction or to develop cell- or tissue-based therapies.
We look forward to working with the Congress to achieve this goal.
For today, I present our comments on the Cloning Prohibition Act of 2001 (H.R. 2172, introduced by Mr. Greenwood) and the Human Cloning Prohibition Act of 2001 (H.R. 1644, introduced by Mr. Weldon), respectively.
H.R. 2172 H.R. 2172 focuses on preventing (a) the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer (SCNT) technology to initiate a pregnancy or (b) the shipment or transportation of the product resulting from such technology if the product is intended to initiate a pregnancy.
The bill does not restrict any other uses of human SCNT, such as creating human embryos for research purposes.
This is a major concern to the Administration.
To foster enforcement of its provisions, the bill requires that an individual who intends to perform human SCNT register his/her name and place of business.
This registration must include a statement or attestation, signed by the individual, declaring that he/she is aware of the prohibitions specified in the bill and will not engage in any activity that violates them.
The registration requirement could cover a substantial number of academic and industrial laboratories.
The bill amends the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act to provide for criminal and civil penalties for any of the bill's prohibited activities.
Moreover, to protect the confidentiality of the information that will be collected as a result of the registration process, the bill requires that the Secretary not disclose any of this information unless the registrant has provided authorization in writing or the disclosure does not identify either the individual or his/her place of business.
H.R. 1644 H.R 1644 amends Title 18 of the U.S. Code to prohibit (a) performing or attempting to perform human cloning, (b) participating in an attempt to perform such activity, or (c) shipping, receiving, or importing the product of human cloning.
To achieve these ends, the bill defines ``human cloning'' as follows: ``The term `human cloning' means human asexual reproduction, accomplished by introducing the nuclear material of a human somatic cell into a fertilized or unfertilized oocyte whose nucleus has been removed or inactivated to produce a living organism (at any stage of development) with a human or predominantly human genetic constitution.''
As we interpret the bill, it prohibits not only the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer to initiate a pregnancy but also all other applications of somatic cell nuclear transfer with human somatic cells, such as cloning to produce cell- and tissue-based therapies.
This is consistent with Secretary Thompson's and the President's views.
Scientific research that is not specifically prohibited in the bill is unrestricted by it.
Examples of research that are not prohibited are the use of nuclear transfer or other cloning techniques to produce molecules, DNA, cells other than human embryos, tissues, organs, plants, or animals other than humans.
Penalties for violation of the bill's prohibitions include at least $1 million in civil penalties and/or up to 10 years in prison.
We support this bill's intent of banning human cloning, but believe that it warrants further review to resolve some technical issues.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 23 CONCLUSION HHS applauds the Committee for addressing the issues associated with cloning human beings and welcomes the initiative of Representatives Greenwood and Weldon in offering specific legislative proposals.
We look forward to working with the Congress to prohibit morally offensive uses of cloning technology without stifling the development of important cell- and tissue-based therapies to combat human diseases.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair, on behalf of the committee, accepts your apology.
Obviously, it is certainly helpful if we can get it on time.
Mr. ALLEN.
Certainly.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The staff--I know the staff was here until, what, 11:30 last night waiting for the testimony.
They didn't have anything else to do, just sat waiting.
Mr. ALLEN.
Indeed, thank you.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The Chair recognizes himself for questions.
Mr. Allen, given the administration's opposition to the creation of cloned human embryos, what uses of cloning technology does the administration support? Would it be anything that doesn't give rise to a human embryo? Mr. ALLEN.
Mr. Chairman, I believe in my written statement, on page 6--and I will highlight that for you--we believe that there is already areas that can and should continue to see the research advance that are not prohibited by the use of somatic cell nuclear transfer, techniques such as using--that produce molecules, DNA, cells other than human embryos, tissues, organs, plants, and animals.
And we believe that both of those areas are wide open.
What we are focusing on is a very narrow area, and that is the use of the human cell, the somatic cell, for the purpose of cloning, whether that be for reproductive purposes or whether that be for what we have heard earlier described as therapeutic or research-based work.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
You and I both have just used the word ``human'' a couple of times.
Let me ask you the question; what is human? If legislation were passed banning the creation of cloned human embryos, how would the administration interpret the word ``human''? Before you go into that, I sould share with you that there was a news story a while back that scientists created a monkey that contained a strand of DNA from a jellyfish, which served as a fluorescent marker for the embryonic-embryonic monkey.
If this were done to a cloned human embryo, would this act render a human embryo into a chimera and therefore, not protected under the act? Would it be a loophole? Would the administration interpret anything that is predominantly human in origin in its genetic make-up to be considered human for enforcement purposes? Mr. ALLEN.
Mr. Chairman, let me first say the administration has not taken a position on the findings that you---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Yes, that was going to be the next question.
Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] and I just want to make that very clear.
I think the fact that we would have to even go down that track to try to guess or define what ``human'' is raises some serious implications that go back to question both of the moral, legal, and ethical implications.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 24 However, I think your point of addressing the question, the word ``in origin'' certainly gives us some parameters to begin to look at, as we look to try to define that.
We are human because--not simply because of our genetic makeup because, indeed, we do share 98 percent of our make-up with, for example, monkeys.
But it is those characteristics that make us distinct from other mammals, even primates that make us distinct, such as our ability to reason, our moral conscience.
These are things that make us human.
So, I think to try to simply isolate it to a scientific definition, I think we are defeating the purpose of who we are as people, as individuals, as a species, that is distinct from all others.
And that is not simply limited to our genetic make-up.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Well, even though the administration has not taken a position on the Weldon bill--and I think we are all sort of curious about that--would you feel that maybe there should be a more succinct definition of the word ``human'' in any legislation that might progress through the committee? Mr. ALLEN.
We certainly think that the reason we have withheld from endorsing either bill in this circumstance is because we believe there is room for a lot of technical improvement.
And that certainly could serve as one of those areas that probably would need to be spelled out.
Again, we know that, as a lawyer, that lawyers can certainly slice and dice words if you are not very careful about how you define.
We would hope that that would not be the case.
But certainly, that is an area that, should the committee--and we will go back and look at that.
We believe that we have opportunities to offer some technical advice in that area to clarify.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
All right.
I do believe that others will probably raise the question of why you have not chosen to endorse the bills.
So, I will just go ahead and yield.
Mr. Waxman to inquire? Mr. WAXMAN.
Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
Now, Mr. Allen, you say the administration opposes genetic cell replication and research, cloning that uses human egg cells to create genetically identical cells, but is not intended to lead to reproductive cloning to create a human being.
In your statement, you explain why the administration opposes creation of a human being, but you don't explain why you oppose research that is not intended to create a human being.
Why? Mr. ALLEN.
Mr. Waxman, thank you for the question, and I do want to clarify it and make that very clear why we believe that.
I think that the comments that have been made by the committee thus far really encapsulate much of that; and that is, that these are areas that go far beyond just simply science.
They go to the heart of the moral, legal, and ethical questions that need to be raised about this area of research that we are going into.
With regards to why we have not endorsed one of the bills versus the other, but we strongly believe that we need to ban both research and reproductive cloning is because leading down the track of research cloning, it is a very small step to have an embryo that was created for a clone for research purposes to be simply implanted into a woman that ultimately leads to---- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 25 Mr. WAXMAN.
But don't you draw any distinction between research that leads toward a human version of Dolly, the sheep, and research that uses egg cells to develop tissues for organ repair? Mr. ALLEN.
Sir, I think you---- Mr. WAXMAN.
Don't you draw those distinctions in your mind? Mr. ALLEN.
I think you can draw a distinction, but I think the question, once again, comes back to intent.
It gets us to a place where we would have to interpret the intent of the individual or company or individuals who are creating for the purposes of research.
A very simple example: a kid in a candy store.
I own a candy store.
My son works in that candy store, has access to everything; he is passionate about candy.
It is a very small step for him to go from me telling him what is prohibited, ``You may not have that,'' to simply taking one off the shelf and using it for that purpose.
Mr. WAXMAN.
Yes.
Mr. ALLEN.
I believe that, and the administration believes that, it is the best interest that, at this time, that we ban both research, as well as reproductive, cloning because of the easy step to take that moves us across that line that we all agree is reprehensible.
Mr. WAXMAN.
But can't you deal with intent? We deal with intent all the time in the criminal law.
Mr. ALLEN.
The issue of intent is--and the way that the language is written, and the bill focuses on the intent.
But what we cannot deal with is we cannot stop once that process has taken place, once a human embryo that has been cloned has gone from the research laboratory, has been implanted into a woman, that area, then, we have gone down that path; we have made that step.
And that is one that raises serious questions about what do you do at that point? I think there has been questions already raised about do you--you can punish the person for implanting it.
Do you punish the researcher who did not know the intent of the person who would ultimately implant that in the---- Mr. WAXMAN.
Well, we are talking about, I gather, the intent of the researchers.
But do you oppose this research because you think an egg cell with implanted core genetic material is the same as a human being? Mr. ALLEN.
I am sorry; I missed---- Mr. WAXMAN.
Do you oppose this research because you think that an egg cell with implanted core genetic material is the same as a human being? Mr. ALLEN.
That is not the basis upon which we are making this objection and opposition.
We are basing it upon, again, the fear and the concern, the real fear and real concern---- Mr. WAXMAN.
That it will be misused? Mr. ALLEN.
That is correct.
Mr. WAXMAN.
Okay.
Does the administration oppose in vitro fertilization or research on in vitro fertilization? Mr. ALLEN.
We do not oppose in vitro fertilization because there is a very significant distinction.
In vitro fertilization involves the union of an egg cell, that is one set of chromosomes, with a sperm cell, a second set of chromosomes.
And that is to produce a fertilized egg that has two sets of chromosomes.
The distinction here when we are talking about the VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 26 cloning is that the somatic cell nuclear transfer cloning involves the removal of the egg from a single cell, and the implantation, or the fusion, with a nuclear material to create one set that is identical to the source that it came from.
So, there is a fundamental distinction between in vitro fertilization and what we are talking about here in banning, and that is to that cell nuclear transfer cloning.
Mr. WAXMAN.
Okay.
Well, thank you.
Your answers are very helpful, and we will think them through, and work with you on this.
Thank you, Mr. Chair.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
I thank the gentleman.
Mr. Greenwood to inquire? Mr. GREENWOOD.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you for your testimony, sir.
If I calculate right, this administration has been in office about 5 months? Mr. ALLEN.
That is correct.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
That is right.
This is a momentous--you would agree, I think, that this is a momentous issue for our future.
Mr. ALLEN.
Absolutely.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
Okay.
Could you share with us, with this committee, with whom did this administration consult in order to arrive at its position which, as you stated, is that we oppose the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer of cloning techniques either to assist human reproduction, which we all do, but--or to develop cell or tissue-based therapies.
Now, with whom did you consult? With whom did this administration consult in order to arrive at that conclusion? Mr. ALLEN.
Mr. Greenwood, the administration certainly has expertise within the Department itself, at HHS, whether it be NIH, the FDA, scientists within the administration.
Outside, we also---- Mr. GREENWOOD.
Did this administration consult with the NIH and the FDA prior to coming to this conclusion? Mr. ALLEN.
Certainly, we would have worked with them, and their input has gone into this decision.
At a different level, however, I will say that it is very clear that, as has been indicated, that this involves significant policy issues that bear also on the views of the President and the Secretary as based upon the science that we have worked with, within the Department and outside of the Department as well.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
Very complex.
For instance, did you bring BIO, the organization that represents the bio-technology group--did the administration bring BIO and the scientists who are involved in this kind of research to consult with them prior to formulating its views? Mr. ALLEN.
Certainly throughout the time that this issue has been around, we have certainly consulted with and worked with representatives from all communities, the bio-tech community, the faith community, the legal community.
We have worked with all because this issue does have implications for all.
And for that reason--I cannot document for you at this point who everyone has met with within the administration.
But certainly, there has been consultation and work with--as we have developed these positions.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 27 Mr. GREENWOOD.
Now, Mr. Allen, when you--when you responded to Mr. Waxman's question on the--and you described the technical difference between a nuclear transferred embryo, if you will, and one that is produced by the union of the male and female reproductive cells--so, you correctly described why--the technical difference between in vitro fertilization and somatic and nuclear cell transfer.
Now, what is the ethical distinction that you are making--that this administration is making here? Mr. ALLEN.
The administration has not made an ethical distinction between those two in this regard.
What we are focusing on is-- and I think the distinction, with all due respect, the Greenwood bill, is the distinction that is made there, that it is appropriate for banning it as far as reproductive purposes, but allow the research purposes to go forward.
What we are concerned about, as I have stated earlier, is the fact that that is a very, very thin line to divide upon because it is too easy, too simple to cross that line.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
So, if I understand you, sir, what you are saying is that it is--that this administration's policy is based on not an ethical decision whether it is good for humanity to use this regenerative, therapeutic medicine to save the lives of potentially millions of people, but it is making a distinction on the basis--basis of that notion that the egg, that the cloned egg, once that process has occurred, could be diverted to break the law that I am trying to write, that it could be diverted for that purpose and go--become used as--for reproductive cloning.
Is that the administration's position? Mr. ALLEN.
If I understand your question, Mr. Greenwood, the administration's position would be that we believe that--that both reproductive and research purposes of cloning, using somatic cell nuclear transfer cloning, would be what we support in prohibiting for the mere reason that it is a very easy leap from one to the other.
Beyond that, I think it is important to recognize that is not simply based upon science.
It is not simply based upon moral or ethical considerations.
It is based upon the combination thereof.
And as a policy decision, we believe that, at this time, that it is important that we send a very strong message that human--that the production or the creation of a human being by the means of cloning, whether accidental or intentional, should be banned.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
Well, we all agree on that.
But what I am-- what I am trying to hone in on here is this administration is not taking the position that something unethical or immoral has happened at the moment of the somatic cell transfer, but rather it is the potentiality of that cell then being implanted in the uterus that is the danger? Even though we outlaw that in our bill, it is the potentiality that that could be transferred---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Very, very brief response to that.
Mr. ALLEN.
I think that is a fair---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The gentleman's time has expired.
Mr. ALLEN.
Yes, I think that is a fair summation of the position.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
Thank you.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 28 Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Mr. Deutsch? Mr. DEUTSCH.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
You indicated that the administration supports legislation to ban therapeutic and reproductive cloning.
Can you indicate how this ban that you endorse will be enforced? Mr. ALLEN.
Well, I believe, at this point, what we are looking at is the enforcement mechanisms that are cited in the bills before us.
Certainly, the FDA plays a role in that as it regulates both the biological and other aspects, both under the products bill as well as the FDA's other statutory authority to do so.
It has enforcement mechanisms, and we currently do that in other areas.
And we believe this would be similar to that as well.
Mr. DEUTSCH.
All right.
Again, just from an enforcement standpoint, would you wait until you hear a tip or require some information indicating that someone wants to clone, or will you act perspectively by doing random site visits and interviews? Mr. ALLEN.
I believe the FDA does both at this time.
We receive tips, and we do act upon random site visits consistent with the authority that the FDA already has in both of these areas.
Mr. DEUTSCH.
All right.
The administration budget recites the grim statistics on the lower number of site inspections on foreign and domestic facilities under FDA jurisdiction.
The FDA cannot even identify all the facilities that make prescription drug ingredients that are introduced into commerce in this country.
FDA and Customs inspect less than 1 percent of imports of food, drugs, and other items under FDA jurisdiction.
NIH says that it lacks expertise on the subject of cloning.
What assurance can you give that the administration is serious about enforcing a ban on human cloning? Mr. ALLEN.
We would work with--in this area, certainly there are a number of options available to the administration.
Certainly, we can re-deploy existing resources within the Department to try to begin to address these issues, as well as seek additional appropriation should that be necessary to do so.
But the FDA currently believes that it is able to enforce, and does enforce, the laws as they currently exist.
And this would be simply a further area for---- Mr. DEUTSCH.
Is the deterrent effect of the Weldon bill sufficient prevention for the cloning of humans? Mr. ALLEN.
Could you resay---- Mr. DEUTSCH.
The Weldon bill, the prohibitions that it has, do you believe that is a sufficient deterrent? Mr. ALLEN.
We believe that the Weldon bill does suggest, and leads in the right direction, of what we believe is a policy statement that should be enforced.
And that is a total ban on human cloning.
We believe there are some technical adjustments to the bill that probably could improve upon, and that is what we are willing to work with the committee and the Congress on to try to accomplish.
Mr. DEUTSCH.
Earlier this year, the Oversight and Investigations Subcommittee held a hearing on the subject of human cloning.
At that hearing, and the media events approximate to it, various individuals, some claiming to be aliens, made statements to the effect VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 29 that they intended to clone a human being in the United States in the near future.
The FDA testified that they were aware of these claims and were investigating the matter.
Can you tell us, in detail, what steps the administration has taken since then to investigate these matters and, if necessary, to stop human cloning.
Mr. ALLEN.
I know that the administration--the FDA is currently looking into these assertions of the possible existence of a human cloning laboratory here in the United States.
And it is FDA policy not to discuss publicly investigation techniques or strategy.
However, Dr. Zahn is here from the FDA, has testified on these areas in the past, and I believe she would be prepared to give you some more detail on that at the appropriate time.
Mr. DEUTSCH.
So, it is fair to say that there is an ongoing investigation then? Mr. ALLEN.
It is fair to say that we are aware of it and are investigating, yes.
Mr. DEUTSCH.
Okay, let me ask you a question regarding the administration's position.
You know, obviously, there is this--the issue that--in terms of what we call therapeutic cloning, that the research potential is incredibly dramatic.
And the administration's proposal, as I understand it at this point, is to ban those.
And I understand the policy reasons why you are suggesting to ban those.
I think what is clear from my opening statement, I mentioned that it is clear that this research is going to go on whether or not the United States bans it.
It is going to go on in other countries because other countries do not consider it the same as the administration's position.
Would that then be the administration's position to ban the importation of drugs that were--that were basically researched or, in fact, substances that were the benefits of human--of stem cell research? What would the administration's position be in that area? Mr. ALLEN.
The administration has not taken a position on that at this point.
What we are focusing on are the two bills.
Of course, the Weldon bill does--I am sorry, the Weldon-Stupak bill does focus on importation and banning that.
And for that reason, we believe that that is an appropriate response under the legislation to do so.
But the administration has not formulated a position as to---- Mr. DEUTSCH.
Again, I really--I am going to ask that question again and try to hear a clear answer because, to me, it is--it is, you know, really almost shocking what you have just said, that in a case of the research--because this is not--I mean, it is hypothetical at this point, but some of the potential seems incredible, as Mr. Strickland mentioned.
And I think talking about the reality, talking to families, talking to real people who are suffering from incredibly debilitating illnesses where it is clear that the potential to make, you know, absolutely miraculous recoveries, that, in fact, your position would be that if those drugs existed to cure paralysis, to cure cancer, that your position would be that those drugs would not be able to be imported into the United States of America.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Let us finish up here.
Mr. ALLEN.
Certainly.
Congressman Deutsch---- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 30 Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The time has expired.
Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] it should not be remarkable that we are not outright saying that we would allow the importation of that.
The FDA does that every day.
There are many drug therapies and other techniques that may have been developed elsewhere, but we have a responsibility to protect the health and safety of Americans.
And absent a review of that and consideration of the impact that that may have on human life, it would not be irresponsible to say we would ban it at this point.
But we leave open the possibility and the prospect that should there be developed, and should there by, hypothetically, therapies that could benefit American people, it will go through the same process by which we would allow that to take place and to be imported into this country.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Dr. Ganske to inquire? Mr. GANSKE.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you, Mr. Allen, for being with us today.
Up until just a few days ago, Secretary of Health and Human Services, Tommy Thompson, was saying that he, ``wasn't sure what the President's position was.''
Now, we have your statement today, and this is the President's position.
Is that right? Mr. ALLEN.
That is correct.
Mr. GANSKE.
And this is the Secretary's position? Mr. ALLEN.
That is correct also.
Mr. GANSKE.
All right.
Well, let us--I just want to be absolutely clear on this.
On page 5, you say, ``As we interpret the bill, it prohibits not on the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer to initiate a pregnancy, but also all,'' underline that, ``all other applications of somatic cell nuclear transfer with human somatic cells, such as cloning to produce cell or tissue-based therapies.''
That is consistent with Secretary Thompson's and the President's views? Let us just be absolutely clear.
Mr. ALLEN.
That is correct.
Mr. GANSKE.
Okay.
So, now, are you saying that it is the administration's position that it should be illegal for anyone to do somatic cell nuclear transfer? Mr. ALLEN.
Within the context of the jurisdiction of the United States, that is correct.
That is what we have the authority to control.
Mr. GANSKE.
So, the ongoing work in that area you would make illegal? Mr. ALLEN.
At this point, what the administration's position is, as stated there, is indeed the use of somatic stem cell nuclear transfer cloning techniques are what we are focusing on here.
And that is the administration's position.
Mr. GANSKE.
How does the administration answer the groups like Juvenile Diabetes, and the groups that are concerned with spinal cord injury, the groups that are looking--that the--the kidney failure groups that are looking to potentially be--we have a tremendous shortage of kidneys.
They are looking for an opportunity to be able to develop a kidney.
I am kind of interested in an answer.
Mr. ALLEN.
The position.
It is focusing solely on the use of a technique of somatic cell nuclear transfer for cloning purposes.
We are not saying that other techniques that are currently proven to VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 31 be efficacious for the very issues that you have raised could not be continued.
That research is untouched.
Mr. GANSKE.
Is the administration aware that there are a number of very pro-life United States Senators who have expressed an opinion on this, such as former Senator Connie Mack and others who would probably vehemently disagree with the--this administration's position? Mr. ALLEN.
We are aware that the position the administration has taken is based upon the concern for--as the bills presented here today point out, and that is, is that there are no therapies that have been developed in the area that rely upon embryonic-- rely upon pre-natal cloned cells.
That point has not been taken, and it does not take away all the other therapies, all the other research that is ongoing to provide for the cures that you are talking about.
We believe that there is no boundaries that have been established for the vacuum that is created.
And if we allow and say that we support the use of cloned cells for that purpose, if we say that we support that, that opens up the---- Mr. GANSKE.
Is it this administration's position that the FDA currently has the authority, then, to stop this procedure? Mr. ALLEN.
While we believe that that is not necessary for this discussion, that position to address this, because under the legislation, particularly the Weldon-Stupak bill, it alleviates the need to arrive at that position because it bans both reproductive and research in those areas.
Mr. GANSKE.
Do you think--but do you think the FDA has the authority to stop this now? Mr. ALLEN.
I cannot give you a personal opinion on that.
The administration, certainly the FDA, can speak to that specifically.
Dr. Koon has spoken to that in the past, and I believe she is prepared to do so if---- Mr. GANSKE.
Is the FDA making plans, then, to go into private laboratories to stop this type of research? Mr. ALLEN.
Those plans are not underway at this time.
That is not the---- Mr. GANSKE.
But consistent with the administration's statement here that that would be--I mean, that would be consistent with this administration's statement.
Mr. ALLEN.
Upon the passage of the legislation, this administration would be prepared to work with the committee to implement the law to the full effect, according to the regulations that are provided.
And any other--any further clarifications of all that would be necessary, we would be willing to seek that from the Congress.
Mr. GANSKE.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Mr. Stupak to inquire? Mr. STUPAK.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. Allen, I would like you to clarify a statement you made regarding tissue-based therapies.
You and the administration only object to tissue-based therapies derived from cloned human embryos.
Is that correct? Mr. ALLEN.
I am sorry, I could not hear.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 32 Mr. STUPAK.
Sure.
The administration, and you representing the administration, only object to tissue-based therapies derived from cloned human embryos, correct? Mr. ALLEN.
That is correct.
Mr. STUPAK.
In fact, our bill specifically says, is it your understanding, that we do not restrict areas of scientific research in the use of nuclear transfer or other cloning techniques to produce molecules, DNA, cells, other than human embryos, tissues, organs, plants, or animals, other than human beings.
Is that correct? Mr. ALLEN.
That is correct.
Mr. STUPAK.
And so, some of the questions like the statement Mr. Strickland made, and even the question Mr. Deutsch asked, what if, our bill also, in this last part sentence of the Congress, also says if further therapies or research becomes available, they could always come back before the legislative body and say we need some relief in this area as we are doing this research.
We leave it to the scientists to tell us when to come back, and not just a prohibition.
Is that your understanding? Mr. ALLEN.
That is our understanding.
In fact, for those two reasons, the section--subsection (d), the scientific research, where it makes very clear what this--this bill not forescribe, make it a reason why we believe that those therapies can continue, those efforts of research continue, and why the administration believes that it is appropriate to speak very strongly on what we do prohibit and support.
Furthermore, we believe that the--the ability here for science does change.
And if the science demonstrates that embryonic cloning is ethicacious, safe, and effective, there is an opportunity again, a safety clause here, that allows for review.
And we believe that that also is an appropriate way to address the issue.
Mr. STUPAK.
And the administration, it does not object to other forms of tissue replication or cell-based therapies, do they? Mr. ALLEN.
No.
Mr. STUPAK.
Pardon? Mr. ALLEN.
No, we don't.
Mr. STUPAK.
Okay.
Are there any therapies, medical uses from cloning, even stem cells, in existence right now? Mr. ALLEN.
We are not aware of any, no.
Mr. STUPAK.
Okay.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I yield back.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
I thank the gentleman.
Dr. Norwood? Mr. NORWOOD.
Mr. Allen, I am going to basically ask you to repeat yourself.
I am only going to ask you two questions, and I want you to take plenty of time and give us a lengthy, clear-cut answer.
Does the administration support the Greenwood bill? Mr. ALLEN.
We do not support the Greenwood bill because it does allow for research cloning.
So, we do not support the Greenwood bill.
Mr. NORWOOD.
And is that the only reason? Mr. ALLEN.
That is principally a reason.
There are other reasons that we would want to look at--again, there are technical issues that we would need to address.
I could highlight a couple of those: one, just the impact that it has on inconsistency among the States.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 33 It was stated earlier that a number of States have already acted in this area.
The Greenwood bill preempts much of what those-- what other States may do in those areas.
And so, that would cause for some concerns.
Some States that have varying degrees of how these address these issues--by preempting some and not others, it does create for some interpretation issues, as well as enforcement issues for the Department.
Those would be principally some of the areas that we would have concerns about.
Mr. NORWOOD.
All right.
To your knowledge--and the Congressman can speak for himself; but to your knowledge, has Congressman Greenwood worked with the administration to see if he could--if the two of you could work this out? Mr. ALLEN.
To my knowledge--again, personally, I have only been on-board for a very short while.
So, therefore, I am not aware of--and we would be certainly willing to sit down with Congressman Greenwood to talk about that and address many of these issues.
But I think on the policy issue, the policy decision about--which the administration is very clear on, is the prohibition against all forms of cloning.
Mr. NORWOOD.
I will yield.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
Thank you, gentleman, for yielding.
Here is a problem we have, Mr. Allen.
We all agree, the administration, everybody in this room, everybody probably--practically everyone in the Congress, we need to ban human reproductive cloning.
And if we don't do something legislatively, we may very well, very soon, be in a position where people are actually trying to do something that we all agree is very unsafe and very unethical, and that is to try to create human beings through cloning.
There is huge disagreement on the second part of this, the therapeutic part.
And I would predict, I think accurately, that we are never going to get a Weldon-style bill through the U.S. Senate.
There was precedent for that when the Republicans were in control, and you are certainly not going to get a Weldon-type bill that bans the therapeutic cloning through the Senate.
So, now we are in a position that we are going to fail, as a Nation, to ban reproductive cloning because we can't get past this issue of therapeutic cloning.
And what I have been trying to argue is, if we want to prohibit therapeutic--the reproductive cloning, let us do it, which is what our bill does, and leave to another day the debate about he therapeutic cloning.
And I guess my question---- Mr. NORWOOD.
Excuse me, I have got to reclaim my time to get to the next question.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
Okay, all right.
Well, let me---- Mr. NORWOOD.
But you---- Mr. GREENWOOD.
I thank the gentleman for yielding.
Mr. NORWOOD.
Mr. Allen, does the administration support the Weldon-Stupak bill? Mr. ALLEN.
The administration does not actively endorse the Weldon-Stupak bill for the reasons I have cited.
Also, there are some areas that we believe that are technical questions that---- Mr. NORWOOD.
Well, speak up.
What are those areas? VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 34 Mr. NORWOOD.
A couple of those areas, for example, is in the bill itself--one of the concerns is within the definition section, define of the term ``asexual reproduction.''
There were some concerns about the ability to maneuver around the word of what--without defining specifically what asexual reproduction is would be one area that we would certainly want to work with and clarify.
The issue of importation, banning of the importation of--I believe--I am not sure exactly--Congressman Waxman raised the question about that.
What would actually be banned? Will we be banning--if a child was born that was the product of cloning, would we be ban that? Also, the meaning of ``nuclear material'' is another question.
I know that--what we think the intent of the bill is, but we would want to seek clarification of what nuclear material would be.
Those are just a few areas that---- Mr. NORWOOD.
And well, I am in the cautionary, so just quickly and last, does the White House believe we need to legislate this year on this issue? Mr. ALLEN.
The White House has not taken a position as far as legislating.
We do believe that there is significant concern and significant harm based upon statements that have been made, whether real or fictitious, however close they may be.
But we do believe that there is a significant concern that if we do not legislate in this area, that we could move very quickly down this track, whether it is for research purposes that could ultimately lead to reproductive purposes for cloning.
So, we would say yes, we believe that there needs to be some action in this area this year.
Mr. NORWOOD.
I suspect we all agree with that.
So, I hope you will encourage the White House crew to work with Mr. Weldon, and Mr. Stupak, and Mr. Greenwood, because we need to get this done.
Mr. ALLEN.
We will do that.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Mr. Pitts to inquire? Mr. PITTS.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Secretary Allen, to my knowledge, three people: a Dr. Bosalier, Dr. Okarma, and Dr. Zabos have informed the committee that they all intend to clone human embryos.
How has the FDA, or has the FDA, used their authority to monitor and regulate the activities of these researchers who intend to clone human embryos, two of whom, we are told, intend to implant? Mr. ALLEN.
Without discussion--discussing or disclosing the FDA's techniques for investigation, we will say that we have taken these claims very seriously.
And in some instances, contact has been made with the principals who said that they intend to do this.
And we have discussed very carefully with them the requirements for such--beginning of such research.
For example, the FDA requires that an investigational new drug application be filed by anyone or any entity that seeks to begin moving down this track.
None have been filed.
And thereby, we would notify and work with any of these individuals to let them know that that is a requirement, and that FDA would seek to enforce in that area.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 35 Mr. PITTS.
I have an enforcement question.
The FDA says they have the power to regulate the entire cloning process if the intent is to implant the cloned embryo into a surrogate mother.
If FDA officials showed up at a laboratory, how could they distinguish between those cloned embryos destined for destruction by experimentation and those destined for implantation? Mr. ALLEN.
That is an excellent question.
And that is the reason why we believe that you must ban all, because you cannot make the distinction based upon intent.
And whose intent are we referring to? Is it the intent of the one who created the clone through the process, or is it the intent of that individual who seeks to implant? Those are questions that must be worked out.
And the FDA does not have the ability to make that discern--to discern that.
Mr. PITTS.
And one final question: on the bottom of page 2 of your written testimony, you state, ``Additional concerns beyond the scope of FDA's role remain to be resolved, especially the broad social and ethical implications of cloning human beings, such as whether the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer is morally acceptable under any circumstance.''
Yet, your written testimony also states that, ``The administration opposes the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer cloning techniques either to assist human reproduction or develop cell or tissue-based therapies.''
That sounds to me as if that additional concern has been resolved by the administration.
Am I correct? Mr. ALLEN.
If I understand your question, the answer will be yes.
Mr. PITTS.
Okay, thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
Would the gentleman yield? Would the gentleman yield? Mr. PITTS.
I will be happy to yield.
Mr. GREENWOOD.
Mr. Allen, if you came into a laboratory where this kind of research with somatic transfer was taking place, and you find on that laboratory table an egg that has had its genetic material transferred and a gun, how do you know--how do you-- isn't the question of what the intent is the same for--in both instances? In other words, why not confiscate the gun and the cells because we don't know what the intent is of the user, whether the user intends to commit a crime with either one of those? It seems to me to be a very strikingly absurd position to say that in most instances, we respect the freedom of individuals to say that they have not committed a crime until they commit one.
But in this instance, we want to stop them before because we do not understand what their intent is.
What is the distinction there? Mr. ALLEN.
Mr. Greenwood, I think it really raises the question about the intent language in your bill, specifically.
And I think that that--I would turn that back to you and say that that is the concern that we have with your bill, is that it requires us to figure that out.
And we have no way of doing that, top figure out whether a set of embryos are set for research purposes as opposed to being shipped and ultimately used for reproductive purposes.
And the way to deal with it at this point is to ban both.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 36 Mr. GREENWOOD.
Thank you, gentleman, for yielding.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
I thank the gentleman, as a courtesy to a member of the full committee--well, no, I see that Mr. Green has now appeared.
Mr. Green to inquire? Mr. GREEN.
Yes, Mr. Chair.
And I know we have a vote on, so I will be as quick as I can.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
No, it is a recess.
Mr. GREEN.
Oh, okay, that is even better.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
You still can be brief though.
Mr. GREEN.
Oh, okay, I will try and be brief, then, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. Allen, your statement that the administration opposes somatic cell nuclear transfer for both therapeutic and reproductive purposes, but that it supports other approaches to development of these therapies such as research of genes, cells, or tissues from humans or animals consistent with current law--can you elaborate on the phrase ``consistent with current law''? Current law, for example, provides that Federal funding is available for research that uses embryonic stem cells.
Are we to take from your statement the administration has now settled on its position on the matter? I guess current law is a---- Mr. ALLEN.
If I understand your question referring to stem cell research, the President will make a statement.
He will make a decision as to the administration's position on stem cell research, embryonic stem cell research.
That is not my place to do that.
And he will make that statement, and it will be a very clear statement about that.
What we are focusing on here is solely on the issue of cloning and using cloned human embryos for the purpose, whether it be for stem cell research or for reproductive purposes as well.
So, it is a very narrow review.
The issue of stem cell research will be discussed at a later date by the President, himself.
Mr. GREEN.
Okay, but does the administration--the administration does not support the use of any kind of research into human cloning for stem cell research, or is that something we are going to wait for the Secretary? Mr. ALLEN.
The answer would be--if it uses human cloning, then the answer would be no.
Mr. GREEN.
Okay.
You indicate that the concerns of scope of the FDA role remain to be resolved, such as whether the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer is morally acceptable in any circumstances.
Elsewhere in your statement, you clearly support a total ban on SCNT.
Yet, this argued statement I just quoted implied that you are not sure, that the administration's position could change.
Under what circumstance, if any, would the administration support therapeutic use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer? Mr. ALLEN.
We believe that it is a very responsible position to say that we should ban this entire area at this point.
Science may advance.
There may be therapies that can be developed based first upon animal cloning techniques to see whether they are ethicacious in humans.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 37 Thereby, one of the reasons why the Weldon-Stupak bill, we believe, has some advantages to it is that it does allow for a review period after a scientific panel has looked at this entire area.
And for that reason, we believe that--that it is important that we remain flexible on what might be without being absolute in that position.
Mr. GREEN.
I don't think I have anything else.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman; I yield back.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
I thank the gentleman.
Ms. Cubin to inquire? Ms. CUBIN.
I don't have anything.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Thank you.
Mr. Brown, do you have---- Mr. BROWN.
No, I am not ready yet.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
We are all finished up with the exception of extending courtesy to a member of the full committee, Ms. DeGette.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Thank you so much, Mr. Chairman.
And again, I appreciate your courtesy.
Mr. Allen, you had testified, I believe in response to Mr. Greenwood's question, that the way the administration developed its position on this issue was you have experts internally, and you also consulted the NIH.
Is that correct? Mr. ALLEN.
The NIH would be considered internally as well.
Our position is---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay, but you did consult the NIH? Mr. ALLEN.
The NIH would certainly be a part of the Department---- Ms. DEGETTE.
And were---- Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] and their opinions would be---- Ms. DEGETTE. [continuing]
Their opinions would certainly have weighed into where we are, yes.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay, because the reason I ask is on March 26, we received a letter from Ruth Kirchstein, who is the acting Director of the NIH, who said, ``NIH, itself, lacks experience in this area of cloning research,`` and they declined to testify in the March hearing we had in the Oversight and Investigations Subcommittee because they didn't have any experience.
Mr. Chairman, I would ask unanimous consent to submit that letter for the record.
Mr. ALLEN.
And I appreciate that, but that is not inconsistent with what I have---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay, thank you---- Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] said in that we are working with---- Ms. DEGETTE. [continuing]
Ms. DEGETTE. [continuing]
Now, let me ask you, Mr. Allen, you had testified, I believe in response to Mr. Pitts' questioning, that you go into these labs, you see these cells sitting here, and you can't really tell what they are for.
So then, all this research might as well be banned.
Is it the administration's position that in vitro fertilization should be banned as well since, when we walk into labs, if we see fertilized eggs, we don't know what is going to happen with those? Mr. ALLEN.
The answer would be no.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Why not? VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 38 Mr. ALLEN.
Because in vitro fertilization--there is a distinction between the two, and I think I explained a little earlier---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Well, I know the distinction between the two, but here is my concern.
If you walk into a research lab, and you see a bunch of fertilized eggs, how are you going to know what the purpose is? Is the purpose going to be to take the--to take the DNA out and to clone cells, or is the purpose going to be to go in and implant those for in vitro fertilization? How are you going to know the difference when you see that matter in a research lab? Mr. ALLEN.
Well, we don't know the difference when we see that matter in---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay.
Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] the research lab.
Ms. DEGETTE.
So, how--how is it that you are going to allow one but not the other? Mr. ALLEN.
In vitro fertilization is something that is already regulated under FDA.
And therefore, the protocols, the processes, and procedures would have already been considered by FDA, and have been reviewed.
And this certainly---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Well, but the--I don't suppose it has been reviewed by FDA under the Weldon-Stupak bill or the Greenwood bill, right? Mr. ALLEN.
That is correct.
And in both of those circumstances, that protocol would be developed upon passage---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Well, how--do the---- Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] of the legislation.
Ms. DEGETTE. [continuing] little cells have nametags? I mean, how are you going to know? I don't--I am not meaning to be flip here, but you walk into a research lab; how are you going to know the purpose of those fertilized eggs? Mr. ALLEN.
All the more reason why, in this area of cloning, when we are talking about cloning cells--one point that I think is important to make, what this legislation again does not prohibit, it does not prohibit in vitro fertilization.
It does not prohibit twinning of cells for the purpose of implantation.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay, but those---- Mr. ALLEN.
But those are issues that we---- Ms. DEGETTE.
But they can't be--the difference cannot be visually determined.
Would that be correct? Mr. ALLEN.
I am not the scientist here.
I would imagine that you are correct, that it is not--that is correct.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay, thank you.
Now, I have another question.
I am sorry, they only give us 5 minutes, and I am already pushing my---- Mr. ALLEN.
But I assume you want me to give you full answers and complete answers so that it is not incorrect for the record.
So, if you would---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Let me ask you one more question, which is that in the Weldon-Stupak bill, and you just talked about this for a moment when Mr. Green was questioning you, that bill says that the scientific community can come back if they feel like cloning research would be necessary for some non-human reproductive purpose, correct? VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 39 I think it says the scientific community can come back and request---- Mr. ALLEN.
No, actually, it requires the scientific--it requires a report to be issued to the Secretary and the President that will already affirmatively address that in a 5-year period.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay.
Mr. ALLEN.
Prior to that time---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay, what---- Mr. ALLEN.
Prior to that time---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Uh-huh.
Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] if there is--if there are advances that are made known, certainly the Department would be looking at that as we are ongoing in this area.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Right.
Here is my question to you: if we ban the research, how are they going to be able to make a report? If they can't do the research, how are they going to be able to tell you what the benefits of this type of research would be? Mr. ALLEN.
Very simply, in that they can do the research in other mammals.
Ms. DEGETTE.
But that is not---- Mr. ALLEN.
They can do the research---- Ms. DEGETTE.
But that is not this exact type of research, right? Mr. ALLEN.
Correct, it is not because---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay.
Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] this is an area that we are talking about banning.
Ms. DEGETTE.
So, you are saying they---- Mr. ALLEN.
Can I actually---- Ms. DEGETTE. [continuing] can transfer animals---- Mr. ALLEN. [continuing]
Go ahead.
Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] give you a complete answer.
And I think that--that the record is entitled to see that---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Go ahead, finish.
Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] very clear.
Is the answer is very clear; the research, the language of the Weldon-Stupak bill allows for ongoing research and consideration of the scientific ethicacy of all of these areas that we are talking about.
Currently, what we are talking about is that you can do this in every other area, but there is no indication that there are therapies that have been developed, nor should--the position of the administration is nor should they be at this point, absent an indication that they would be both safe, ethicacious, and that there are moral, legal boundaries that are put around that research.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Thank you.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The gentlelady's time has expired.
Mr. Allen, the in vitro fertilization would ordinarily take place in a research lab? Mr. ALLEN.
Not likely.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Ordinarily, not likely? Mr. ALLEN.
Usually, it takes place in a fertility clinic.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Right.
So, ordinarily, they wouldn't be side by side on a table, or a group of tables in a laboratory? Mr. ALLEN.
That is correct, Mr. Chairman.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 40 Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Mr. Burr to inquire.
Mr. BURR.
Am I the last, Mr. Chairman? Mr. BILIRAKIS.
You are not the last; Mr. Brown will be the last.
Mr. BURR.
Could I pass to Mr. Brown and come back to me? Mr. BILIRAKIS.
If Mr. Brown is willing to---- Mr. BURR.
I am still trying to get caught up on the---- Mr. BILIRAKIS. [continuing] accept that pass.
Mr. BROWN.
Mr. Burr, I probably could.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
No, no---- Mr. BURR.
I will say some nice things about Mr. Brown.
Mr. BILIRAKIS. [continuing] discussion on tax cuts now.
Mr. BROWN.
Well, Mr. Chairman, since you brought up the tax cut and you always seem to need to do that---- Those of you that don't come to this hearing, don't get that.
It is really rather a stupid inside joke, but nonetheless.
I yield my 5 minutes actually to Ms. DeGette.
Thanks.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Just a couple more questions.
Mr. ALLEN.
Certainly.
Ms. DEGETTE.
You had, I think, testified in response to someone's question that we have not yet seen any kind of scientific-- direct scientific result from human stem cell research, which is accurate, I believe, right? Mr. ALLEN.
I don't think I--that is not correct.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay.
Mr. ALLEN.
We do know that there were use of human stem cell research in some of the Parkinson's and Alzheimers cases that were absolutely disastrous.
So, we do have some evidence of their use.
Ms. DEGETTE.
But we also have some evidence from Canada, don't we, about the use of stem cell research in Type-1 diabetes? Mr. ALLEN.
I will have to defer to you on that.
I have not seen that.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Okay, well, I will let you know because I am the co-chair of the Congressional Diabetes Caucus, that we have seen some promising---- Mr. ALLEN.
Oh, I wasn't---- Ms. DEGETTE. [continuing] stem cell research in Canada.
And also, in April, scientists at the National Institutes of Health used mouse embryonic stem cells to generate insulin-producing organs resembling the islets of the pancreas.
Were you aware of that research? Mr. ALLEN.
I was aware of that.
Ms. DEGETTE.
So, I think you would agree with me we are seeing some very promising stem cell research coming out, would you not? Mr. ALLEN.
Actually, I think the two examples you posited, it demonstrates that use in other mammals, that it is been very promising.
But in use of humans, it has not been.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Well, actually, there has been some use in humans in other countries and---- Mr. ALLEN.
Those two examples you have posited that are--that is what I am going on.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Yeah.
Mr. ALLEN.
I am not the scientist.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 41 Ms. DEGETTE.
And actually, I think you were the one that testified that mammal research is often transferrable to humans, which is why we do research on mammals.
Mr. ALLEN.
Which is why we should perfect mammal research prior to experimentation on humans.
Ms. DEGETTE.
I don't think anybody would disagree with that, certainly with cloning.
Let me ask you another question, which is, as I--what is the administration's position on products which may be developed by use of this type of cloning process, perhaps developed overseas? Let us say, for example, some kind of products that dramatically, positively impact Parkinson's patients are developed, would it be the administration's position that those products should be banned in the United States? Mr. ALLEN.
They would be subjected to the same protocol that other products would be subjected to by the FDA before they are allowed to be--allowed to be utilized in the United States.
We do that with other areas.
We have done it in the area of---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Sure.
Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] cancer, so it would be the similar---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Well, as I understand the Weldon-Stupak bill, products developed with this type of cloned material would banned.
So, would the administration support that part of the--that bill? Mr. ALLEN.
That is one of the areas that I said that we would need to work out with technical assistance with the bill patrons to consider and see what impact it has on other areas of what we do approve of and support.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Now, getting back to your point about FDA approval, is--I know safety and ethicacy are two of the criteria used by the FDA in deciding whether or not to approve a drug.
For example, if we had a Parkinson's drug that was developed overseas with use of these cloned techniques, would--I would assume the FDA will use those same standards in deciding whether to approve the drug, unless it was banned, right? Mr. ALLEN.
I would--if I understand your question correctly, I would say that is correct.
And it goes back to your prior question.
That is why we believe that having a period--an absolute ban on that is imperative.
However, the administration is not saying that we are not willing to look at--look at what has been done.
And that is not---- Ms. DEGETTE.
I am sorry---- Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] inconsistent.
Ms. DEGETTE. [continuing] I am kind of confused because you are--on the one hand, you are saying that we should have a ban on these products.
But then, you are saying, well, we need to look at it.
I don't know what you mean by that.
Mr. ALLEN.
What I mean by that is very clear.
I think it is very imperative, and the administration believes it is imperative, that we take a position, a very clear position, on what we believe is---- Ms. DEGETTE.
Yeah, I get that, but what is that---- Mr. ALLEN.
You got that part.
Ms. DEGETTE. [continuing] clear position? That is not what I get.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 42 Mr. ALLEN.
Okay, the clear position is that the administration is opposed to the use of stem cell nuclear transfer cloning for research or reproductive purposes.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Well, obviously, the reproductive purposes, we all---- Mr. ALLEN.
Research or---- Ms. DEGETTE. [continuing] agree on that.
Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] reproductive.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Now, on the research, let us say a drug is developed---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
The gentlelady's time, or I should say the gentleman's time, is expired.
Ms. DEGETTE.
Thank you.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Mr. Burr to inquire? Mr. BURR.
I thank the Chair's indulgence.
Mr. Allen, tell me what the administration says to those folks around this country that potentially might be waiting for a breakthrough into the current research that is out there.
Mr. ALLEN.
Well, the administration's position would be that there are ample existing therapies and treatments, and very promising areas to address many of these areas--many of these concerns, whether it is for cancer, organ, bone marrow transplants.
I saw an article in the paper this morning.
And we believe that we should be very aggressive in pursuing, and very aggressive in supporting, that research.
Mr. BURR.
Is the research that is currently being done, are the scientists that are currently working on somatic cell nuclear transfer, are they wrong? Is there something there that HHS and this administration sees that says they won't be successful? Mr. ALLEN.
We believe that there is something that the research, thus far--I think the discussion earlier was in the area of where we have seen some of this occur is in the stem cell research area where there was use of embryonic stem cells for Parkinson's and Alzheimers that had very deleterious effects on the individuals that the therapies were used on.
In this area, we believe also that we need to be very careful, extremely careful, of going down that road because of the impact not only on the mother and child that may be produced as a result of cloning, but also the impact that it has on society.
There are psychological; there are also moral---- Mr. BURR.
Is this a policy decision or is this a scientific decision? Mr. ALLEN.
We believe that it is a policy decision that is based on the science.
And that is why I think, contrary to the---- Mr. BURR.
Who made this decision? Mr. ALLEN.
This is the decision of the President and the Secretary of Health---- Mr. BURR.
And they made---- Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] and Human Services.
Mr. BURR. [continuing] that decision, when? Mr. ALLEN.
I am here providing that position.
Mr. BURR.
I know you are here delivering the message today.
When did they make the decision? When did you and the Secretary have a conversation relative to this decision? VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 43 Mr. ALLEN.
My conversation--again, I have been on-board all of 2 weeks, so I will have--I would have talked with the---- Mr. BURR.
Well, clearly, it must have---- Mr. ALLEN.
--Secretary during that time.
Mr. BURR. [continuing] happened sometime in that period.
Mr. ALLEN.
So, it happened within that period.
I cannot speak specifically for when the President made his mind up about this issue.
I do know that---- Mr. BURR.
Do we condone---- Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] when the---- Mr. BURR.
Do we condone the research that is currently going on in the U.K. as it relates to stem cell research? Mr. ALLEN.
I am not here to comment on the efforts of the work that is done in other countries.
We have a responsibility---- Mr. BURR.
Do we condone---- Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] for what takes place in---- Mr. BURR.
If they were to--if they were to---- Mr. ALLEN.
If I may---- Mr. BURR. [continuing] make legal---- Mr. ALLEN. [continuing]
Again, that is something that is left for the British Government and its citizens to decide what is in their best interest and what is---- Mr. BURR.
So, if they---- Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] appropriate for them.
It is not for us to decide.
Mr. BURR.
If they passed a law that made legal human cloning, we would not come out in this country in opposition to human cloning in the U.K.? Mr. ALLEN.
Again, I see no reason why I should provide a position to comment on what the U.K. has done or is doing.
I think it is imperative that, from our perspective, we look at what the United States does.
The United States is a leader in the world, both morally--serving as a moral force, as well as looking at science and the advancement of it.
And we believe, at this time, that this the wrong-headed to---- Mr. BURR.
Would one conclude that the administration sees no scientific value out of additional research in stem cell nuclear transfer? Mr. ALLEN.
That is incorrect.
Mr. BURR.
They do see promise? Mr. ALLEN.
The administration believes that it is inappropriate at this time for us to proceed forward with research in this area.
Mr. BURR.
Do they see promise in this area, or do they see no promise? Mr. ALLEN.
I am not sure that I can give you an either/or.
I think that certainly---- Mr. BURR.
Well, it is a scientific question.
Mr. ALLEN. [continuing] we believe that there is promise---- Mr. BURR. [continuing]
The application to humans at that point is something that we would certainly need to look at and consider.
That is, again, the reason why we believe that the Weldon-Stupak bill provides for the vehicle through which further analysis, further review, and further comments to be made on that area.
Mr. BURR.
Mr. Chairman, I am sorry that I wasn't here for the full discussion.
And I am sure I will have follow-up questions.
I would ask unanimous consent that we be allowed to send those directly to the Agency? Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Without objection, that is the case.
I think that ends this portion of the hearing, Mr. Allen.
We appreciate your being here.
Obviously, there will be questions that will be forwarded to you.
We would request timely responses.
It is a tough issue, and I am not sure that anybody has really counted votes in terms of either piece of legislation as they may be re-molded.
But I would like to think that we are intent on moving, at some point, on this issue.
So, please take a little bit of leadership on it, and work with the principals.
Mr. ALLEN.
Certainly, we--and we look forward to working with the members.
Thank you.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Thank you.
Thank you very much, sir.
The second panel consists of Mr. Thomas Okarma, President of the Geron Corporation, here on behalf of the bio-tech industry; Dr. Leon Kass, Addie Clark Harding Professor of Social Thought and the College from the University of Chicago; Mr. Louis Guenin, lecturer on ethics and science with the Department of Microbiology and Molecular Genetics, Harvard Medical School; Dr. Stuart Newman, Professor of Cell Biology and Anatomy for the Department of Cell Biology and Anatomy, New York Medical College; Mr. Dan Perry, Executive Director of Alliance--with the Alliance for Aging Research; Ms. Judy Norsigian, Executive Director of the Boston Women's Health Book Collective-Collective, associated with Boston University, Boston University School of Public Health; Mr. Richard Doerflinger, Associate Director for Policy Development with the National Conference of Catholic Bishops; and Mr. Francis Fukuyama, Omer L. and Nancy Hirst Professor of Public Policy for the School of Public Policy at George Mason University.
Lady and--where is Ms. Norsigian? Ms. Norsigian and gentlemen, welcome.
Thank you so much for being here.
You have had to sit through 2 hours of this.
But believe me, that is not really a long period of time when you take into consideration how we function up here and the usual interruptions we have running in for votes.
But we do have a little bit of a break in the sense that there is a recess on the floor.
So, hopefully, we can go uninterrupted, for a short period of time anyhow, and maybe complete it.
Your written statement is a part of the record.
We will set the clock at 5 minutes.
Hopefully, you can complete your statement VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 45 within that period of time.
If you go over for a short period of time, I won't call you on it.
But I would appreciate it if you would compliment and supplement your written statement.
We will start off with Mr. Okarma.
Please proceed, sir.
STATEMENTS OF THOMAS OKARMA, PRESIDENT, GERON CORPORATION, ON BEHALF OF BIOTECHNOLOGY INDUSTRY ORGANIZATION; LEON R. KASS, ADDIE CLARK HARDING PROFESSOR OF SOCIAL THOUGHT AND THE COLLEGE, UNIVERSITY OF CHICAGO; LOUIS M. GUENIN, LECTURER ON ETHICS IN SCIENCE, DEPARTMENT OF MICROBIOLOGY AND MOLECULAR GENETICS, HARVARD MEDICAL SCHOOL; STUART A. NEWMAN, PROFESSOR OF CELL BIOLOGY AND ANATOMY, DEPARTMENT OF CELL BIOLOGY AND ANATOMY, NEW YORK MEDICAL COLLEGE; DANIEL PERRY, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, ALLIANCE FOR AGING RESEARCH; JUDY NORSIGIAN, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, BOSTON WOMEN'S HEALTH BOOK COLLECTIVE, BOSTON UNIVERSITY SCHOOL OF PUBLIC HEALTH; RICHARD M. DOERFLINGER, ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR FOR POLICY DEVELOPMENT, NATIONAL CONFERENCE OF CATHOLIC BISHOPS; AND FRANCIS FUKUYAMA, OMER L. AND NANCY HIRST PROFESSOR OF PUBLIC POLICY, THE SCHOOL OF PUBLIC POLICY, GEORGE MASON UNIVERSITY Mr. OKARMA.
Good afternoon.
I am Tom Okarma, President and CEO of Geron Corporation in Menlo Park, California.
Geron is a biopharmaceutical company focusing on discovering, developing, and commercializing therapeutic and diagnostic products in oncology, drug discovery and regenerative medicine.
Today, I am testifying on behalf of my company and the Biotechnology Industry Organization.
BIO represents more than 950 biotechnology companies, academic institutions, State bio-tech centers, and related organizations in all 50 U.S. States and 33 other nations.
Mr. Chairman and members of the subcommittee, thank you for the opportunity to testify today at this important meeting on cloning.
In my testimony today, I would like to make three points.
First, Geron Corporation, BIO, and the overwhelming portion of scientists and physicians oppose human reproductive cloning of human beings.
Second, however in our shared zeal to prevent reproductive cloning, we must not prevent research on tissue cloning, which is fundamental to enable the development of safe and effective cellular transplant patient therapies that could, and we predict will, revolutionize medicine.
Third, the objective of the research is to develop a scalable process to enable the direct conversion of a somatic or body cell into a pluripotent cell without consuming oocytes and without generating embryos.
Such a process would allow the generation of transplantable replacement cells that would not be rejected by the immune system.
First, ban reproductive cloning.
It would be extremely dangerous to attempt human reproductive cloning.
It took over 270 attempts before Dolly was successfully cloned.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 46 In fact, in most animals, reproductive cloning is no better than a three to 5 percent success rate; that is, very few of the cloned animal embryos implanted in a surrogate mother animal survive.
The others either die in utero, sometimes at very late stages of pregnancy, or die soon after birth.
It is simply unacceptable to subject humans to those risks.
To allow human reproductive cloning would be irresponsible.
Worse yet, it could lead to a back-lash that would stifle the numerous beneficial applications of therapeutic cloning technology, some of which I will now describe.
It is critical, therefore, to distinguish the use of cloning technology to create a new human beings from other appropriate and important uses of the technology, such as cloning specific human cells, genes, and tissues that do not and cannot lead to a cloned human being.
The full potential of this technology comes from its use in regenerative medicine.
Many diseases result in the disruption of cellular function or the destruction of tissue.
Heart attacks, stroke, diabetes, are all examples of common conditions in which critical cells are lost to disease.
Today's medicine is completely unable to restore this loss of function.
Regenerative medicine is a new therapeutic paradigm that holds the potential to cause an individual's currently malfunctioning cells to begin to function properly again, or even to replace dead or irreparably damaged cells with fresh, healthy ones, thereby restoring organ function.
The goal of the research is to produce transplantable cells that provide these benefits without triggering immune rejection of the transplanted cells.
This could be used to treat numerous diseases such as diabetes, heart disease, stroke, Parkinson's disease, and spinal cord injury.
For example, today, we have learned how to turn undifferentiated human pluripotent stem cells into human neurons, human liver cells, and human heart muscle cells.
These human replacement cells function normally in vitro, raising the possibility for their application in the treatment of devastating diseases affecting these tissue types.
This would, for example, allow patients with heart disease to receive new heart muscle cells that would improve heart function.
Cellular cloning techniques are a critical and necessary step in the production of sufficient quantities of vigorous replacement cells for the clinical treatment of patients.
Somatic cell nuclear transfer research is essential if we are to achieve our goals in regenerative medicine.
We must understand the biological properties of the egg cell and the transferred nucleus that cause a differentiated cell to turn into a pluripotent one.
This process is called ``reprogramming,'' and we are still not sure how it works, which is why we need to perform the research.
At Geron, our aim is to harness and therapeutically apply the power of this biology.
Once we fully understand reprogramming, we will be able to develop specific cells for transplantation without immune rejection.
We will do that by taking a differentiated cell from a particular patient, reprogramming it back to form a pluripotent cell from VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 47 which we can produce the differentiated cells we need for transplantation back into that individual.
By using the patient's own cells as starting material, we will avoid complications due to immune response rejection.
However, this is precisely the research that would be banned by the Weldon bill.
Because the Weldon bill does not distinguish between reproductive cloning and the use of cloning for research purposes, it will cutoff this work and prevent its therapeutic applications from reaching patients.
In contrast, the bipartisan bill introduced by Representatives Greenwood and Deutsch and others bans reproductive cloning appropriately, but allows the continuation of research.
BIO supports Greenwood-Deutsch because it strikes the appropriate balance between prohibiting acts that are unsafe and unethical, while promoting vital medical research.
Last, it is critical to emphasize that once we understand the molecular biology of reprogramming, we will no longer need to use egg cells or to create blastocysts.
The commercial process envisioned would transform a somatic cell, such as a skin cell, into a pluripotent cell directly, without the use of oocytes or the creation of blastocysts.
Moreover, understanding the biology of reprogramming is a critical step to improve the usefulness of so-called adult stem cells.
Ironically, the Weldon bill will also be a set-back for adult stem cell research.
In conclusion, Mr. Chairman, human reproductive cloning remains unsafe, and the ethical issues it raises have not been reasonably resolved.
It should be prohibited.
However, as Congress seeks to outlaw reproductive cloning, it must not write legislation that will stop research using cloning technology.
Unfortunately, the Weldon bill fails that test.
Simply put, enactment of the Weldon bill will stop critical therapeutic research in its tracks.
Only Greenwood-Deutsch strikes the right balance.
Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Thomas Okarma follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF THOMAS OKARMA, PRESIDENT AND CEO, GERON CORPORATION ON BEHALF OF THE BIOTECHNOLOGY INDUSTRY ORGANIZATION Good afternoon.
My name is Thomas Okarma.
I am the President and CEO of Geron Corporation in Menlo Park, California.
Geron is a biopharmaceutical company focused on discovering, developing, and commercializing therapeutic and diagnostic products for applications in oncology, drug discovery and regenerative medicine.
Geron's product development programs are based upon three patented core technologies: telomerase, human pluripotent stem cells, and nuclear transfer.
I am testifying today on behalf of my company and the Biotechnology Industry Organization (BIO).
BIO represents more than 950 biotechnology companies, academic institutions, state biotechnology centers and related organizations in all 50 U.S. states and 33 other nations.
BIO members are involved in the research and development of health care, agricultural, industrial and environmental biotechnology products.
Mr. Chairman, and members of the Subcommittee, thank you for the opportunity to testify today at this important hearing on cloning.
Let me start by making our position perfectly clear: BIO opposes human reproductive cloning.
It is simply too dangerous technically and raises far too many ethical and social questions.
That's why BIO wrote to President Bush earlier this year and urged him to extend the voluntary moratorium on human reproductive cloning which was instituted in 1997.
I would respectfully ask for this letter to be included in the hearing record.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 48 It would be extremely dangerous to attempt human reproductive cloning.
It took over 270 attempts before Dolly was successfully cloned.
In fact, in most animals, reproductive cloning has no better than a 3-5% success rate.
That is, very few of the cloned animal embryos implanted in a surrogate mother animal survive.
The others either die in utero--sometimes at very late stages of pregnancy--or die soon after birth.
Only in cattle have we begun to achieve some improvements in efficiency.
However, scientists have been attempting to clone many other species for the past 15 years with no success at all.
Thus, we cannot extrapolate the data from the handful of species in which reproductive cloning is now possible to humans.
This underlines that this would be an extremely dangerous procedure.
It is simply unacceptable to subject humans to those risks.
Rogue and grandstanding so-called scientists who claim they can--and will--clone humans for reproductive purposes insult the hundreds of thousands of responsible, reputable scientists who are working hard to find new therapies and cures for millions of individuals suffering from a wide range of genetic diseases and conditions.
The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) has publicly stated that it has jurisdiction over human reproductive cloning experiments and that it will not approve them.
BIO supports that view and hopes that the next FDA commissioner--whoever that might be--will assert FDA's current statutory authority forcefully.
There are also many ethical concerns raised by the specter of cloning.
As noted in BIO's letter to the President, ``Cloning humans challenges some of our most fundamental concepts about ourselves as social and spiritual beings.
These concepts include what it means to be a parent, a brother, a sister and a family.
``While in our daily lives we may know identical twins, we have never experienced identical twins different in age or, indeed, different in generation.
As parents, we watch with wonder and awe as our children develop into unique adults.
Cloning humans could create different expectations.
Children undoubtedly would be evaluated based on the life, health, character and accomplishments of the donor who provides the genetic materials to be duplicated.
Indeed, these factors may be the very reasons for someone wanting to clone a human being.''
As you can see, Mr. Chairman, many of these issues strike at the heart of beliefs and values that are inherent in the human condition.
What does it mean to be an individual? How should we view our parents, brothers, sisters, and children? How does the world around us influence our intellectual, physical and spiritual development? These are just a few of the questions raised by human cloning.
In my view, reproductive cloning would devalue human beings by depriving them of their own uniqueness.
To allow human reproductive cloning would be irresponsible.
Worse yet, it could lead to a backlash that would stifle the numerous beneficial applications of therapeutic cloning technology--some of which I will describe today--that could lead to cures and treatments for some of our most deadly and disabling diseases.
BENEFICIAL USES OF CLONING TECHNOLOGY It is critical to distinguish use of cloning technology to create a new human being (reproductive cloning) from other appropriate and important uses of the technology such as cloning specific human cells, genes and other tissues that do not and cannot lead to a cloned human being (therapeutic cloning).
These techniques are integral to the production of breakthrough medicines, diagnostics and vaccines to treat many diseases.
They could also produce replacement skin, cartilage and bone tissue for burn and accident victims, and result in ways to regenerate retinal and spinal cord tissue.
Let me briefly explaining a cloning technology--somatic cell nuclear transfer--and how it is used for research purposes.
First, the nucleus of an egg cell is removed.
In its place, we insert the nucleus of an already differentiated cell (a cell that performs a specific function in the body).
Chemicals are added to stimulate the egg to start dividing.
At about 3-5 days, a blastocyst is formed which contains an inner cell mass comprised of undifferentiated, pluripotent cells.
These cells are removed and used for research.
The research value of these cells is enormous.
These stem cells have the potential to form any cell in the body and can replicate indefinitely.
Studies in animals demonstrate that this could lead to cures and treatments for millions of Americans who suffer from diseases and disabilities such as diabetes, stroke, Parkinson's Disease, heart disease, and spinal cord injury.
As exciting as that is--it's only a part of the story.
The full potential of this technology comes from its use in regenerative medicine.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 49 REGENERATIVE MEDICINE Many diseases result in the disruption of cellular function or destruction of tissue.
Heart attacks, strokes, and diabetes are examples of common conditions in which critical cells are lost to disease.
Today's medicine is unable to completely restore this loss of function.
Regenerative medicine, a new therapeutic paradigm, holds the potential to cause an individual's currently malfunctioning cells to begin to function properly again or even to replace dead or irreparably damaged cells with fresh healthy ones, thereby restoring organ function.
The goal of Geron's regenerative medicine program is to produce transplantable cells that provide these therapeutic benefits without triggering immune rejection of the transplanted cells.
This could be used to treat numerous chronic diseases such as diabetes, heart disease, stroke, Parkinson's Disease and spinal cord injury.
At Geron, therapeutic cloning technology is one of the techniques we use to create pure populations of functional new cells that can replace damaged cells in the body.
For example, we are learning how to turn undifferentiated human pluripotent stem cells into neurons, liver cells and heart muscle cells.
Thus far, these human replacement cells appear to function normally in vitro, raising the possibility for their application in the treatment of devastating chronic diseases affecting these tissue types.
This would, for instance, allow patients with heart disease to receive new heart muscle cells that would improve cardiac function.
Cellular cloning techniques are a critical and necessary step in the production of sufficient quantities of vigorous replacement cells for the clinical treatment of patients.
Somatic cell nuclear transfer research is essential if we are to achieve our goals in regenerative medicine.
We must understand the biological properties of the egg cell (and the transferred nucleus) that cause a differentiated cell to turn into a pluripotent cell.
This process is called ``re-programming''--and we're still not sure how it works.
That's why we need to continue to perform research.
At Geron, our aim is to harness and therapeutically apply the power of this biology.
Once we fully understand re-programming we will be able to develop specific cells for transplantation without immune rejection.
We'll do that by taking a differentiated cell from a particular individual and re-programming it to form a pluripotent cell from which we can produce the differentiated cells we need for transplantation back into that individual.
By using the patient's own cells as starting material, we will avoid complications due to immune response rejection.
However, this is precisely the research that would be banned by the Weldon bill.
Because the Weldon bill does not distinguish between reproductive cloning and use of cloning for research purposes, it will cut off this work and prevent its therapeutic applications from reaching patients.
In contrast, the bi-partisan bill introduced by Reps. Greenwood, Deutsch, and others bans reproductive cloning but allows the continuation of research.
BIO supports Greenwood/Deutsch because it strikes the appropriate balance between prohibiting acts that are unsafe and unethical, while promoting vital medical research.
It is important to emphasize that once we understand the molecular biology of reprogramming, we will no longer need to use egg cells or create blastocysts.
Therefore, this technology is likely to be used only for a short, finite period of time.
Moreover, understanding the biology re-programming is a critical step to improve the usefulness of adult stem cells.
Ironically, therefore, the Weldon bill will also be a setback to adult stem cell research.
CONCLUSION As the current Congress pursues legislative prohibitions on human reproductive cloning, we urge caution and a distinction between reproductive and therapeutic cloning.
We all agree that given the current safety and social factors, human reproductive cloning is repugnant.
However, it is critical that in our enthusiasm to prevent reproductive cloning, we not ban vital research, turning wholly legitimate biomedical researchers into outlaws, and thus squelching the hope of relief for millions of suffering individuals.
Our nation is on the cusp of reaping the long dreamed of rewards from our significant investment in biomedical research.
The U.S. biotech industry is the envy of much of the world, especially our ability to turn basic research at NIH and universities into applied research at biotech companies and in turn, into new therapies and cures for individual patients.
Using somatic cell nuclear transfer and other cloning technologies, biotech researchers will continue to learn about cell differentiation, re-programming, and other areas of cell and molecular biology.
Armed with this information, they can eventually crack the codes of diseases and conditions that have plagued us for hundreds of years, indeed, for millennia.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 50 In conclusion, Mr. Chairman, human reproductive cloning remains unsafe, and the ethical issues it raises have not been reasonably resolved.
It should be prohibited.
However, as Congress seeks to outlaw reproductive cloning, it must not write legislation that will stop research using cloning technology.
Unfortunately, the Weldon bill fails that test.
Simply put, enactment of the Weldon bill will stop critical therapeutic research in its tracks.
Only Greenwood/Deutsch strikes the right balance.
Thank you for the opportunity to testify.
I'll be happy to answer any questions.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Thank you.
Dr. Kass, please proceed, sir.
STATEMENT OF LEON R. KASS Mr. KASS.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for the opportunity to testify before the subcommittee.
I am Leon Kass.
I am a professor at the University of Chicago.
I have been professionally concerned for over 30 years with the ethical implications of biomedical technologies.
These technologies have now brought us to a crucial fork in the road where we are compelled to decide whether we wish to travel down the path that leads to the brave, new world.
That, and nothing less, is what is at stake in your current deliberations about whether we should tolerate the practice of human cloning.
And if I may say so, I have heard Members of Congress say that we should be very careful not to jeopardize the health benefits that are available from research cloning.
I think we should be very careful before we take any step that might lead us in an accelerated path down this road toward the brave, new world.
Care has to be exercised on both sides.
I am here to testify in favor of a national ban on human cloning, and in particular, in favor of H.R. 1644, the Human Cloning Prohibition Act 2001, for two reasons.
First, I believe that cloning human beings is unethical, both in itself and, importantly, in what it will surely lead to.
And second, I believe that this bill offers us the best, indeed the only, reasonable chance of preventing human reproductive cloning from happening.
In the written testimony, I give the ethical arguments as to why we should object to human reproductive cloning.
Having heard no dissent on that, I will simply skip over that and take it for granted that we agree on that, and speak only about the legislative approaches.
But I do want to say one thing here.
There is more at stake in this question than the simple question of cloning, because what we would be establishing if we say yes to cloning, is that we will be establishing, as a dangerous principle, the right that we have to determine in advance the genetic make-up of our children.
If we won't--don't want to travel down that road, we want to make sure that we have an effective ban on human cloning now, before we are overtaken by events.
It is important that we do something now.
Two legislative approaches have been proposed.
One would ban only so-called reproductive cloning by prohibiting the transfer of a cloned embryo to a woman to initiate a pregnancy.
The other would ban all cloning by prohibiting the creation even of the embryonic clones.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 51 I had, once upon a time, looked for a third way, but I am now convinced that an effective ban on reproductive cloning requires a ban on all cloning, on all cloning, including the creation of the embryonic clones, and here is why.
Once the cloned embryos are produced and available in the laboratories and assisted reproduction centers, it will be virtually impossible to control what is done with them.
Stockpiles of cloned human embryos could be produced, bought and sold without anyone's knowing it.
Efforts at clonal reproduction would take place out of sight, within the privacy of the doctor/ patient relationship.
And moreover, a ban on only reproductive cloning will turn out to be unenforceable.
Should illicit cloning be discovered, governmental attempts to enforce the reproductive ban would run into a swarm of legal and practical challenges.
And the practice at that stage, I submit, would be impossible to police or regulate.
Therefore, if you are serious--anyone who is really serious about trying to prevent human reproductive cloning must seek to stop this process at the start.
Now, I believe H.R. 1644 is precisely suited to accomplish this goal, no more and no less.
It explicitly and precisely defines the specific deed that is outlawed, human somatic cell nuclear transfer to an egg, and it does not entangle us in difficult determinations of the perpetrator's intent or knowledge.
It is extremely carefully drafted and limited in its scope, and it makes it clear that there is to be no interference with scientifically and medically useful practices of animal cloning or equally valuable cloning of human DNA fragments, duplication of cells, stem cells or somatic cells, in culture.
And if enacted, this bill would bring the United States into line with the already and soon-to-be-enacted practices of many other nations.
And we should take the lead, rather than be an outlaw nation in this regard.
People who prefer the other approach, namely a ban only on the transfer of a human clone to initiate a pregnancy, will probably look with favor on the other bill before you, H.R. 2172.
But please observe; in my opinion, I think a careful consideration of the specifics of this bill shows that it does not effectively provide the ban on reproductive cloning that everyone wants.
Indeed, it does not explicitly ban reproductive cloning at all.
It prohibits only two things.
First, it prohibits the creation of the embryonic clones by people whose intent it is to begin a pregnancy; and second, it prevents people from shipping or transporting the ``cellular product resulting from this transfer,'' but only if they know that the product is intended to be used to initiate a pregnancy.
Those are the only two acts that are prohibited.
Put those two prohibitions taken together; they fail to outlaw a pregnancy initiating transfer of a cloned embryo to a woman by someone other than its manufacturer.
Indeed, nowhere in this bill, nowhere in this bill, does it specifically ban the act of reproductive transfer to a woman by anyone.
And if this bill really, seriously intended to outlaw reproductive cloning, it should have read that, ``It shall be unlawful to use the cellular product of somatic cell nuclear transfer to initiate a preg- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 52 nancy.''
It nowhere says anything that clear.
This bill fails to outlaw the attempts to create a live, born human-cloned individual.
Consider this possible scenario.
It is very clear.
I create the embryos by somatic cell nuclear transfer.
You buy them from me, and you tell me that you want them for research.
And I ship them to you, taking you at your word.
Your company changes management, or you change your mind, and they decide it is profitable to use the purchased embryos for reproductive cloning.
Under the terms of this bill, I have done nothing illegal; you have done nothing illegal, and the cloned child is born.
In brief, with all due respect, as I read the present text of the Greenwood bill, it seems to be less the Cloning Prohibition Act of 2001 and more the Human Embryo Cloning Registry and Industry Protection Act of 2001.
It is not the reproductive cloning ban the American people are looking for.
And I have some other things, some---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Please summarize, Dr. Kass.
Mr. KASS. [continuing] details.
I will just wind up.
It seems to me, as the composition of this panel of witnesses will make clear, the issue of human cloning is not an issue of pro-life or pro-choice.
It is not mainly about death and destruction.
It is not about a woman's right to choose.
It is not about stem cell research.
It is not even about the basic freedom of scientists to inquire.
It is most emphatically about baby design and manufacture.
And it is the opening skirmish in a long battle against eugenics and the post-human future.
Once the embryonic clones are produced in the laboratories, this eugenic revolution will have begun, and we will have lost our best chance to do something about it.
[The prepared statement of Leon R. Kass follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF LEON R. KASS, ADDIE CLARK HARDING PROFESSOR, COMMITTEE ON SOCIAL THOUGHT AND THE COLLEGE, THE UNIVERSITY OF CHICAGO Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for the opportunity to testify before the subcommittee.
I am Leon R. Kass, Addie Clark Harding Professor in the Committee on Social Thought and the College, The University of Chicago.
I have been professionally concerned, for over 30 years, with the ethical implications of biomedical advance.
Originally trained in both medicine and biochemistry, I remain enthusiastic about biomedical research and its promise to cure disease and relieve suffering.
Yet, as has been obvious for some time, new biotechnologies are also providing powers to intervene in human bodies and minds in ways that go beyond the traditional goals of healing the sick, to threaten fundamental changes in human nature and the meaning of our humanity.
These technologies have now brought us to a crucial fork in the road, where we are compelled to decide whether we wish to travel down the path that leads to the Brave New World.
That, and nothing less, is what is at stake in your current deliberations about whether we should tolerate the practice of human cloning.
I am here to testify in favor of a national ban on human cloning and, in particular, in favor of HR 1644, ``The Human Cloning Prohibition Act of 2001,'' for two reasons.
First, I believe that human cloning is unethical, both in itself and in what it surely leads to.
Second, I believe that this bill offers us the best--indeed, the only--reasonable chance at preventing human reproductive cloning from happening.
(The full version of my argument is contained in a recent essay, ``Preventing a Brave New World: Why We Should Ban Human Cloning Now,'' written precisely to gain support for such a bill and published in the May 21, 2001 issue of The New Republic.
I submit it as an appendix to this statement.)
The vast majority of Americans object to human cloning, and on multiple moral grounds, among them the following.
It constitutes unethical experimentation on the VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 53 child-to-be, subjecting him or her to enormous risks of bodily and developmental abnormalities.
It threatens individuality, by deliberately saddling the clone with a genotype that has already lived and to whose previous life its life will always be compared.
It confuses identity by denying the clone two biological parents and by making it the twin of its older copy.
It represents a giant step toward turning procreation into manufacture (especially when understood as the harbinger of nontherapeutic genetic manipulations to come).
And it is a radical form of parental despotism and child abuse--even when practiced freely and on a small scale.
Permitting human cloning means saying yes to the dangerous principle that we are entitled to determine and design the genetic make-up of our children.
If we do not wish to travel down this eugenic road, an effective ban on cloning human beings is needed, and needed now before we are overtaken by events.
A majority of members of Congress, I believe, are, like most Americans, opposed to human cloning.
But opposition is not enough.
For if Congress does nothing about it, we shall have human cloning, and we shall have it soon.
Congress' failure to try to stop human cloning--and by the most effective means--will in fact constitute its tacit approval.
What, then, is the most effective way to stop reproductive human cloning? Two legislative approaches competed with each other the last time Congress took up this issue.
One bill would have banned only so-called reproductive cloning by prohibiting the transfer of a cloned embryo to a woman to initiate a pregnancy.
The other bill would have banned all cloning by prohibiting the creation even of the embryonic human clones.
Both sides opposed reproductive cloning, but because of the divide over the question of embryo research we got no ban at all.
It would be tragic if we again failed to produce an effective ban on cloning human beings, especially now that certain people are going ahead with it and defying us to try to stop them.
A few years ago, I was looking for a middle way between the two alternatives that failed last time, but I am now convinced that an effective ban on reproductive cloning requires a ban on all human cloning, including the creation of the embryonic clones.
Anyone truly serious about preventing human reproductive cloning must seek to stop the process from the beginning, at the stage where the human somatic cell nucleus is introduced into the egg.
Here is why.
Once cloned human embryos are produced and available in laboratories and assisted-reproductive centers, it will be virtually impossible to control what is done with them.
Biotechnical procedures and experiments take place in laboratories, hidden from public view, and for good commercial reasons these doings are concealed from the competition and everyone else.
Huge stockpiles of cloned human embryos could thus be produced and bought and sold in the private sector without anyone knowing it.
As we have seen with in vitro embryos created to treat infertility, embryos produced for one reason can be used for another reason: today ``spare embryos'' once created to begin a pregnancy are now used--by someone else--in research, and tomorrow clones created for research will be used--by someone else-- to begin a pregnancy.
Efforts at clonal baby-making (like other forms of assistedreproduction) would take place out of sight, within the privacy of a doctor-patient relationship, making outside scrutiny extremely difficult.
Moreover, the transfer of embryos to begin a pregnancy is a simple procedure (especially compared with manufacturing the embryo in the first place), simple enough that its final steps could be self-administered by the woman, who would thus absolve the doctor of blame for having ``caused'' the illegal transfer.
Worst of all, a ban on only reproductive cloning will turn out to be unenforceable.
Should the illegal practice be detected, governmental attempts to enforce the reproductive ban would run into a swarm of practical and legal challenges, both to efforts aimed at preventing embryo transfer to the woman and--even worse--to efforts seeking to prevent birth after the transfer has occurred.
Should an ``illicit clonal pregnancy'' be discovered, no government agency is going to compel a woman to abort the clone, and there would be an understandable swarm of protest should she be fined or jailed before or after she gives birth.
For all these reasons, the only practically effective and legally sound approach is to block human cloning at the start, at the production of the embryonic clone.
Such a ban is rightly characterized not as interference with reproductive freedom, nor even as unprecedented or dangerous interference with scientific inquiry, but as an attempt to prevent the unhealthy, unsavory, and unwelcome manufacture of and traffic in human clones.
It would do what the American people want done: stop human cloning before it starts.
H.R. 1644, introduced by Dr. Weldon and joined now by more than 100 cosponsors, is just what the doctor ordered, precisely suited to accomplish this goal, no more and no less.
It explicitly and precisely describes the specific deed that is outlawed (human somatic cell nuclear transfer to an egg), and it does not entangle us VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 54 in difficult determinations of the perpetrator's intent or knowledge.
Its substantial criminal and monetary penalties will almost certainly shift the incentives for renegades who are tempted to proceed.
Extremely carefully drafted and limited in its scope, the bill makes very clear that there is to be no interference with the scientifically and medically useful practices of animal cloning or the equally valuable cloning of human DNA fragments, the duplication of somatic cells, or stem cells in tissue culture.
Moreover, if enacted this bill would bring the United States into line with the already and soon-to-be-enacted practices of other nations, and, in collaboration with these efforts, offers us the best and, I think, the only realistic chance we have of keeping human cloning from happening, or happening much.
People who prefer the other approach to stopping human cloning, namely, a ban only on transfer of an embryonic clone to initiate a pregnancy, will oppose H.R. 1644 and will probably look with favor on the other bill before this Committee, H.R. 2172, introduced last week by Reps. Greenwood and Deutsch.
But, in my opinion, a careful consideration of the specifics of this bill (as now written) shows that it does not effectively provide the ban on reproductive cloning that everyone wants.
Indeed, it does not explicitly ban reproductive cloning at all.
This bill permits the use of human somatic cell nuclear transfer technology (HSCNTT 1), the act that creates an embryonic human clone.
It prohibits (only) two things.
First, it prohibits this act by people whose intent is to begin a pregnancy.
Second, it prohibits people from shipping or transporting ``the cellular product resulting from HSCNTT,'' but only if they know that ``the product is intended to be used to initiate a pregnancy.''
These two prohibitions, even taken together, fail to outlaw a pregnancy-initiating transfer of a cloned embryo to a woman--by someone other than its manufacturer.
(Indeed, nowhere does the bill specifically ban the act of reproductive transfer to a woman by anyone.2) As a result, this bill fails to outlaw efforts to create a live-born human cloned individual.
The Greenwood-Deutsch bill places virtually no restrictions on the use of licitly produced ``cellular products'' of the technology (i.e., the embryonic clones), once they are created.
Strikingly, there is no prohibition on receiving the ``cellular product'' of HSCNTT (i.e., the embryos) with an intent to initiate a pregnancy; indeed, there is no restriction whatsoever on what the purchaser of such embryos may do with them.
Consider this possible scenario: I create embryo clones by HSCNTT.
You buy them from me, telling me that you want them for research, and I ship them to you, taking you at your word.
You change your mind (say, because your company's new management sees the prospect of gain from reproductive cloning), and you then use the purchased embryo (that you did not yourself create) to initiate a pregnancy.
Under the terms of this bill, I have done nothing illegal and neither have you, and in the meantime, the cloned child is born.
There are two further difficulties with this bill.
The two banned acts turn entirely either on intent or on foreknowledge of someone else's intent--hard matters to discern and verify.
Also, because the cloned embryo is treated like an ordinary drug whose registration with the FDA is (for obvious reasons) kept confidential, the public will be completely in the dark even about who is producing the embryo clones, much less where they are being bought and sold and who is doing what with them.
With all due respect, as I read the present text of this bill, it seems to me to be less the ``Cloning Prohibition Act of 2001'' and more the ``Human Embryo Cloning Registration and Industry Protection Act of 2001.''
It is not the reproductive cloning ban the American people are looking for.
I understand fully that some scientists and biotechnologists hope that the practice of embryo cloning would someday yield autologous tissues (and even organs) for transplantation, derivable for each person from his own embryonic twin clone, tissues useful for the treatment of serious chronic disease (so-called therapeutic cloning).
Perhaps they are right.
But we now have promising alternate routes to the same therapeutic possibilities--not only non-embryonic (so called adult) stem cells, 1 HSCNTT is defined as the act of ``transferring the nucleus of a human somatic cell into an egg cell from which the nucleus has been removed or rendered inert.''
2 Readers of the bill may see this for themselves, by substituting the statutory definition of HSCNTT [provided in SEC.
1001.
(a) (2)] into the first prohibition [SEC.
1001.
(a) (1) (A): ``It shall be unlawful to transfer or to attempt to transfer the nucleus of a human somatic cell into an egg cell from which the nucleus has been removed or rendered inert with the intent to initiate a pregnancy.''
That this is the correct meaning of what is prohibited can be confirmed by the appearance, in the description of the second prohibited act [SEC.
1001.
(a) (1) (B)], of the phrase ``cellular product resulting from HSCNTT,'' that is, the embryonic human clone.
If the bill wanted explicitly to ban the act of so-called reproductive human cloning, the first prohibition could and should have read: ``It shall be unlawful to use the cellular product of HSCNTT to initiate a pregnancy.''
Furthermore, such a proscription would have made the prohibition of shipping and transporting unnecessary.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 55 but also non-cloned embryonic stem cell lines--that do not run the risk of opening the door to human clonal reproduction (and that, it should be added, will not require commodifying women's reproductive tissues in order to provide the enormous numbers of eggs that will be needed to create the cloned embryos).
Should these other alternatives fail, and should animal cloning experiments demonstrate the unique therapeutic potential of stem cells derived from embryo cloning, Congress could later revisit this issue and consider lifting the ban on the cloning of embryos.
H.R. 1644, in fact, provides for just such a review of the relevant scientific and therapeutic possibilities, as does H.R. 2172 (the Greenwood-Deutsch bill).
As the composition of the panel of witnesses before you today makes clear, the issue of human cloning is most emphatically not an issue of pro-life versus prochoice.
It is not mainly about death and destruction, and it is not about a woman's right to choose.
It is only and emphatically about baby design and manufacture, the opening skirmish of a long battle against eugenics and against the post-human future.
Once embryonic clones are produced in laboratories, the eugenic revolution will have begun, and we will have lost our best chance to do anything about it.
The present danger posed by human cloning is, paradoxically, also a golden opportunity.
The prospect of cloning, so repulsive to contemplate, is the occasion for deciding whether we shall be slaves of unregulated innovation and, ultimately, its artifacts, or whether we shall remain free human beings who guide our medical powers toward the enhancement of human dignity.
The preservation of the humanity of the human future is now in our hands.
Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Thank you very much, sir.
Guenin--is that correct? GUENIN.
Guenin.
BILIRAKIS.
Mr. Guenin.
Thank you, you may proceed.
STATEMENT OF LOUIS M. GUENIN Mr. GUENIN.
Mr. Chairman and members of the subcommittee, I am Louis Guenin of the Department of Microbiology and Molecular Genetics at Harvard Medical School where my field of work is ethics.
In order to assist the subcommittee, the talk that I should like to set for myself is to unmask the compelling, but sometimes overlooked grounds for moral approval of non-reproductive somatic cell nuclear transfer.
I shall emphasize that we should insist for every moral view on an analysis faithful to that view's fundamental commitments; and that from such an analysis, we find that moral views that are sometimes invoked against this research, in fact, pronounce it not only permissible, but virtuous.
So, I shall be speaking about the instrumental use of embryos; that is the use of embryos as means, not ends in themselves.
We may distinguish two sets of embryos for this purpose.
The first consists of embryos that are produced by in vitro fertilization for the purpose of pregnancy.
And the second consists of those produced by in vitro fertilization or somatic cell nuclear transfer solely for the purpose of medical treatment or research.
We may say that the elements of that first set are created by reproductive embryo creation, and that making elements of the second set is an instance of non-reproductive embryo creation.
I use that expression instead of the word ``cloning,'' because in this instance, although the genome of the supposed donor is, in fact, copied, the nuclear donor is not, himself or herself, copied.
There is never an offspring.
So, the question is whether it is moral to use an embryo as means.
Some readers of the philosopher Kant would believe that that question answers itself because Kant teaches us to ``use hu- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 56 manity... always at the same time as an end, never simply as a means.''
But for Kant, ``humanity'' includes only rational beings.
And the subject of current scientific interest consists of microscopic embryos that do not have brains and are not rational.
What we may do with them, according to Kantian morality, would follow from the command that we--that we, as universal beings, act on universal laws, that we can will without contradicting ourselves.
One such law, holds Kant, states a duty to aid others.
There is no contradiction in willing that scientists should relieve suffering, and that the rest of us should join in supporting him by using donated, unenabled embryos.
The developmental potential of an embryo becomes ``enabled,'' as I use that expression, if and only if the embryo enters a woman's reproductive system.
The boundary of the human body separates enabled from unenabled embryos.
I would like to identify a set of unenabled embryos that is permissible to use as means.
Suppose that Mary wants to help others by donating--donating to research or therapy an embryo created in an earlier attempt at pregnancy, or an egg designed to be used in somatic cell nuclear transfer.
She, thereupon, issues instructions that prohibit the--prohibit reproduction; that is, she prohibits the embryo be implanted in a uterus.
And she also prohibits nurture of the embryo for more than 14 days.
That period of time is important because until the 14th day, an embryo can split, forming twins, and any twins can recombine.
So, in view of that, there is not the individuation of a person.
In the words of the late Harvard philosopher W.V. Quine, ``No entity without identity.''
Consider also the case of Michael, who suffers from Parkinson's disease.
He contributes a somatic cell for the purpose of enabling a autologous transplant; that is, a transplant to him of cells bearing his own genome.
And he imposes the same restrictions as does Mary.
For an unenabled and unindividuated embryo donated by someone like Mary or Michael, whether from a fertility clinic or created solely for research or therapy, I use the term ``epidosembryo''.
This comes from the Green ``epidosis'' for a beneficence to the common weal.
The donation of such an embryo is a generous act, but we have to ask still whether it is permissible for scientists to use it.
Enablement of an embryo, as I have described it, is an entirely discretionary act.
No woman is obliged to undergo intrauterine transfer of an embryo.
The instructions that are issued by donors of epidosembryos conclusively foreclose any chance that the embryos will become babies.
They will never be enabled.
The instructions allow research or therapy and nothing else.
And that is a decision that the donors make, not the recipients.
Therefore, there is no possible person that corresponds to such an embryo.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 57 Moreover, an early stage embryo, so small that it is invisible to the naked eye, lacks the sensory apparatus to feel pleasure or pain.
Because the use of such an embryo cannot thwart the actualization of any possible person, because an embryo cannot suffer any discomfort, it is permissible to use the embryo in aid of others.
Some witnesses will be objecting that it is wrong to create an embryo for some purpose other than procreation.
According to a previously influential teleological view that trances to Aristotle, in every creature, every cell has a purpose.
And we, today, even think that, in many cases, we know what the purpose is.
It is a short step, then, to say that this notion of a mapping of cells to purposes is not purely of human origin, but perhaps of divine.
And thereupon, some would object to highjacking cells to be used for some purpose other than their ordained purpose.
But we mortals formerly thought that bone marrow was used only to nurture bone.
And now, we know that it is the factory for the manufacture of blood.
We used to think that kidneys exist only for benefit of those that enclose them.
And now, we think it virtuous to donate one's kidney.
We know that oocytes, when they are fertilized, develop into children, or at least some of them do.
But who of us can say that sexual reproduction is the sole end that an oocyte may permissibly serve.
Even assuming that the biological function of an oocyte were singular and known, it does not follow that it is immoral to deploy it for some other purpose.
Nor is it obvious that a moral wrong occurs if an embryo dies without implanting in the uterus.
Embryos die in that manner, in vivo, all the time.
And we do not treat their passing as the death of a person.
Now, to take an explicitly religious point of view, suppose that we could have a conversation with God about this.
We tell him that we have discovered stem cells and, furthermore, we have discovered somatic cell nuclear therapy.
I suspect his first reaction might be gently to tease us that it took a few thousand years to get here.
But to be serious about it, I think he would commend us for an attempt to help others.
In view of what is known as the second greatest of the Commandments, I suspect he would praise epidosembryo donors.
I doubt that he would stand on metaphysics about early stage microscopic embryos, but rather wish us---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
If you could summarize, Mr. Guenin? Mr. GUENIN.
Yes, Mr. Chairman--rather wish us to use our abilities to relieve suffering.
The burden of my testimony, I would therefore conclude, is that it would disserve the cause of morality, disserve our fulfillment of our duty to aid those who suffer if any government action were to thwart non-reproductive somatic cell nuclear transfer.
When I speak of morality, I refer to the intersection of the leading moral views of our time on this kernel, that it is virtuous to relieve suffering in actual lives when we may do so at no cost in potential lives.
In my written statement, I would just mention that I make the following further points: that Catholicism should be counted as an VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 58 ally of this research, not an opponent.
This relates to its fundamental belief in the duty to relieve suffering.
And the fact that the thesis of zygotic personhood draws Catholicism into contradiction not only of its 18th Century-long belief otherwise, but of its fundamental belief in soul, I suggest that it is misleading to conflate the abortion of an enabled conceptus with experiment on an unenabled conceptus.
And I make some points of Constitutional and drafting about the pending legislation.
I suggest---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
In your written statement? Mr. GUENIN.
Pardon me? Mr. BILIRAKIS.
In your written statement, you make---- Mr. GUENIN.
Yes.
Mr. BILIRAKIS. [continuing] those points? Mr. GUENIN.
Yes.
If I may just close with this, final---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Please close.
Mr. GUENIN. [continuing] sentence, Mr. Chairman? I suggest there that a sensible prescription would prohibit ``transfer to a uterus of an embryo created by somatic cell nuclear transfer.''
That would paint, without using too broad a brush.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
[The prepared statement of Louis M. Guenin follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF LOUIS M. GUENIN, DEPARTMENT OF MICROBIOLOGY MOLECULAR GENETICS, HARVARD MEDICAL SCHOOL AND Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, the task that I should like to set for myself, in order to assist the Subcommittee in its consideration of legislation against human cloning, is to unmask the compelling grounds for moral approval of nonreproductive somatic cell nuclear transfer (``SCNT'').
The method leading to the conclusions that I shall offer is simple to describe though somewhat difficult to execute.
It consists first in probing moral views until we have passed beyond phrases and aspirations to the most fundamental commitments of each.
It then requires us to construct a moral analysis faithful to each view.
I shall emphasize that if we insist on this regimen, we shall find that even moral views thus far invoked against nonreproductive SCNT commend it as not only permissible but virtuous.
1.
EMBRYO SUBJECTS I shall be speaking about the instrumental treatment of embryos, the use of embryos as means rather than as ends in themselves.
An embryo treated instrumentally is an ``embryo subject.''
We may distinguish two sets of embryo subjects: (a) a set A each element of which is an embryo created by in vitro fertilization (``IVF'') for the purpose of pregnancy, and (b) a set B each element of which is an embryo created by IVF or SCNT solely for the purpose of medical treatment or research.
We may say that elements of A are created by ``reproductive embryo creation,'' and those of B by ``nonreproductive embryo creation,'' the latter standing for any process of embryo creation for a purpose other than producing a baby.
I do not use the term ``cloning'' for nonreproductive embryo creation by SCNT (``nonreproductive SCNT'') because in that process, no copy of the nucleus donor ever develops.
No infant is born.
Only the donor's nuclear genome is copied.
Nonreproductive embryo creation does not risk deformed or socially anomalous offspring or like problems that may trouble us about reproductive use of SCNT in humans (``reproductive cloning'').
2.
KANT'S MORALITY AS PROPONENT, NOT OPPONENT, OF EMBRYO USE In considering elements of A or B as research subjects, we encounter a different problem.
Is it moral to use an embryo as a means? Some readers of Kant have thought that this question answers itself.
The second form of Kant's categorical imperative, embraced by many religious traditions, bids us to ``use humanity... always at the same time as an end, never simply as a means.''
But as I have explained elsewhere (``Morals and Primordials,'' Science 292: 1659-1660 [2001], copy attached), by ``humanity'' Kant understands only rational beings.
The early stage embryo sub- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 59 jects of current scientific interest are microscopic.
They do not have brains, they are not rational.
For Kantian guidance on how we must act with respect to any nonrational being, we must look to a more general principle.
That is the command that we as rational beings act only on those maxims that, without contradicting ourselves, we can will as universal laws.
One such law, Kant holds, states a duty of mutual aid.
When we imagine that we stand seriatim in the shoes of our fellows who suffer from diseases that we might cure, we do not contradict ourselves in willing that we collectively support biomedical scientists in the relief of suffering by use of donated unenabled embryos.
3.
THE EPIDOSEMBRYO SUBJECT, AN UNENABLED UNINDIVIDUATED EMBRYO TO WHICH NO POSSIBLE PERSON CORRESPONDS Let me explain enablement, the key concept that I have introduced here.
I say that the developmental potential of an embryo becomes enabled if and only if the embryo enters a woman's reproductive system (either fallopian tubes or uterus).
The boundary of the human body separates enabled embryos from unenabled embryos.
I shall describe, if I may, a set of unenabled embryos that one may permissibly use as means.
Suppose that Mary wants to help others by donating to research or therapy (a) an embryo produced from one of her eggs in an earlier fertility procedure or (b) an unfertilized egg for use in SCNT.
In her donative instructions, given to the physician who recovered the egg from her, she prohibits reproduction.
She forbids intrauterine embryo transfer and she also prohibits ex utero embryo nurture for more than fourteen days.
The fourteen day constraint assures that neither research nor therapy will use a person as means.
How is that so? Until day 14, any embryo can split, forming twins, and until day 14, twins can recombine, neither mother nor physician being the wiser.
Thus until the end of the first fortnight, identity of an individual is not established, and hence it does not make sense to say that there exists a new person.
``No entity,'' said the late philosopher W.V. Quine, ``without identity.''
Consider also the case of Michael, a victim of Parkinson's disease.
Michael arranges with his physician for a somatic cell to be removed from Michael's body so that via SCNT, that cell's nucleus may be used to generate embryonic stem cells of Michael's own genome, thereby enabling an autologous transplant.
Michael imposes the same embryo restrictions as does Mary.
For an unenabled unindividuated embryo donated by someone like Mary or Michael, I use the term epidosembryo.
I derive this word from the Greek epidosis for a beneficence to the common weal.
In the relief of suffering, epidosembryos enable the bounteous possibilities of stem cell research and cellular reprogramming.
(Here I describe the general concept of an epidosembryo, whether of set A or B.
The discussion in ``Morals and Primordials'' principally concerns epidosembryos from A.)
For the following reasons, it is morally permissible to use an epidosembryo.
Enablement is an entirely discretionary act.
No woman is obligated to undergo intrauterine transfer of an embryo.
Instructions issued by epidosembryo donors conclusively foreclose any chance of enabling the embryos.
The instructions specify research or therapy, and nothing else.
Hence there exists no chance that an epidosembryo will become an infant.
Therefore no possible person corresponds to such an embryo.
To this we add that any early stage embryo--each so small as to be invisible to the naked eye--lacks the sensory apparatus to feel pleasure or pain.
Because use of an epidosembryo cannot thwart the actualization of any possible person--no possible person corresponds to the embryo--and because the embryo cannot experience frustration or discomfort, it is permissible to use an epidosembryo in aid of others.
Because we owe profound respect to any human life form, especially embryos, we cannot use embryos for frivolous means.
But the hopes of scientists for embryo research are far from frivolous.
First, from work on stem cells science may be able to overcome juvenile-onset diabetes, Parkinson's, Alzheimer's, muscular dystrophy, and other diseases, and to accelerate drug development by supplying for testing normal human cells in lieu of abnormal and animal tissues.
Second, in SCNT we anticipate a stem cell possibility that embryos donated from fertility clinics cannot provide.
In SCNT we have an ingenious means for obtaining transplantable cells of the patient's own nuclear genome.
Such an autologous, histocompatible transplant is the holy grail of cell replacement therapy.
For efficiency's sake, instead of creating cells of each patient's genome whenever needed, SCNT might be used in the project of creating a bank of embryonic stem cell lines.
Scientists would culture one line for each of the more common alleles of the major histocompatibility complex (the set of genes that code for antigens, the structures that signal whether a cell is self or nonself).
Or into cells from an embryonic stem cell line, scientists might by VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 60 transgenesis insert a given patient's own version of the complex.
Each of these strategies in principle could issue in transplantable cells that surmount the vexing problem that a patient's immune system rejects anything that it does not recognize as self.
Third, SCNT also constitutes our hope for knowledge of how a cell's reprogramming can occur.
If we can find out how reprogramming occurs in an egg following SCNT--we know that it does occur, but do not know the details--clinicians might learn how to induce reprogramming of adult patients' cells.
In such case we have the exciting prospect of inducing specialized cells in the adult to differentiate into developmentally much earlier cells that patients desperately need.
Even neurons might be regenerated.
4.
REPLY TO OBJECTIONS CONCERNING USE OF EPIDOSEMBRYOS Let me address two likely objections to what I have said about unenabled embryos.
(a) It might be argued that an embryo outside the body possesses a potential to become an infant and that we just happen to observe it at a preimplantation stage, a stage through which passes every embryo that becomes a neonate.
But embryos passing through that stage inside a woman's body have a nontrivial chance of implanting in the uterus.
Epidosembryos have no such chance.
That is to say that they have less chance of becoming babies than do the gametes of a man and woman who have never met.
Most of us would approve experiments on gametes--even though each contains half the genome of a possible person.
For moral purposes, some cells and cell masses are possible persons, others are not.
(b) Still it will be objected that the reason that embryos created by SCNT have a zero chance of becoming babies is that someone created them with precisely that fate in mind, and that it is wrong to create an embryo with no thought of procreation.
(This is the moral objection peculiar to nonreproductive embryo creation in contrast with use of epidosembryos from fertility clinics.)
Here I think that one can put one's finger on the view that may explain much of the reluctance understandably voiced concerning the challenged use of embryos.
According to a previously influential teleology originating with Aristotle, some purpose obtains for every cell type, every structure.
At various times in history, it has been thought that for many a cell and structure in the human, we humans know what the purpose is.
It is a short step from there to the notion that the mapping of cells to purposes is not an accident but a divine design.
Whereupon some would object to hijacking cells for purposes other than those ordained.
Who can know the mind of God on this? We mortals formerly thought that the sole purpose of bone marrow is to nurture bone.
Now we look upon the marrow as the factory where blood cells are manufactured.
We used to think that kidneys exist solely for benefit of those enclosing them, and now we recognize the virtuousness of donating one's kidney to another.
We know that oocytes when fertilized develop into children, but who is to say that sexual reproduction is the sole end that oocytes may permissibly serve? Even assuming that the natural function of a cell were both singular and known, it does not follow that it would be immoral to deploy it for another purpose.
Nor it is obvious that a moral wrong occurs if embryos die without implanting in a uterus.
The majority of embryos do die in such manner.
We do not treat their passing as the deaths of persons.
Let me take up a religious point of view.
If we could have a conversation with God, is it plausible that He would tell us never to fertilize an egg except for purposes of creating a baby? If we informed Him that we had discovered stem cells, and had invented SCNT, He might first gently tease us that it took us a few thousand years to discover these things.
As for what we should make of them, we may recall what Christianity teaches as the second greatest of the commandments, and the Golden Rule as embraced by virtually all religions.
I suspect that God would commend epidosembryo donors.
I suspect that He would not stand on metaphysics about microscopic embryos, but would wish us to use our humble abilities to relieve suffering--an effort that expresses esteem for life--when we have happened upon a way to do so in which we do not prevent the existence of any possible person who would otherwise become actual.
He would know that children will not result from the use of epidosembryos as sources of stem cells or subjects of study.
From a religious perspective, SCNT may even be said to offer one advantage over the use of embryos created with pregnancy in view.
Nonreproductive embryo creation does not bring to an end any divine-human procreative collaboration.
5.
BREADTH OF MORAL SUPPORT FOR NONREPRODUCTIVE EMBRYO CREATION The use of unenabled embryos as means for helping others, even as we are reminded of how carefully we must proceed, enjoys the support of a wide range of reli- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 61 gious traditions.
That support is even broader than commonly supposed.
To see this, let us consider what is ostensibly the principal opposition.
I refer to the view of the Congregation for the Doctrine of the Faith of the Roman Catholic Church, as joined by fundamentalist Christians, which asserts two doctrines: (a) that human life is a sacred gift of God that we must respect, and (b) zygotic personhood, the thesis that fertilization suffices to create a new person.
[a] We Respect Life by Relieving Suffering at No Cost in Potential Lives The Congregation has declared that IVF, cloning, and other technological innovations in reproduction are inconsistent with the sanctity of human life.
The reason that the Congregation rejects these procedures is twofold: it categorizes the procedures as nonconjugal reproduction, and thus as a departure from God's manner of giving life, and it expresses fear that they might lead to eugenics.
But note that these two objections do not apply to procedures, such as nonreproductive embryo creation, that do not produce babies.
What respect for life requires therefore remains an open question.
I suggest, with ample support in religious traditions, including Catholicism, that relieving widespread human suffering when one may do so at no cost in potential lives--this in fulfillment of the wishes of generous cell donors--virtuously affirms respect for human life.
[b] Zygotic Personhood Untenable I have explained in my recent paper in Science that (i) zygotic personhood contradicts the Catholic church's more plausible teaching, maintained during the church's first nineteen centuries, that at fertilization a conceptus cannot, for lack of structures corresponding to the intellectual faculty that makes us human, constitute a person, and that (ii) zygotic personhood is refuted by the fact that embryos do not individuate until day 14, as Catholic theologians have recognized.
The church, having recently conceded that personhood is a philosophical question, offers only one argument for zygotic personhood.
That argument consists in identifying a new person with the genome formed at each conception.
But the church cannot maintain this embrace of genetic reductionism.
To do so contradicts the church's fundamental belief in mind and soul.
We must first plumb the depths of any moral view before we can ascertain its verdict on a question at hand.
When we include in our analysis of Catholicism its bedrock--including the second greatest of the commandments and the consequence that we are obliged to come to the aid of our neighbors and to answer the call to charity--we find a compelling case for epidosembryo research and therapy.
It would be misleading to conflate the use of unenabled embryos with abortion.
An abortion kills a conceptus developing in the womb, an enabled conceptus.
An enabled conceptus will follow a course of gestation requiring only that the mother stay healthy.
Whereas absent a voluntary act to which no one is obliged, an unenabled embryo will never implant, will never mature even to the fetal stage.
Fewer abortions mean more babies.
Were society to refrain from nonreproductive embryo creation, not one more baby would likely be born.
6.
WISHFUL THINKING ABOUT ADULT CELLS WILL NOT OBVIATE STUDY OF EMBRYONIC Opponents of embryo use have recently urged that we forego use of embryos and instead use cells that they characterize as functionally equivalent and less morally problematic, namely, adult cells.
This line of wishful thinking, embraced in H. R. 1644,  2, finding (7), begins with the notion that we might confine stem cell research to adult stem cells.
Clinging to this idea, some nonscientist opponents of embryo research are wont to trumpet every report about the plasticity of adult stem cells.
Meanwhile these advocates will exaggerate every qualification or condition that they hear mentioned by cautious scientists careful not to overstate present knowledge about embryonic stem cells.
The refutation of this wishful thinking is immediate.
Embryonic stem cells are pluripotent, which is to say that they are capable of issuing in every cell type save for the placenta.
Adult stem cells are only multipotent, each capable of issuing in no more than a few cell types.
When pluripotency is the goal, the earlier the better.
For some cell types, among them cardiac and pancreatic islet, no adult stem cells have been found.
Where adult stem cells are known to exist, often they can be found only in small quantities and obtained only by intrusive means.
For instance, to obtain adult stem cells useful in the brain, as one would wish to do for Parkinson's disease, one must drill a hole in the cranium.
Adult stem cells may also embody the effects of aging and contain genetic abnormalities accumulated over the course of a life.
If, painlessly for both donor and recipient, one could rejuvenate one's skin with a transplant from a family member, who would prefer their grandmother's skin to that of a newborn niece? We must also recognize that stems cell vary in the extent to which clinicians will be able to direct VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 62 differentiation.
Embryonic stem cells may prove easier to direct.
For all these reasons, it is simply implausible that adult stem cells are functional substitutes for embryonic stem cells.
Nor can one assume that embryonic germ cells, derived from abortuses five or more weeks old, are functionally equivalent to embryonic stem cells.
It does not advance understanding to interject, as have opponents of embryo research, that no therapies by means of embryonic stem cells have yet been confirmed.
For both adult and embryonic stem cells, the present agenda is basic research.
In the U. S. there has been scant little research on embryonic stem cells and SCNT.
Both lines of inquiry are stymied by law.
No funds dispensed by the National Institutes of Health may be used for research in which embryos are destroyed (Pub. L. 106-554, Title V,  510).
It is unrealistic to expect confirmed therapies from research not yet performed.
Frequently in the history of science when the prospect has appeared of beneficial results from several alternative avenues of inquiry, and when it has not been known which avenue would be the most productive, the practice has been to follow all paths simultaneously.
Sundry mathematicians traveled down numerous paths, developing whole new fields of mathematics in the process, before Andrew Wiles combined insights from multiple fields into the proof of Fermat's Last Theorem.
And then there is serendipity.
Often great advances occur in one direction while scientists believe that they are working in another.
Roentgen discovered x-rays without looking for them.
Sometimes multiple avenues all bear fruit.
Biomedical research could reveal a clinical need for all varieties of stem cells, one type for one disease, another type for another disease.
When delay and inefficiency are measured in lives lost, it would be a shame to bet everything on one horse.
The overwhelming majority of biomedical scientists prize embryonic stem cell research as one of the most promising frontiers for the relief of human suffering in our lifetime.
The ability to generate specialized cells of all types renders the use of embryonic stem cells, through SCNT and otherwise, that rare strategy that can yield therapies in virtually all fields of medicine.
If biomedical scientists imagined that adult cells would suffice instead, they would be the first to tell us so.
Research on adult cells does offer some promise, should be pursued, and is being pursued.
But the overwhelming majority of biomedical scientists urge that embryonic research possesses singular advantages and is yet more promising.
On the question of which avenues of investigation are relatively more promising, the judgment of these scientists should serve as our guide, just as it does in budgetary decisions.
We have learned from encounters with such ventures as ``creation science,'' which purportedly refutes the theory of evolution, that we must be sceptical when nonscientist advocates offer purported analyses of scientific data to reinforce conclusions that they have already reached on nonscientific grounds.
The current incarnation of data advocacy would have us believe that we have little to gain scientifically from the alternative that the advocates disfavor on moral grounds.
To object to embryo research explicitly on moral grounds is of course quintessentially pertinent here.
(Though, according to my analysis, morality bids us support, not oppose, that research.)
But whatever our moral theory, if we think that the moral permissibility of an action depends on that action's probable success in achieving a scientific result, we ought to take counsel about that probability from science's mainstream.
The voice of science's mainstream is resounding.
We could fail to apprehend the scientific consensus on the singular promise of embryonic stem cell research only by putting our heads in the sand.
The rationale for SCNT is even more compelling than that for embryonic stem cells in general, this by virtue of two advantages to which I have alluded--and perhaps others not yet glimpsed.
First, SCNT affords a means of producing stem cells that are (a) ample in quantity and pluripotent and (b) of the patient's own genome.
Adult cells do not allow us to achieve (a); an unrelated embryo from a fertility clinic will not achieve (b).
Second, eggs developing after SCNT furnish the optimal opportunity for observing the full scale reprogramming of gene expression and the cell's other regulatory mechanisms, the likes of which either does not naturally occur in specialized cells of the adult, or occurs on a scale too small to allow us to learn much if we could observe it.
By studying reprogramming in embryos, scientists hope to learn what steps to take in order to induce reprogramming in specialized cells of adult patients, which in turn could obviate the need to obtain embryonic stem cells for therapy.
Scientists would not urge this research, would not predict the loss of useful therapies if we forgo it, if they could gain that knowledge without using embryos created by SCNT.
In short, if Congress defies the advice of science's mainstream and excludes unenabled unindividuated embryos from research, it will handcuff research for no moral gain.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 63 7.
PRESERVING THE LEGALITY OF NONREPRODUCTIVE SCNT As the Members well know, there obtains a scientific and, if I may say, a public consensus that because reproductive cloning in animals so often issues in deformed offspring, and because cloning in homo sapiens poses further technical challenges and questions that have not been met, we ought not presently to attempt the cloning of a human.
That is not the whole of the moral discussion, since we can imagine a day when present problems have been overcome to the extent that the procedure has become relatively reliable.
Thereupon we would return to the morality of ``replacing'' a lost child with a clone and of using SCNT to conceive a child who could be available as a histocompatible donor to a sick child.
Consider again a religious perspective.
We, none of us, can confidently say that, if we could have a conversation with God, He would tell us to shun reproductive cloning in all instances.
But insofar as reproductive cloning is not presently reliable, and I therefore cannot defend it on moral grounds, I confine myself here to the case for preserving nonreproductive embryo creation.
We may further narrow the discussion to nonreproductive SCNT rather than nonreproductive embryo creation in general.
For the proposed legislation would forbid SCNT but not restrain the use of IVF in research.
Thus far I have discussed morality, the only cited rationale for making nonreproductive SCNT a crime.
I have argued that a close analysis of leading moral views reveals moral approval and praise for nonreproductive SCNT.
This issues even from quarters that might be thought settled otherwise.
I now turn to two pragmatic arguments.
These have been advanced for the proposition that, even if nonreproductive SCNT is moral for the reasons that I have offered, the procedure should be prohibited anyway.
The first of these arguments emanates from concern for enforceability of a ban on cloning, the second from fear of a slippery slope.
I shall show that neither argument sustains the prohibition of nonreproductive SCNT. [a] Difficulty of Enforcement: Inherent for Any Proscription of Reproductive Conduct, Not Grounds for an Overly Broad Proscription The first argument is broached in H. R. 1644,  2, finding (8), which asserts that ``it will be nearly impossible to prevent attempts at `reproductive cloning' once cloned human embryos are available in the laboratory.''
Fully stated, the argument starts with the premise that for satisfactory enforcement of a statute that prohibits x, law enforcement officials must be able to detect most instances of x. Next it is asserted that officials will not reliably be able to detect reproductive cloning if and when it is perpetrated by someone legally permitted to perform SCNT for research and therapy.
It is then concluded that, by dint of such undetected violations, a statute prohibiting only reproductive cloning cannot be enforced to a satisfactory extent.
I contend that the enforcement problem envisioned here is a red herring.
As the foregoing argument itself implies, the question that we must ask, when urged to forbid all SCNT so as to tighten the noose around reproductive cloning, is as follows.
If SCNT in research and therapy were permitted, what would be the probable incidence of surreptitious reproductive cloning by persons performing SCNT in research and therapy? The probable incidence, so I shall suggest, is negligible.
The foregoing argument leaps from the observation that undetected violations can occur to the conclusion that significantly many undetected violations will occur.
We must understand the laboratory environment.
Cell biology laboratories-- where studies of stem cells and cellular reprogramming would occur--do not serve patients.
Such laboratories contain no examining rooms, no surgical suites, no equipment for the invasive procedures of removing an egg from an ovary or transferring an embryo to a uterus.
Most of the scientists who work in such laboratories are Ph.D.s, not physicians.
Eggs and somatic cells used by such laboratories in research will have been shipped there as donations.
If cell donors impose the condition by which I earlier defined an epidosembryo, the laboratories will have use of the cells on condition that any resultant embryo not be transferred to a uterus.
A federal law forbidding reproductive cloning would effectively impose this condition in all cases.
So if a rogue scientist seeks to clone a human, that scientist must be surreptitious indeed.
The rogue must remove an embryo from a laboratory's inventory and arrange an intrauterine embryo transfer in such fashion that the rogue and the woman receiving the embryo manage to keep the whole thing secret.
Where can the rogue arrange an intrauterine transfer? He cannot engage a reputable physician, hospital, or clinical laboratory.
If reproductive cloning is a federal crime, reputable providers will not perform the procedure--just as, comporting with a nonpenal statute (Pub. L. 106-554), NIH-supported scientists now abstain from SCNT for any purpose.
Hence the rogue must collaborate with a woman willing to undergo an assisted reproduction procedure without the usual circumstances of medical care.
And she must be willing to risk punishment by a minimum fine of $1,000,000 and up VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 64 to ten years'' imprisonment.
By proposed 18 U.S.C.  302(a)(2) of H. R. 1644, she and the rogue would both be guilty of the crime.
A step earlier in the analysis, consider also what it would take for a woman to want an embryo produced in a research laboratory.
As a solution to infertility, SCNT is inferior to IVF: IVF produces offspring that combine the genomes of the parents, and does not, like cloning, make a deformed neonate more probable than not.
Therefore a woman interested in a baby by SCNT--if we can imagine that desire amid public awareness of how likely is a deformed child--will most likely not be infertile but instead someone seeking a clone of a previously or presently living human identified by her.
That is the imagined primary motivation for cloning.
Only by a highly improbable accident would an embryo created in a research or clinical laboratory serve a cloning purpose of someone other than the person who chose the somatic cell donor.
A woman considering cloning will not want any of a laboratory's already extant embryos.
She will want only an embryo created to order, an embryo bearing a genome chosen by her.
We observe what follows from this.
For the vast majority of embryos produced by SCNT in research and for therapy--in a reputable laboratory, for all of the embryos--there will be no women wishing to bear them.
And in the ordinary course, the embryos will be consumed in research and therapy.
So regardless how many embryos are produced by SCNT in laboratories across the country, for a rogue to produce an embryo acceptable to a given woman, the rogue must arrange yet another surreptitious procedure, namely, removal of a somatic cell from a corpse or living human chosen by her.
She would also likely prefer that any embryo transferred to her be made of one of her eggs so that the clone will bear her mitochondrial DNA, not a stranger's.
In order to furnish one of her eggs to the rogue scientist, she would have to undergo an oocyte recovery procedure that punctures her ovarian wall.
For this she would need to seek out a fertility clinician, and, after the procedure, ask the physician to give her an egg to take home.
That would immediately seem suspicious to the clinician because in the usual practice of IVF, all recovered eggs are fertilized in hopes of obtaining a few transferable embryos.
From these circumstances we can see why the risk of surreptitious cloning via research and medical care is negligible.
Talk of large numbers of embryos sitting around ready to make clones makes for good rhetoric, but we must insist on analysis.
Consider further that penal legislation against reproductive cloning will thwart any large scale efforts to attempt the procedure, and in consequence its success rate on transferred embryos--i.e., the ratio of healthy infants to embryos transferred-- will doubtless remain dismal.
As proponents of a ban on reproductive cloning have observed, the public keenly understands the high risk of deformities through reproductive cloning and strongly opposes the practice.
Opposition may harden if we learn that, in addition to the high incidence of deformities at birth, ostensibly healthy infant clones are found to develop serious health problems later in life.
We do not yet know how even Dolly's life will go.
All of which suggests that scant few women would be willing to tackle both the high risk of a deformed offspring and a jail sentence, fewer still if only a rogue will assist.
Despite recent announcements by a handful of providers who say that they intend to produce clones, conspicuous by its absence is any sign that a significant number of women are willing to enlist.
Even if, by virtue of research in other countries, the day arrives at which cloning has so greatly improved that the risk of deformities is deemed tolerable, a woman would do better to procure the procedure legally in a foreign country--assisted reproduction already serves the affluent--than to commit a crime without benefit of customary medical care.
In view of all these circumstances, the notion that SCNT in research and therapy will to any significant extent form a conduit to illegal reproductive cloning seems manifestly improbable.
Of course I do not purport to say that never will it happen that a researcher or provider attempts illegal reproductive cloning.
Some illegal reproductive cloning may occur, without detection, even if federal law forbids all SCNT.
Not only might a rare disreputable health care provider stray, but in theory women and cooperating cell donors who do not care whose eggs were used could, acting without medical assistance, buy oocytes through advertisements in campus newspapers, learn somatic cell nuclear transfer from the literature, and perform intrauterine embryo transfers entirely in private.
A person who is clever and determined enough can violate any law.
That does not alter my fundamental point.
By virtue of the circumstances that I have described, research and clinical laboratories are not a probable back door route to illegal cloning.
Upon recognizing that airtight enforcement of any law seems unattainable, we ought not lash out and broaden a cloning prohibition to sweep nonreproductive SCNT within its maw.
Instead we should understand that enforceability depends on the chosen territory.
The territory chosen here should give us pause.
Within the pe- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 65 numbra of the Bill of Rights, as interpreted in the Supreme Court's decision in Griswold v. Connecticut (1965), the right of privacy extends to reproduction.
The Court has also made clear that each person's zone of privacy encompasses reproduction under the care of a physician.
Hence if H. R. 1644 declared it a crime to perform or attempt contraception, or in vitro fertilization, it would be said that such prohibition unconstitutionally infringes the right of privacy.
Can the conclusion be different when the proscribed act is reproductive cloning? H. R. 1644 itself states in  2, finding (8)(A), that ``cloning would take place within the privacy of the doctor-patient relationship.''
A measure of the intrusiveness of an anticloning statute is what would be adduced as evidence of the crime.
When a mother as defendant denies bearing a clone, a prosecutor may seek a ``genetic audit'' comparing her child's DNA to that of the person allegedly cloned.
In facilitating patents on DNA sequences, as in the Biotechnology Patent Protection Act of 1995, Congress has already opened the door to legal claims predicated on DNA audits.
But now we are talking about incarceration of parents on the basis of such evidence.
The fate of a criminal statute about reproduction lies in the courts.
We ought not worsen its chances by overbreadth.
Apart from this constitutional problem, as a matter of policy overbreadth here would foreclose such a negligible increment in illegal cloning as to make unreasonable an opportunity cost measured in relief of human suffering.
What can wisely be done to tighten enforceability of an anticloning statute includes four provisions that I shall mention in a moment.
First I must discuss the second argument for making nonreproductive SCNT illegal.
[b] Nonreproductive SCNT Not a Slippery Slope to Reproductive Cloning That argument begins with the prediction that use of nonreproductive SCNT in research and therapy will add to scientific knowledge about reproductive cloning, and that this will hasten the day when reproductive cloning becomes so reliable as to tempt us.
Thereupon, it is suggested.
we might repeal any statute forbidding it and bring upon ourselves its detrimental effects.
Hence we are urged to forbid nonreproductive SCNT now.
The slippery slope is an overworked metaphor.
Not every decisionmaking surface is slippery.
As the philosopher Richard M. Hare once observed, we decided to allow right turns from red traffic lights, and have not seen significantly more traffic accidents of right-turning vehicles.
Now we discuss whether to allow reproductive cloning.
For purposes of this discussion, we routinely abstract from the problem of defective clones, for we know that such a technical problem is solvable in principle.
Even so, the public, so we are reliably informed, easily summons the collective will to prohibit cloning.
That tells us that strong objections lie against even a perfectly reliable cloning procedure.
Indeed it is argued that cloning may in various ways diminish respect for human life.
Other objections to cloning gain expression in H. R. 1644,  2, findings [3]
If the day arrives when cloning's already anticipated reliability becomes actual, those objections will survive with undiminished force.
It is not a foregone conclusion that if cloning becomes reliable, we shall approve it.
On the other hand, we must be realistic in anticipating that even if reproductive cloning is declared illegal within various jurisdictions, someone may someday clone humans so as to gain, in the eyes of others, some advantage.
In that event, competitors may follow suit.
(This scenario has been broached concerning germ line genetic intervention in general.
See my ``Norms for Patents Concerning Human and Other Life Forms,'' Theoretical Medicine 17: 279-314 [1996].)
Competitors might migrate to jurisdictions where cloning is legal.
Sovereign countries might themselves behave in the same way, rushing to follow the first rival who legalizes cloning, this for fear of being dominated by genetic superiors.
The salient defect in the slippery slope argument against nonreproductive SCNT does not lie in the prediction that mercurial mankind will find reliable cloning irresistible, for that outcome is possible.
Rather the slippery slope argument falls by virtue of its mistaken assumption that we can somehow attenuate or delay reproductive cloning if we preclude nonreproductive SCNT in the U. S.
To state the obvious, what must happen to make reproductive cloning alluring is the successful performance of reproductive cloning.
For such success, there must occur experiments and cloning attempts.
This is a tough row to hoe, since it doubtless begins with a spate of deformed offspring.
To produce healthy clones will require surmounting many challenges, among them the shorter interval before gene activation in humans than in sheep, the effects of aging and mutation on donated somatic cells, and cloning's failure to produce normal genetic imprinting.
If progress against birth defects or later health problems of clones requires studies of development in utero, or even of development ex utero beyond fourteen days, the work of scientists using nonreproductive SCNT will not provide the solution.
Scientists working on embryonic stem cells and cellular reprogramming culture embryos for only a matter of days.
(In fact when an embryo reaches about VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 66 day 10, if it does not implant in a uterus, it will so badly deform that it can no longer properly be called an embryo.)
Suppose nonetheless that as mainstream scientists come to understand and publish accounts of how cellular reprogramming works, they inevitably issue knowledge dividends that can be cashed by those trying to perfect cloning.
We are powerless to prevent such dividends.
For instance, under authority of recent approval by Parliament, outstanding scientists in Oxford, Cambridge, and other British universities and research institutions will be using SCNT in research generally and in the study of cellular reprogramming in particular.
So too will scientists elsewhere in the world.
Their results will be reported in leading journals.
New scientific knowledge disseminates rapidly.
We cannot forestall improvements in cloning by any ban on SCNT in the U. S.
A ban on nonreproductive SCNT can only strike a blow against those who suffer.
Viewed from the perspective of years hence, the measure of damage wrought by a ban on use of SCNT in research would be the amount of suffering that could have been relieved if our extensive research enterprise had joined the worldwide effort to benefit from embryonic stem cells and cellular reprogramming.
8.
TIGHTENING A BAN ON REPRODUCTIVE CLONING WITHOUT OVERBREADTH The prohibition of proposed 18 U.S.C.  302(a) set forth in H. R. 1644 extends to SCNT that produces an embryo ``at any stage of development.''
This would bar all presently envisioned research use of SCNT, which produces and grows embryos to the blastocyst stage (day 5 of development).
The prohibition would bar SCNT even for therapy.
Thus if scientists learn how to use eggs to accomplish autologous transplants, the clinical implementation of this boon for sick patients would be a crime.
No comfort can be taken from mention in H. R. 1644 (in  2, clause [9] and proposed 18 U.S.C.  302[d]
We are told that the prohibition does not extend to ``nuclear transfer or other cloning techniques'' to produce, inter alia, ``cells other than human embryos.''
But the sundry methods other than SCNT for producing copies of various life forms--methods that vary by life form even though some commentators (and the bill) lump them all under the name ``cloning''--are not within the scope of the prohibition in the first place.
For the moral reasons that I have now recounted, if Congress were to thwart nonreproductive SCNT, that move would disserve morality.
It would thwart our ability to fulfill our duty to aid those in need.
If Congress chooses to legislate against reproductive cloning, I recommend the following four statutory features to preserve the availability of nonreproductive SCNT while tightening the proscription of reproductive cloning.
(1) The offense may be defined as ``intentional transfer to a uterus of an embryo created by somatic cell nuclear transfer.''
This would paint without using too broad a brush.
``Intentional'' assures that, as is appropriate in defining a crime, accidental conduct is not punished.
Congress could consider making reckless transfer a lesser offense.
(2) It may also be provided that ``A physician shall not effect intrauterine transfer of an embryo unless the embryo was (i) created in a laboratory under the physician's control or (ii) received from a licensed physician accompanied by a certificate that the embryo was created, without use of SCNT, in a laboratory under the latter physician's control.''
This provision assures that fertility clinicians will know the means by which any embryos that they transfer to a uterus were created.
It blocks the possibility of a woman inveigling an unwitting fertility clinician into a transfer into her of an SCNT-created embryo carried into the clinic by her.
The transferability provision of (ii) allows a scenario such as the following.
A woman engages an IVF procedure in Connecticut, then later moves to Oregon.
By virtue of (ii), her frozen embryos may be sent to an Oregon fertility clinician for intrauterine transfer.
She will not have to return to Connecticut for that procedure.
(3) In the preamble of H. R. 1644 appears language about what ``many'' think concerning morality.
There exist many who believe many things.
Rather than legislate morality, Congress could declare that it is prohibiting a procedure that would effectively constitute a clinical experiment with a probable success rate that is unacceptably low.
This is consistent with H. R. 2172 in that the enactment becomes part of the federal scheme of regulation of drugs and medical devices.
(4) Within the several states have already been enacted a potpourri of interdictions pertinent to this technological genre.
We can expect more such statutes.
Only preemptive federal legislation can assure a uniform norm, at least within the U. S.
It behooves us, for the sake of the public health, to foster a reliable basis of expectations for those making decisions about where to direct research efforts.
This espe- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 67 cially applies to young scientists who wisely shun fields of work whose regulatory environment is unstable.
(Here it may be added that we should be grateful for the commendable caution of senior scientists who, upon discovering the techniques of nonreproductive embryo creation, have evoked an open moral discussion.
This follows a pattern in the recent history of science, of which the introduction of recombinant DNA technology is another example, in which the bright light of public exposure shines early on morally sensitive innovations by virtue of their discoverers' candor and alertness to moral questions.)
For preemptive legislation, precedent obtains.
We look to the Food and Drug Administration, not to the several states, for a national system of regulating drugs and medical devices.
9.
CONCLUSION The burden of my testimony today is that it would disserve the cause of morality, disserve fulfillment of our duty to come to the aid of those who suffer, if any government action, whether a proscription of conduct or a constraint on the public purse, were to thwart nonreproductive SCNT.
When I speak of morality, I refer to the intersection of the leading moral views of our time--including especially those sometimes imagined to hold otherwise--whose common kernel holds it virtuous to relieve suffering in actual lives when we can do so at no cost in potential lives.
Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Thank you very much, sir.
And I apologize for cutting you off, but, you know, we have got to try to stay on point here.
Dr. Newman? STATEMENT OF STUART A. NEWMAN Mr. NEWMAN.
I thank the chairman for giving me the opportunity to testify today on this historical issue.
My name is Stuart Newman.
I have been a Professor of Cell Biology and Anatomy at New York Medical College since 1979 where I teach medical and graduate students, and direct a laboratory in developmental biology.
This is a scientific field that studies embryo development, cloning, regeneration, and stem cells.
My work on the development of the skeletal system in animals embryos has been supported over the past 25 years by grants from the National Science Foundation and the National Institutes of Health.
I am currently the recipient of two Federal grants in this area.
Since my student days, I have also been concerned with the uses to which scientific research is put.
Having become convinced that scientists, who are beneficiaries of public resources, have a deep responsibility to anticipate what lies down the road in their own fields, and to themselves act as a resource for the public on the complex issues around applications of scientific research, I joined with other scientists, social-scientists, feminists, and progressive community advocates to found the Council for Responsible Genetics in the late 1970's.
The Council is now the Nation's oldest organization scrutinizing and interpreting the new genetic technologies, and has worked for protecting genetic privacy, ending genetic discrimination, exercising caution in the development and dissemination of genetically engineered crops, banning biological weapons, and banning the introduction of inheritable genetic modifications into humans.
This last issue relates to my own field of expertise.
Over the past quarter century, I have seen laboratory findings, such as virusbased gene therapies and implantation of fetal tissues employed prematurely or inappropriately in humans through a process that, VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 68 while often having noble motivations, has also been mixed with appreciable amounts of wishful thinking, hype, and greed.
Last year, the Council issued the Genetic Bill of Rights, which is appended to my written testimony, which touches on all the above issues.
The last of the 10 listed Rights states, ``All people have the right to have been conceived, gestated, and born without genetic manipulation.''
This position arose, in part, from scientific consideration of the inherent uncertainties in performing such manipulations, which include cloning.
Reviewing the animal studies in this area led Professor Rudolf Jaenisch, of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, to state, ``I believe there probably isn't a normal clone around.''
Our position also emanated from the fact that any person engineered in this fashion will be an experiment subject to the kinds of disappointments associated with experiments failing to meet expectations.
A grim aspect of this experimental approach to producing people would be the devaluation of unfavorable outcomes if, as in cloning, the same procedure could be performed repeatedly until a desired outcome was reached.
In addition, while the Council for Responsible Genetics is unequivocally committed to a woman's right not to proceed with a pregnancy, if that is her choice, we, along with many feminists and others who affirm this right, are concerned that reproductive choice is increasingly being taken to include the right to genetically improve the next generation.
If this is allowed, it may soon lead to baby design and reproductive boutiques.
Eugenics, defining humans as genetically superior or inferior, and implementing those definitions, has a horrific history that we dare not repeat.
In line with the Genetic Bills of Rights, and in light of new experimental results and proposals to generate and modify human embryos, the Council for Responsible Genetics issued a policy statement on human embryo research earlier this month.
The statement is appended, and I will summarize it here.
The Council for Responsible Genetics opposes the utilization of human eggs and embryos for experimental manipulations and as items of commerce.
We, therefore, call for a ban on the buying or selling of human eggs or embryos, and the manipulation of any and all human eggs or embryos by transfer of cells, nuclei, cytoplasm, mitochondria, chromosomes, or isolated DNA or RNA molecules of human or nonhuman origin.
These bans are to apply whether or not the embryos are to be implanted and gestated.
No human embryo is to be produced solely for purposes of research.
These bans are to apply, irrespective of the sources of funding, whether public or private.
It is essential that the United States join the many other nations that have banned reproductive cloning.
But note that we call for a ban not just on reproductive cloning, but on so-call therapeutic cloning as well.
VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 69 That is, even if a cloned embryo is not intended for gestation, we are opposed to its manufacture.
We have become convinced that if a construction of modified or cloned human embryos is permitted, there will be little standing in the way of using them for reproductive purposes.
At that point, gestation of cloned embryos would easily become defined as a matter of individual choice.
The bans that we call for would not--would, in no way, curtail the option to employ in vitro fertilization for reproductive purposes.
Moreover, while we do not explicitly reject the production of embryo stem cells from excess embryos produced by in vitro fertilization, my own view is that other scientific avenues, specifically adult stem cell research, have greater promise.
A group of my colleagues at New York Medical College recently published on the repair of damaged mouse hears with adult mouse stem cells.
I know of no comparable successes with embryo stem cells in the mouse, even though such cells have been available and researched for more than a decade.
Any objective view of the relevant animal research would conclude that adult stem cells are the better bet.
As recently as a year or 2 ago, advocates of human cloning were careful to state that an embryo produced by cloning had no less dignity as a potential human than an embryo produced by fertilization.
Now that some technical advance is seen in making donormatched stem cells from cloned embryos, distinctions are being made by interested parties between producing embryos for research by fertilization still not acceptable, and doing so by cloning, now acceptable.
If we let purely technical and utilitarian considerations determine what is acceptable in human reproduction and production, in a few brief years, human error will assuredly lead to production of humans with avoidable errors.
As a scientist, I am personally concerned that the products of our research not be used for dangerous and divisive purposes, which would bring disrepute to science and undermine our ability to do beneficial work.
As these new technologies proliferate, the question continually arises as to where to draw the line.
I am convinced that the biotechnology industry does not want any line to be drawn that would curtail any of their activities.
The Greenwood bill, with its limited moratorium on reproductive cloning, will just be an opportunity to soften up public opinion, even on this issue.
I say---- Mr. BILIRAKIS.
Please summarize, Doctor.
I would appreciate it.
Mr. NEWMAN.
I say this with regret, as a life-long progressive and a democratic voter.
Because embryo cloning will, with virtual certainty, lead to the production of experimental human beings, both as a scientist and a citizen, I urge you to draw the line here.
[The prepared statement of Stuart A. Newman follows:] PREPARED STATEMENT OF STUART A. NEWMAN, PROFESSOR OF CELL BIOLOGY ANATOMY, NEW YORK MEDICAL COLLEGE AND My name is Stuart Newman.
I have been a professor of Cell Biology and Anatomy at New York Medical College since 1979, where I teach medical and graduate stu- VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 70 dents and direct a laboratory in developmental biology.
This is the scientific field that studies embryo development, cloning, regeneration, and stem cells.
My work on the development of the skeletal system in animal embryos has been supported over the past 25 years by grants from the National Science Foundation and the National Institutes of Health.
I am currently the recipient of two Federal grants.
Since my student days I have also been concerned with the uses to which scientific research is put.
My doctoral research in chemistry at the University of Chicago was conducted at the James Franck Institute.
Professor James Franck was a Nobel prize winning atomic physicist who was the principal author of the May 1945 Franck Report.
This document anticipated the horrors of nuclear weapons and was the first call by scientists for international controls over these weapons.
The Franck report was a landmark in scientific responsibility and its message ultimately prevailed.
Having become convinced that scientists, who are beneficiaries of public resources, have a deep responsibility to anticipate what lies down the road in their own fields and to themselves act as a resource for the public on the complex issues around applications of scientific research, I joined with other scientists, social scientists, feminists and community advocates to found the Council for Responsible Genetics in the late 1970s.
The Council is now the Nation's oldest organization scrutinizing and interpreting the new genetic technologies, and has worked for protecting genetic privacy, ending genetic discrimination, exercising caution on the development and dissemination of genetically engineered crops, banning biological weapons, and banning the introduction of inheritable genetic modifications into humans.
This last issue relates to my own field of expertise.
Over the past quarter century I have seen laboratory findings such as virus-based gene therapies and implantation of fetal tissues employed prematurely or inappropriately in humans through a process that while often having noble motivations has also been mixed with appreciable amounts of wishful thinking, hype and greed.
Last year the Council issued the Genetic Bill of Rights (appended) which touches on all the above issues.
The last of the ten listed Rights states: All people have the right to have been conceived, gestated, and born without genetic manipulation.
This position arose, in part, from scientific consideration of the inherent uncertainties in performing such manipulations, which include cloning.
Reviewing the animal studies in this area led Professor Rudolf Jaenisch of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology to state ``I believe there probably isn't a normal clone around.''
Our postion also emanated from the fact that any person engineered in this fashion will be an experiment, subject to the kinds of disappointments associated with experiments failing to meet expectations.
A grim aspect of this experimental approach to producing people would the devaluation of ``unfavorable'' outcomes if, as in cloning, the same procedure could be performed repeatedly until a desired outcome was reached.
In addition, while the Council for Responsible Genetics is unequivocally committed to women's right not to proceed with a pregnancy if that is her choice, we, along with many feminists and others who affirm this right, are concerned that ``reproductive choice'' is increasingly taken to include the right to genetically improve the next generation.
If this is allowed it may soon lead to baby design and reproductive boutiques.
Eugenics, defining humans as genetically superior or inferior and implementing those definitions, has a horrific history that we dare not repeat.
In line with the Genetic Bill of Rights, and in light of new experimental results and proposals to generate and modify human embryos, the Council for Responsible Genetics issued a policy statement on human embryo research earlier this month.
The statement is appended and I will summarize it here:  The Council for Responsible Genetics opposes the utilization of human eggs and embryos for experimental manipulations and as items of commerce.
 We therefore call for a ban on the buying or selling of human eggs or embryos, and the manipulation of any and all human eggs or embryos by transfer of cells, nuclei, cytoplasm, mitochondria, chromosomes, or isolated DNA or RNA molecules of human or non-human origin.
 These bans are to apply whether or not the embryos are to be implanted and gestated.
 No human embryo is to be produced solely for purposes of research.
 These bans are to apply irrespective of the sources of funding, whether public or private.
It is essential that the United States join the many other nations that have banned reproductive cloning.
But note that we call for a ban not just on reproductive cloning but on so-called ``therapeutic cloning'' as well.
That is, even if a cloned embryo is not intended for gestation we are opposed to its manufacture.
We have VerDate 11-MAY-2000 11:13 Sep 10, 2001 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 73733.TXT HCOM1 PsN: HCOM1 71 become convinced that if the construction of modified or cloned embryos is permitted there will be little standing in the way of using them for reproductive purposes.
At that point gestation of cloned embryos would easily become defined as a matter of individual choice.
The bans that we call for would in no way curtail the option to employ in vitro fertilization for reproductive purposes.
Moreover, while we do not explicitly reject the production of embryo stem cells from excess embryos produced by in vitro fertilization, my own view is that other scientific avenues, specifically adult stem cell research, have greater promise.
A group of my colleagues at New York Medical College recently published on the repair of damaged mouse hearts with adult mouse stem cells.
I know of no comparable successes with embryo stems cells in the mouse, even though such cells have been available and researched for more than a decade.
Any objective view of the relevant animal research would conclude that adult stem cells are the better bet.
As recently as a year or two ago advocates of human cloning were careful to state that an embryo produced by cloning had no less dignity as a potential human than an embryo produced by fertilization.
Now that some technical advantage is seen in making donor-matched stem cells from cloned embryos, distinctions are being made by interested parties between producing embryos for research by fertilization (still not acceptable) and doing so by cloning (now acceptable).
If we let purely technical and utilitarian considerations determine what is acceptable in human reproduction and production, in a few brief years human error will assuredly lead to the production of humans with avoidable errors.
As a scientist, I am personally concerned that the products of our research not be used for dangerous and divisive purposes, which would bring disrepute to science and undermine our ability to do beneficial work.
As these new technologies proliferate the question continually arises as to ``where to draw the line.''
Because embryo cloning will, with virtual certainty, lead to the production of ``experimental'' human beings, both as a scientist and a citizen I urge you to draw the line here.
APPENDIX I COUNCIL FOR RESPONSIBLE GENETICS STATEMENT ON EMBRYO RESEARCH June 2001 The Council for Responsible Genetics unequivocally supports a woman's right to make her own reproductive decisions.
However, we oppose the utilization of human eggs and embryos for experimental manipulations and as items of commerce because of the potential for eugenic applications and health risks to women and their offspring.
The Council for Responsible Genetics therefore calls for a ban on the buying or selling of human eggs or embryos, and the manipulation of any and all human eggs or embryos by transfer of cells, nuclei, cytoplasm, mitochondria, chromosomes, or isolated DNA or RNA molecules of human or non-human origin.
This ban would apply whether or not the embryos are to be implanted and gestated and irrespective of the sources of funding, whether public or private.
No human e
